{
   "status":"OK",
   "copyright":"Copyright (c) 2017 Pro Publica Inc. All Rights Reserved.",
   "results":[
      {
         "id": "G000377",
         "member_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
         "name": "Kay Granger",
         "num_results": 20,
         "offset": 0,
         "bills": [
              {
                "congress": "115",
                "bill_id": "hr3219-115",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.3219",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/115/bills/hr3219.json",
                "title": "Making appropriations for the Department of Defense for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2018, and for other purposes.",
                "short_title": "Make America Secure Appropriations Act, 2018",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/115th-congress/house-bill/3219",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/115/hr3219",
                "introduced_date": "2017-07-13",
                "active": true,
                "house_passage": "2017-07-27",
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 0,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {},
                "committees": "House Appropriations Committee",
                "primary_subject": "Armed Forces and National Security",
                "summary": "Highlights:  This bill provides FY2018 appropriations for several federal agencies. The bill includes 4 of the 12 regular FY2018 appropriations bills, including:    the Department of Defense Appropriations Act, 2018;   the Legislative Branch Appropriations Act, 2018;   the Military Construction, Veterans Affairs, and Related Agencies Appropriations Act, 2018; and   the Energy and Water Development and Related Agencies Appropriations Act, 2018.   The bill also includes the Department of Homeland Security Border Infrastructure Construction Appropriations Act, 2018 which provides funding to U.S. Customs and Border Protection for the construction of fencing and a wall along the Southern border.  The bill provides additional Overseas Contingency Operations/ Global War on Terrorism funding which is exempt from discretionary spending limits.  Full Summary:  Defense, Military Construction, Veterans Affairs, Legislative Branch, and Energy and Water Development National Security Appropriations Act, 2018 or the Make America Secure Appropriations Act, 2018  Department of Defense Appropriations Act, 2018  DIVISION A--DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE APPROPRIATIONS ACT, 2018  This division provides FY2018 appropriations to the Department of Defense (DOD) for military activities, including appropriations for Overseas Contingency Operations (OCO)/ Global War on Terrorism. TITLE I--MILITARY PERSONNEL  Provides appropriations for active-duty and reserve personnel in the Army, Navy, Marine Corps, and Air Force (the military departments), and for National Guard personnel in the Army and Air Force.  TITLE II--OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE  Provides appropriations for Operation and Maintenance (O&amp;M) for the military departments, other DOD agencies, the Reserve Components, and the Army and Air National Guard.  Provides appropriations for:    the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Armed Forces;   Environmental Restoration for the military departments, DOD agencies, and at Formerly Used Defense Sites;   Overseas Humanitarian, Disaster, and Civic Aid;   the Cooperative Threat Reduction Account; and   the O&amp;M, National Defense Restoration Fund.   TITLE III--PROCUREMENT  Provides appropriations for Procurement by the military departments, including:    Aircraft;   Missiles;   Weapons and Tracked Combat Vehicles;   Ammunition;   Spacecraft, Rockets, and Related Equipment; and   Shipbuilding and Conversion by the Navy.   Provides appropriations for:    Defense-Wide Procurement;   Defense Production Act Purchases; and   the Procurement, National Defense Restoration Fund.   TITLE IV--RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, TEST AND EVALUATION  Provides appropriations for Research, Development, Test, and Evaluation (RDT&amp;E) by the military departments and defense agencies.  Provides appropriations for: (1) the RDT&amp;E, National Defense Restoration Fund; and (2) Operational Test and Evaluation.  TITLE V--REVOLVING AND MANAGEMENT FUNDS  Provides appropriations for the Defense Working Capital Funds.  TITLE VI--OTHER DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE PROGRAMS  Provides appropriations for other DOD programs, including:    the Defense Health Program,   Chemical Agents and Munitions Destruction,   Drug Interdiction and Counter-Drug Activities, and   the Office of the Inspector General.   TITLE VII--RELATED AGENCIES  Provides appropriations for the Central Intelligence Agency Retirement and Disability System Fund and the Intelligence Community Management Account.  TITLE VIII--GENERAL PROVISIONS  (Sec. 8001) Prohibits appropriations provided by this division from being used for publicity or propaganda purposes not authorized by Congress.  (Sec. 8002) Exempts DOD from laws prohibiting the compensation or employment of foreign nationals if specified conditions are met.  (Sec. 8003) Prohibits funding provided by this division from remaining available for obligation beyond the current fiscal year unless this division expressly provides otherwise.  (Sec. 8004) Prohibits more than 20% of the appropriations provided by this division for the current fiscal year from being obligated during the last two months of the fiscal year, with an exception for support of active duty training of reserve components or summer camp training of the Reserve Officers' Training Corps.  (Sec. 8005) Specifies authorities and restrictions for transferring specified funds provided by this division for other military functions.  (Sec. 8006) Requires tables included in the report accompanying this division to be treated as if they were included in the text of this division.  (Sec. 8007) Requires DOD to submit a report to Congress to establish the baseline for application of reprogramming and transfer authorities for FY2018. Prohibits funds provided by this division from being reprogrammed or transferred until the report is provided or DOD certifies to Congress that the reprogramming or transfer is necessary as an emergency requirement. Includes exceptions for: (1) the Environmental Restoration accounts, and (2) Drug Interdiction and Counter-drug activities.  (Sec. 8008) Prohibits cash balances in DOD Working Capital Funds from exceeding the level necessary for cash disbursements to be made from the funds. Sets forth requirements and limitations for transfers of balances in the funds to specified accounts.  (Sec. 8009) Prohibits the initiation of a special access program without notifying Congress in advance.  (Sec. 8010) Establishes limitations and conditions on the use of funds provided by this division to initiate or terminate certain multiyear procurement contracts.  (Sec. 8011) Appropriates O&amp;M funds for the costs of humanitarian and civic assistance provided in conjunction with military operations.  (Sec. 8012) Prohibits DOD from managing civilian personnel on the basis of any end-strength or subjecting civilian personnel to any end-strength limitations.  (Sec. 8013) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to directly or indirectly influence congressional action on legislation or appropriation matters pending before Congress.  (Sec. 8014) Prohibits compensation from being paid to any member of the Army participating as a full-time student and receiving benefits paid by the Department of Veterans Affairs from the DOD Education Benefits Fund if the time spent as a student is counted toward the member's service commitment. Applies the restriction only to active components of the Army and exempts members that have reenlisted with this option prior to October 1, 1987.  (Sec. 8015) Permits funds appropriated in title III of this division for the Department of Defense Pilot Mentor-Protege Program to be transferred to any other account contained in this division to implement a developmental assistance agreement under the program.  (Sec. 8016) Prohibits DOD from purchasing certain anchor and mooring chains unless they are manufactured in the United States.  (Sec. 8017) Prohibits funds from being used to demilitarize or dispose of certain small firearms, small arms ammunition, or ammunition components that are not otherwise prohibited from commercial sale under federal law, unless the Army has certified that the small arms, ammunition, or components are unserviceable or unsafe for further use.  (Sec. 8018) Limits funding for the relocation of any DOD entity into or within the National Capital Region. Permits DOD to waive the limitation by certifying to Congress that a relocation is required in the best interest of the government.  (Sec. 8019) Provides specified funds for incentive payments for federal contracts involving contractors, subcontractors, or suppliers that are Indian organizations or Indian-owned economic enterprises.  (Sec. 8020) Prohibits funds provided by this division for the Defense Media Activity from being used for national or international political or psychological activities.  (Sec. 8021) Permits DOD to incur obligations of up to $350 million for DOD military compensation, construction projects, and supplies and services in anticipation of contributions from the government of Kuwait.  (Sec. 8022) Provides appropriations from specified Air Force accounts to support Civil Air Patrol Corporation operation and maintenance, procurement, readiness, counterdrug activities, drug demand reduction activities involving youth programs, and vehicle procurement.  (Sec. 8023) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to establish a new DOD federally-funded research and development center (FFRDC). Limits compensation for FFRDC members or consultants.  Prohibits a defense FFRDC from using FY2018 DOD funds for new building construction, cost-sharing payments for projects funded by government grants, absorption of contract overruns, or certain charitable contributions.  Limits the staff years that may be funded for FFRDCs from FY2018 funds, and requires DOD to submit a report on the allocation of staff years with the FY2019 budget request.  Reduces the total amount appropriated by this division for FFRDCs.  (Sec. 8024) Prohibits DOD from procuring carbon, alloy, or armor steel plating not melted and rolled in the United States or Canada. Permits DOD to waive the prohibition if adequate domestic supplies are not available and an acquisition is necessary for national security purposes.  (Sec. 8025) Specifies that \"congressional defense committees\" includes the Senate and House Armed Services Committees and Appropriations Subcommittees on Defense.  (Sec. 8026) Permits DOD to acquire the modification, depot maintenance, and repair of aircraft, vehicles, and vessels; and production of components through competition between DOD activities and private firms.  (Sec. 8027) Revokes blanket waivers of the Buy American Act if DOD determines that a country has violated the terms of a specified agreement by discriminating against products produced in the United States.  (Sec. 8028) Permits funds in the Department of Defense Overseas Military Facility Investment Recovery Account to remain available until expended.  (Sec. 8029) Permits the Air Force to convey to Indian tribes located in Nevada, Idaho, North Dakota, South Dakota, Montana, Oregon, Minnesota, and Washington relocatable military housing units currently located at Grand Forks, Malmstrom, Mountain Home, Ellsworth, and Minot Air Force Bases that are excess to the needs of the Air Force. Requires the Operation Walking Shield Program to resolve any housing unit conflicts arising among requests of Indian tribes for these conveyances.  (Sec. 8030) Permits O&amp;M appropriations to be used to purchase items with an investment unit cost of not more than $250,000.  (Sec. 8031) Prohibits the use of funds provided by this division to disestablish, close, downgrade from host to extension center, or place on probation a Senior Reserve Officers' Training Corps program.  (Sec. 8032) Requires DOD to issue regulations to: (1) prohibit the sale of tobacco or tobacco-related products in military resale outlets in the United States, its territories, and possessions at a price below the most competitive price in the local community; and (2) require the prices in overseas military retail outlets to be within the range of prices established for military retail systems stores in the United States.  (Sec. 8033) Prohibits the use of DOD Working Capital Funds to purchase specified investment items.  (Sec. 8034) Prohibits funds provided for the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) from remaining available for obligation beyond the current fiscal year, except for funds provided for the Reserve for Contingencies, the Working Capital Fund, or other specified programs.  (Sec. 8035) Permits funds made available by this division to the Defense Intelligence Agency to be used for the design, development, and deployment of General Defense Intelligence Program intelligence communication and intelligence information systems.  (Sec. 8036) Requires specified Operation and Maintenance, Defense-Wide funds to be used for the mitigation of environmental impacts on Indian lands resulting from DOD activities.  (Sec. 8037) Requires DOD to comply with the Buy American Act.  (Sec. 8038) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to: (1) establish a field operating agency, or (2) pay a member of the Armed Forces or civilian employee transferred or reassigned from a headquarters activity if the employee's place of duty remains at headquarters. Specifies exceptions and permits waivers that will reduce personnel or financial requirements of the department.  (Sec. 8039) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to convert a function performed by DOD civilian employees to performance by a contractor unless specific requirements are met.  (Sec. 8040) Rescinds specified funds provided by prior appropriations divisions for Procurement and RDT&amp;E.  (Sec. 8041) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to reduce authorized positions for military technicians (dual status) of the Army National Guard, Air National Guard, Army Reserve, and Air Force Reserve unless the reductions are a direct result of a reduction in military force structure.  (Sec. 8042) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for assistance to North Korea unless the funds are specifically appropriated for that purpose.  (Sec. 8043) Permits O&amp;M funds provided by this division to be used to reimburse the National Guard and Reserve for providing intelligence or counterintelligence support to the combatant commands, defense agencies, and joint intelligence activities.  (Sec. 8044) Prohibits the transfer of DOD or CIA drug interdiction or counter-drug activity funds to any other department or agency except as specifically provided in an appropriations law.  (Sec. 8045) Requires ball and roller bearings purchased using funds provided by this division to be produced by a domestic source. Permits DOD to waive the prohibition if adequate domestic supplies are not available and an acquisition is necessary for national security.  (Sec. 8046) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle (EELV) launch service competitions unless the competitions are open to all certified providers of EELV systems. Requires the award to be made to the provider that offers the best value to the government.  (Sec. 8047) Appropriates funds to DOD for grants to the United Service Organizations and the Red Cross.  (Sec. 8048) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to purchase any supercomputer not manufactured in the United States unless it is unavailable from U.S. manufacturers and is necessary for national security.  (Sec. 8049) Requires the Small Business Innovation Research program and the Small Business Technology Transfer program set-asides to be taken proportionally from all programs, projects, or activities that contribute to the extramural budget.  (Sec. 8050) Prohibits funds in this division from being used for contractor bonuses being paid due to a business restructuring.  (Sec. 8051) Permits the transfer of specified O&amp;M funds to pay military personnel for support and services for eligible organizations and activities outside DOD.  (Sec. 8052) Permits DOD to dispose of negative unliquidated or unexpended balances for expired or closed accounts by charging an obligation to a current account for the same purpose as the expired or closed account.  (Sec. 8053) Permits the National Guard to allow the use of equipment of the National Guard Distance Learning Project by any person or entity on a space-available, reimbursable basis.  (Sec. 8054) Prohibits DOD funds from being used to modify command and control relationships to give Fleet Forces Command operational and administrative control of U.S. Navy forces assigned to the Pacific fleet. Provides that command and control relationships that existed on October 1, 2004, shall remain in effect until a written modification has been proposed to congressional appropriations committees.  Specifies that the proposed modification: (1) may be implemented 30 days after the committees are notified unless an objection is received from the committees, and (2) may not preclude the ability of the commander of the U.S. Pacific Command to meet operational requirements.  (Sec. 8055) Requires specified O&amp;M funds to be used for continued implementation and expansion of the Sexual Assault Special Victims Counsel Program.  (Sec. 8056) Prohibits the use of funds provided in title IV to procure end-items for delivery to military forces for operational training, operational use, or inventory requirements. Includes exceptions and permits a waiver for national security purposes.  (Sec. 8057) Permits DOD to waive limitations on the procurement of defense items from a foreign country if: (1) the limitations would invalidate cooperative programs or reciprocal trade agreements, and (2) the country does not discriminate against the same or similar items procured in the United States. Provides exceptions.  (Sec. 8058) Prohibits funds provided by this division or other DOD appropriations bills from being used for repairs or maintenance for military family housing units.  (Sec. 8059) Requires DOD to submit a report to Congress before obligating specified RDT&amp;E funds appropriated by this division for any new start advanced concept technology demonstration project or joint capability demonstration project. Permits DOD to waive the restriction by certifying to Congress that it is in the national interest.  (Sec. 8060) Requires DOD to continue to provide a classified quarterly report to Congress on matters specified in the classified annex accompanying this division.  (Sec. 8061) Permits a Reserve who is a member of the National Guard serving on full-time duty to support ground-based elements of the National Ballistic Missile Defense System.  (Sec. 8062) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to transfer ammunition held by DOD that has a center-fire cartridge and is designated as ''armor piercing'' to any nongovernmental entity, except for demilitarization purposes.  (Sec. 8063) Permits the Chief of the National Guard Bureau to waive payment for leases of personal property for not more than a year to certain youth, social, charitable, or fraternal nonprofit organizations.  (Sec. 8064) Provides for the transfer of specified Army O&amp;M funds to other activities of the federal government for classified purposes. Permits DOD to enter into and carry out contracts for the acquisition of real property, construction, personal services, and operations related to projects carrying out the purposes of this section.  (Sec. 8065) Prohibits funds from being used to make specified modifications to the budget and appropriations process for the National Intelligence Program.  (Sec. 8066) Provides appropriations to remain available until expended for grants for the construction and furnishing of additional Fisher Houses to meet the needs of military family members confronted with the illness or hospitalization of an eligible military beneficiary.  (Sec. 8067) Provides specified Procurement and RDT&amp;E funds for the Israeli Cooperative Programs. Specifies funding for the Iron Dome defense system for countering short-range rocket threats, the Short Range Ballistic Missile Defense program, and related programs.  (Sec. 8068) Permits specified Shipbuilding and Conversion--Navy funds to remain available through FY2018 to fund prior year shipbuilding cost increases. Requires the funds to be transferred to specified accounts.  (Sec. 8069) Deems funds provided by this division for intelligence activities to be authorized by Congress during FY2018 until the enactment of the Intelligence Authorization Act for FY2018.  (Sec. 8070) Prohibits fund appropriated by this division from being used for a reprogramming of funds that creates or initiates a new program, project, or activity unless it must be undertaken immediately for national security and Congress is notified in advance.  (Sec. 8071) Requires the President's budget to include separate budget justification documents for costs of the Armed Forces' participation in contingency operations for the Military Personnel, O&amp;M, Procurement, and RDT&amp;E accounts.  (Sec. 8072) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for research, development, test, evaluation, procurement, or deployment of nuclear armed interceptors of a missile defense system.  (Sec. 8073) Reduces the total amount appropriated in this division to reflect savings due to favorable foreign exchange rates.  (Sec. 8074) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to reduce or disestablish the operation of the 53rd Weather Reconnaissance Squadron of the Air Force Reserve if the action would reduce the WC-130 Weather Reconnaissance mission below the levels funded in this division. Permits the Squadron to perform other missions in support of national defense requirements during the non-hurricane season.  (Sec. 8075) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for integrating foreign intelligence information unless the information has been lawfully collected and processed during authorized foreign intelligence activities. Requires information pertaining to U.S. persons to be handled in accordance with the Fourth Amendment of the U.S. Constitution as implemented through Executive Order No. 12333 (United States Intelligence Activities).  (Sec. 8076) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to transfer research and development, acquisition, or other program authority related to current tactical unmanned aerial vehicles from the Army. Requires the Army to retain responsibility for and operational control of the MQ-1C Gray Eagle Unmanned Aerial Vehicle.  (Sec. 8077) Prohibits funds appropriated by this division for programs of the Office of the Director of National Intelligence (ODNI) from being obligated beyond the current fiscal year except for research and technology funds, which remain available through FY2019.  (Sec. 8078) Provides for the adjustment of obligations within the Shipbuilding and Conversion--Navy appropriation.  (Sec. 8079) Requires the ODNI to submit a report to Congress establishing the baseline for application of reprogramming and transfer authorities for FY2018. Prohibits funds provided by this division for the National Intelligence Program from being transferred or reprogrammed until the report is submitted unless the action is necessary for an emergency.  (Sec. 8080) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to eliminate, restructure, realign, or make disproportionate personnel reductions at Army Contracting Command--New Jersey sites without notifying Congress in advance.  (Sec. 8081) Rescinds specified unobligated balances from the DOD Acquisition Workforce Development Fund.  (Sec. 8082) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to support any military training or operation that includes child soldiers unless the assistance is permitted by the Child Soldiers Prevention Act of 2008.  (Sec. 8083) Provides specific restrictions on the reprogramming or transfer of funds provided to the National Intelligence Program.  (Sec. 8084) Directs the ODNI to submit annually to Congress a future-years intelligence program reflecting estimated expenditures and proposed appropriations included in the President's budget.  (Sec. 8085) Specifies committees included in \"congressional intelligence committees\" for the purposes of this division.  (Sec. 8086) Permits specified O&amp;M funds provided in title II to be transferred by the military department concerned to its central fund established for Fisher Houses and Suites.  (Sec. 8087) Permits O&amp;M funds to be used for payments and transfers to the Defense Acquisition Workforce Development Fund.  (Sec. 8088) Requires agencies receiving funds in this division to post reports required to be submitted to Congress on the public website of the agency if it serves the national interest. Provides exceptions for national security or proprietary information.  (Sec. 8089) Prohibits the use of funds for federal contracts in excess of $1 million unless the contractor meets specific requirements regarding the resolution of claims under title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, or national origin). Allows DOD to waive the requirements to avoid harm to national security.  (Sec. 8090) Provides specified funds to be transferred to the Joint Department of Defense-Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Facility Demonstration Fund.  (Sec. 8091) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to: (1) provide certain missile defense information to the Russian Federation, subject to an exception for information regarding ballistic missile early warning; or (2) integrate a missile defense system of the Russian Federation or a missile defense system of the People's Republic of China into any missile defense system of the United States.  (Sec. 8092) Permits DOD funds to be used to purchase armored vehicles for the physical security of personnel or force protection and limits the cost per vehicle.  (Sec. 8093) Permits the ODNI to transfer specified funds provided by this division for the National Intelligence Program with the approval of the Office of Management and Budget, subject to certain requirements and restrictions.  (Sec. 8094) Prohibits funds from being used to transfer or release any individual detained at U.S. Naval Station, Guantanamo Bay, Cuba (Guantanamo) who is not a U.S. citizen or member of the Armed Forces into the United States, its territories, or possessions.  (Sec. 8095) Prohibits funding from being used to construct, acquire, or modify any U.S. facility (other than the facility at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba) to house any individual detained at Guantanamo.  (Sec. 8096) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to transfer any individual detained at Guantanamo to a country of origin or other foreign country or entity unless DOD makes certain certifications.  (Sec. 8097) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to violate the Wars Powers Resolution.  (Sec. 8098) Prohibits funds from being used to enter into specified agreements and transactions with Russian arms supplier Rosoboronexport. Permits DOD to waive the restriction if specific conditions are met.  (Sec. 8099) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for the purchase or manufacture of U.S. flags unless they are treated as covered items under Buy American requirements.  (Sec. 8100) Permits funds provided by this division to be used to provide ex gratia payments to local military commanders for damage, personal injury, or death that is incident to combat operations in a foreign country.  (Sec. 8101) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to reduce strategic delivery vehicles and launchers below levels necessary to implement the New Strategic Arms Reduction Treaty (New START), as set forth in a report provided to Congress pursuant to the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2012.  (Sec. 8102) Requires DOD to post grant awards on a public website in a searchable format.  (Sec. 8103) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for the performance of a flight demonstration team at a location outside of the United States if a performance of a flight demonstration team at a location within the United States was canceled during the year due to insufficient funding.  (Sec. 8104) Prohibits the National Security Agency (NSA) from using funds provided by this division to target a U.S. person under specified authorities granted by the Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Act of 1978 (FISA).  (Sec. 8105) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for the Arms Trade Treaty until it is ratified by the Senate.  (Sec. 8106) Prohibits the transfer of administrative responsibilities or budgetary resources of any program, project, or activity financed by this division to another federal agency not financed by this division without an explicit authorization of Congress.  (Sec. 8107) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to initiate or expand support for foreign forces, irregular forces, groups, or individuals supporting U.S. Special Operations Forces activities to combat terrorism unless Congress is notified in advance in accordance with the classified annex of this division.  (Sec. 8108) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for activities in Iraq in contravention of the War Powers Resolution.  (Sec. 8109) Prohibits funds provided by this division for the T-AO Fleet Oiler or the Towing, Salvage, and Rescue Ship programs from being used to award a new contract that provides for the acquisition of certain components unless the components are manufactured in the United States.  (Sec. 8110) Reduces the funds provided by title II this division to the Working Capital Funds to reflect excess cash balances.  (Sec. 8111) Reduces the total amount appropriated by this division to reflect savings due to lower than anticipated fuel prices.  (Sec. 8112) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for Government Travel Charge Card expenses for gaming or for entertainment that includes topless or nude entertainers or participants.  (Sec. 8113) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for a new or additional Base Realignment and Closure (BRAC) round.  (Sec. 8114) Permits specified Navy O&amp;M funds to be used for the National Defense Reserve Fleet and for reimbursements to the Ready Reserve Force, Maritime Administration account of the Department of Transportation for expenses related to the National Defense Reserve Fleet.  (Sec. 8115) Prohibits funds provided by this division for the Joint Surveillance Target Attack Radar System recapitalization program from being used for pre-milestone B activities after March 31, 2018, except for source selection and other activities necessary to enter the engineering and manufacturing development phase.  (Sec. 8116) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to close or realign the U.S. Naval Station, Guantanamo Bay, Cuba.  (Sec. 8117) Permits specified funds provided by this division to be used for activities related to the Zika virus.  (Sec. 8118) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for any computer network that does not block access to pornography websites, with exceptions for criminal investigations, prosecution, or adjudication activities; or for any activity necessary for the national defense, including intelligence activities.  (Sec. 8119) Specifies limitations on the transfer of funds provided by this division for the Global Engagement Center.  (Sec. 8120) Prohibits funds from being transferred from the Defense Acquisition Workforce Development Fund to the Rapid Prototyping Fund or credited to a military department-specific fund established to carry out an acquisition program under the rapid prototyping pathway.  (Sec. 8121) Provides additional funds for the military personnel accounts for the purpose of a military pay raise.  (Sec. 8122) Provides additional O&amp;M funds that are only available to DOD, or for transfer to the Department of Education, to make grants, conclude cooperative agreements, or supplement federal funds to construct, renovate, repair, or expand elementary and secondary public schools on military installations.  (Sec. 8123) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to carry out specified changes to the Joint Travel Regulations of the Department of Defense.  (Sec. 8124) Requires certain DOD programs that provide assisted reproductive services for seriously ill or injured active duty service members to be carried out without time limits on the duration of embryo cryopreservation and storage.  TITLE IX--OVERSEAS CONTINGENCY OPERATIONS/GLOBAL WAR ON TERRORISM  Provides appropriations for FY2018 for Overseas Contingency Operations (OCO)/ the Global War on Terrorism.  Designates the funds provided in this title as for Overseas Contingency Operations/ Global War on Terrorism pursuant to the Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act of 1985. (OCO funds are exempt from discretionary spending limits and other budget enforcement rules.)  Provides appropriations for Active-Duty and Reserve Personnel in the Army, Navy, Marine Corps and Air Force (the military departments), and for National Guard personnel in the Army and Air Force.  Provides appropriations for the Military Personnel--National Defense Restoration Fund.  Provides appropriations for Operation and Maintenance (O&amp;M) for the military departments, other agencies of DOD, the Reserve Components, and the Army and Air National Guard.  Provides appropriations for the O&amp;M--National Defense Restoration Fund.  Provides appropriations for the Afghanistan Security Forces Fund and the Counter-Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant Train and Equip Fund.  Provides appropriations for Procurement by the military departments, other DOD agencies, Reserve Components, and National Guard, including procurement for aircraft, missiles, weapons, tracked combat vehicles, space, and ammunition.  Provides appropriations for: (1) the National Guard and Reserve Equipment Account, and (2) the Procurement-- National Defense Restoration Fund.  Provides appropriations for Research, Development, Test, and Evaluation (RDT&amp;E) for the military departments and other DOD agencies.  Provides appropriations for the RDT&amp;E, National Defense Restoration Fund.  Provides appropriations for the Defense Working Capital Funds.  Provides appropriations for Other DOD Programs, including:  the Defense Health Program,   Drug Interdiction and Counter-Drug Activities,  the Joint Improvised Threat Defeat Fund, and   the Office of the Inspector General.   (Sec. 9001) Specifies that funds made available in this title are in addition to amounts appropriated to DOD for FY2018.  (Sec. 9002) Permits DOD to transfer specified funds between the appropriations in this title if it is in the national interest, OMB approves, and Congress is notified.  (Sec. 9003) Permits supervision, administration, and design costs for a construction project funded with O&amp;M or the Afghanistan Security Forces Fund in direct support of overseas contingency operations in Afghanistan to be obligated when a construction contract is awarded.  (Sec. 9004) Permits DOD to use funds appropriated in this title to purchase motor vehicles for use by military and civilian DOD employees in the U.S. Central Command area of responsibility. Limits the cost of each passenger and armored vehicle.  (Sec. 9005) Permits specified Army O&amp;M funds to be used for the Commander's Emergency Response Program for humanitarian relief and reconstruction assistance in Afghanistan.  (Sec. 9006) Permits DOD O&amp;M funds to be used to provide supplies, services, transportation, including airlift and sealift, and other logistical support to allied forces participating in a combined operation with U.S. and coalition forces supporting military and stability operations in Afghanistan and to counter the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant. Requires DOD to report quarterly to Congress regarding support provided under this section.  (Sec. 9007) Prohibits funds from being used to: (1) establish any military installation or base for providing for the permanent stationing of Armed Forces in Iraq or Afghanistan, or (2) exercise U.S. control over any oil resource of Iraq.  (Sec. 9008) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used in contravention of specified laws or regulations implementing the United Nations Convention Against Torture and Other Cruel, Inhuman, or Degrading Treatment or Punishment.  (Sec. 9009) Prohibits funds provided for the Afghanistan Security Forces Fund from being obligated prior to the approval of a financial and activity plan by the Afghanistan Resources Oversight Council of DOD.  (Sec. 9010) Permits O&amp;M funds provided in this title to be used to purchase items with an investment unit cost of up to $250,000. Permits the purchase of items with an investment cost of up to $500,000 if DOD determines that it is necessary to meet the operational requirements of a Commander of a Combatant Command engaged in contingency operations overseas.  (Sec. 9011) Permits specified funds provided by this division for the Defense Security Cooperation Agency and Defense-Wide Operation and Maintenance to be used to provide assistance to the government of Jordan to support the armed forces of Jordan and to enhance security along its borders.  (Sec. 9012) Prohibits funds provided by this division for the Counter-ISIL Train and Equip Fund from being used to procure or transfer man-portable air defense systems.  (Sec. 9013) Provides additional funding for assistance and sustainment of the military and national security forces of Ukraine.  (Sec. 9014) Permits funds provided by this title to be used for the replacement of funds for items provided to the government of Ukraine from the U.S. inventory.  (Sec. 9015) Prohibits funds provided by this division under section 9013 for Assistance and Sustainment to the Military and National Security Forces of Ukraine from being used to procure or transfer man-portable air defense systems.  (Sec. 9016) Prohibits DOD O&amp;M funds from being used for payments to Pakistan as reimbursement for support provided to U.S. military operations unless DOD certifies to Congress that the government of Pakistan has met specific conditions. Permits DOD to waive the restriction for national security.  (Sec. 9017) Provides additional funding to DOD to improve intelligence, surveillance, and reconnaissance capabilities.  (Sec. 9018) Prohibits the use of funds for Syria in contravention of the War Powers Resolution.  (Sec. 9019) Rescinds specified funds provided by DOD appropriations bills for:    Other Procurement, Air Force;   the Afghanistan Security Forces Fund;   the Counter-ISIL Train and Equip Fund, and   Operation and Maintenance, Defense-Wide, DSCA Coalition Support Fund.   (Sec. 9020) Specifies that amounts designated by this division for Overseas Contingency Operations/Global War on Terrorism are only available if the President subsequently designates the amounts and transmits the designations to Congress.  (Sec. 9021) Requires the President to submit to Congress a report on the U.S. strategy to defeat Al-Qaeda, the Taliban, the Islamic State of Iraq and Syria (ISIS), and their associated forces and co-belligerents. Requires the Secretary of State and the Secretary of Defense to testify at specified congressional hearings regarding the report.  TITLE X--ADDITIONAL GENERAL PROVISIONS  (Sec. 10001) Specifies that, unless this bill expressly provides otherwise, references to \"this Act\" included in this division shall be treated as referring only to the provisions of this division.  (Sec. 10002) Specifies the committee report that applies for the purpose of implementing this division.  (Sec. 10003) Establishes a spending reduction account for the amount by which spending proposed in this division exceeds the subcommittee's allocation under the Congressional Budget Act of 1974. Specifies that the amount is $0.  (Sec. 10004) Prohibits funds provided by this division for the Afghanistan Security Forces Fund from being used to procure uniforms for the Afghan National Army.  (Sec. 10005) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for the closure of a biosafety level 4 laboratory.  (Sec. 10006) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to provide arms, training, or other assistance to the Azov Battalion.  (Sec. 10007) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to purchase heavy water from Iran.  (Sec. 10008) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to plan for, begin, continue, complete, process, or approve a public-private competition under the Office of Management and Budget Circular A-76.  Legislative Branch Appropriations Act, 2018  DIVISION B--LEGISLATIVE BRANCH APPROPRIATIONS ACT, 2018  This division provides FY2018 appropriations for the legislative branch, including the House of Representatives and Joint Items such as: the Joint Economic Committee, the Joint Committee on Taxation (JCT), and the Office of the Attending Physician.  It also provides appropriations for:    the Capitol Police,   the Congressional Budget Office (CBO),   the Architect of the Capitol (AOC),   the Library of Congress (LOC),   the Government Publishing Office (GPO),   the Government Accountability Office (GAO), and   the Open World Leadership Center.   Pursuant to a longstanding practice under which each chamber of Congress determines its own requirements, the House bill does not include funds for the Senate.  TITLE I--LEGISLATIVE BRANCH  Provides appropriations to the House of Representatives for:    Salaries and Expenses;   House Leadership Offices;   Members' Representational Allowances, including Members' Clerk Hire, Official Expenses of Members, and Official Mail;   Committee Employees;   Salaries, Officers, and Employees; and   Allowances and Expenses.   (In this division, the term \"Member of the House of Representatives\" also includes a Delegate or Resident Commissioner to the Congress.)  (Sec. 101) Requires amounts remaining in Members' Representational Allowances after all payments are made for FY2018 to be used for deficit or debt reduction.  (Sec. 102) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to deliver a printed copy of a bill, joint resolution, or resolution to the office of a Member of the House of Representatives unless the Member requests a copy.  (Sec. 103) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to deliver a printed copy of the Congressional Record to the office of a Member of the House of Representatives.  (Sec. 104) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to make payments from any Members' Representational Allowance to lease a vehicle, excluding mobile district offices, at a rate that exceeds $1,000 for the vehicle in any month.  (Sec. 105) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to provide an aggregate number of more than 50 printed copies of any edition of the U.S. Code to all offices of the House of Representatives.  (Sec. 106) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to deliver a printed copy of the report of disbursements for the operations of the House of Representatives to the office of a Member of the House of Representatives.  (Sec. 107) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to deliver to the office of a Member of the House Representatives a printed copy of the Daily Calendar of the House of Representatives prepared by the Clerk of the House of Representatives.  (Sec. 108) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to deliver a printed copy of the Congressional Pictorial Directory to the office of a Member of the House of Representatives.  (Sec. 109) Amends the Legislative Branch Appropriations Act, 2005 to include in the House Services Revolving Fund service fees that are collected from vendors of the Master Web Services Agreement or the Technology Services Contract for failing to abide by and maintain House of Representatives security policies.  (Sec. 110) Prohibits cost of living adjustments for Members of Congress during FY2018.  Provides appropriations for Joint Items, including:    the Joint Economic Committee,   the Joint Committee on Taxation,   the Office of the Attending Physician, and   the Office of Congressional Accessibility Services.   (Sec. 1001) Establishes senior level Joint Committee on Taxation positions to meet critical scientific, technical, professional, or executive needs and limits the compensation for the positions to level II of the Executive Schedule.  Provides appropriations for:    the Capitol Police,   the Office of Compliance, and   the Congressional Budget Office (CBO).   Provides appropriations to the Architect of the Capitol (AOC) for:    Capital Construction and Operations;   the Capitol Building;   the Capitol Grounds;   the House Office Buildings;   the Capitol Power Plant;   the Library Buildings and Grounds;   the Capitol Police Buildings, Grounds and Security;   the Botanic Garden; and  the Capitol Visitor Center.   (Sec. 1101) Prohibits funds provided by this division for the AOC from being used to make incentive or award payments to contractors for work that is behind schedule or over budget, unless the deviations are due to unforeseeable events, government-driven scope changes, or are insignificant within the overall scope of the project or program.  (Sec. 1102) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for scrims (coverings for buildings that are being renovated) containing photographs of building facades during restoration or construction projects performed by the AOC.  Provides appropriations to the Library of Congress (LOC) for:    Salaries and Expenses,   the Copyright Office,   the Congressional Research Service, and   Books for the Blind and Physically Handicapped.   (Sec. 1201) Limits the FY2018 obligational authority of the LOC for reimbursable and revolving fund activities funded from sources other than appropriations.  Provides appropriations to the Government Publishing Office for:    Congressional Publishing,   Public Information Programs of the Superintendent of Documents, and   the Government Publishing Office Business Operations Revolving Fund.   Provides appropriations to:    the Government Accountability Office,   the Open World Leadership Center Trust Fund, and   the John C. Stennis Center for Public Service Training and Development.   TITLE II--GENERAL PROVISIONS  (Sec. 201) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for the maintenance or care of private vehicles, except for emergency assistance and cleaning.  (Sec. 202) Prohibits funds provided by this division from remaining available for obligation beyond FY2018 unless expressly provided in this division.  (Sec. 203) Provides that: (1) rates of compensation or designations of offices or positions included in this division that are either not established by the Legislative Pay Act of 1929 or are contrary to that Act are considered permanent law, and (2) provisions in this division for official congressional expenses and clerk hire for Senators and Members of the House of Representatives are permanent law.  (Sec. 204) Limits contracts for certain consulting services to those where expenditures are a matter of public record and available for public inspection.  (Sec. 205) Permits legislative branch entities participating in the Legislative Branch Financial Managers Council to use funds provided for administrative expenses to pay a share of the cost of the council if the total cost shared among all participating entities does not exceed $2,000.  (Sec. 206) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being transferred to any department, agency, or instrumentality of the U.S. government unless the transfer is pursuant to authority provided by an appropriations Act.  (Sec. 207) Prohibits the AOC from using funds provided by this division to eliminate or restrict guided Capitol tours led by congressional employees and interns, subject to an exception permitting tours to be suspended for security or related reasons.  (Sec. 208) Specifies that, unless this bill expressly provides otherwise, references to \"this Act\" included in this division shall be treated as referring only to the provisions of this division.  (Sec. 209) Specifies the committee report that applies for the purpose of implementing this division.  (Sec. 210) Establishes a spending reduction account for the amount by which spending proposed in this division exceeds the subcommittee's allocation under the Congressional Budget Act of 1974. Specifies that the amount is $0.  (Sec. 211) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to deliver a printed copy of the Federal Register to the office of a Member of the House of Representatives unless a printed copy is requested by the Member.  Military Construction, Veterans Affairs, and Related Agencies Appropriations Act, 2018  DIVISION C--MILITARY CONSTRUCTION, VETERANS AFFAIRS, AND RELATED AGENCIES APPROPRIATIONS ACT, 2018  This division provides FY2018 appropriations to the Department of Defense (DOD) for military construction, military family housing, the U.S. share of the North Atlantic Treaty Organization Security Investment Program, and base closures and realignments.  The division also provides appropriations to the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA) for veterans benefit and health care programs, Departmental Administration, and the National Cemetery Administration.  Related agencies and programs funded in the division include the U.S. Court of Appeals for Veterans Claims; the Armed Forces Retirement Home; and the Cemeterial Expenses of the Army, including Arlington National Cemetery.  The division also includes Army, Air Force, Navy and Marine Corps, Air Force, and Defense-Wide military construction funds which are designated as Overseas Contingency Operations (OCO) funds and are not subject to discretionary spending limits.  TITLE I--DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE  Provides appropriations to the Department of Defense (DOD) for Military Construction for:    the Army;   the Navy and Marine Corps;   the Air Force;   Defense-Wide agencies and activities (other than military departments);   the Army and Air National Guard; and   the Army, Navy, and Air Force Reserves.   Provides appropriations to DOD for the North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) Security Investment Program.  Provides appropriations to DOD for Construction and Operation and Maintenance of Family Housing for:    the Army,   the Navy and Marine Corps,   the Air Force, and   Defense-Wide agencies and activities (other than military departments).   Provides appropriations for the DOD Family Housing Improvement Fund and the DOD Military Unaccompanied Housing Improvement Fund.  Provides appropriations for the DOD Base Closure Account.  (Sec. 101) Prohibits funds provided by this title from being used for payments exceeding $25,000 for construction in the United States under a cost-plus-a-fixed-fee contract without a specific DOD approval in writing. Includes an exception for work that is to be performed in Alaska.  (Sec. 102) Permits construction funds provided by this title to be used for hiring passenger motor vehicles.  (Sec. 103) Permits construction funds provided by this title to be used for advances to the Federal Highway Administration for the construction of access roads DOD has certified as important to national defense.  (Sec. 104) Prohibits funds provided by this title from being used to begin construction of new bases in the United States without a specific appropriation.  (Sec. 105) Prohibits funds provided by this title from being used to purchase land or land easements in excess of 100% of the value as determined by the Army Corps of Engineers or the Naval Facilities Engineering Command. Includes exceptions for: (1) determinations of value by a federal court, (2) purchases negotiated by the Attorney General or a designee, (3) values less than $25,000, and (4) DOD determinations that the purchase is in the public interest.  (Sec. 106) Prohibits funds provided by this title from being used to acquire land, provide for site preparation, or install utilities for family housing, except housing for which appropriations have been provided.  (Sec. 107) Prohibits funds provided by this title for minor construction from being used to transfer or relocate any activity from one base or installation to another without notifying Congress in advance.  (Sec. 108) Prohibits funds provided by this title from being used to procure steel for construction unless American producers, fabricators, and manufacturers have been allowed to compete for the procurement.  (Sec. 109) Prohibits funds provided to DOD for military construction or family housing during the current fiscal year from being used to pay real property taxes in any foreign nation.  (Sec. 110) Prohibits funds provided by this title from being used to initiate a new installation overseas without notifying Congress in advance.  (Sec. 111) Prohibits funds provided by this title from being used for architect and engineer contracts estimated to exceed $500,000 for projects in Japan, NATO member countries, or countries bordering the Arabian Gulf unless the contracts are awarded to U.S. firms or joint ventures with U.S. firms and host nation firms.  (Sec. 112) Prohibits funds provided by this title for military construction in U.S. territories and possessions in the Pacific and on Kwajalein Atoll, or in countries bordering the Arabian Gulf from being used to award a contract over $1 million to a foreign contractor. Includes exceptions.  (Sec. 113) Requires DOD to notify Congress in advance of military exercises if construction costs are expected to exceed $100,000.  (Sec. 114) Permits funds appropriated to DOD for construction in prior years to be used for construction projects authorized during the current session of Congress.  (Sec. 115) Permits expired or lapsed funds to be used to pay for supervision, inspection, overhead, engineering, and design costs for military construction or family housing projects being completed with lapsed or expired funds.  (Sec. 116) Permits funds provided for the construction of military projects to be available for five years if: (1) the funds are obligated from funds available for military construction, and (2) do not exceed the amount appropriated or permitted by law.  (Sec. 117) Permits the following transfers if Congress is notified and specified conditions are met:    to the DOD Family Housing Improvement Fund from appropriations for construction in Family Housing accounts, and   to the DOD Military Unaccompanied Housing Improvement Fund from appropriations for construction of military unaccompanied housing in Military Construction accounts.   (Sec. 118) Permits the transfer of funds from the DOD Base Closure Account to the fund established to pay expenses associated with the Homeowners Assistance Program under the Demonstration Cities and Metropolitan Development Act of 1966.  (Sec. 119) Provides that funds for operation and maintenance of family housing in this title shall be the only source of funds for repair and maintenance of all family housing units, including general or flag officer quarters. Sets forth limitations and requirements for expenditures for maintenance and repair of general or flag officer quarters.  (Sec. 120) Appropriates funds contained in the Ford Island Improvement Account to remain available until expended or transferred.  (Sec. 121) Permits the transfer of unobligated balances of expired military construction and family housing funds into the Foreign Currency Fluctuations--Construction--Defense account.  (Sec. 122) Prohibits the Army from using funds provided by this division to relocate a unit that: (1) performs a required testing mission or function not performed by any other unit, and (2) is located at a military installation where the total number of Army civilian employees and contractor personnel exceeds 10% of the regular and reserve Army personnel. Includes an exception if the Army notifies Congress of the relocation's compliance with Army Regulation 5-10 concerning stationing actions.  (Sec. 123) Permits funds provided to an account in this title to be transferred among projects and activities within the account subject to specified DOD reprogramming guidelines for military and family housing construction.  (Sec. 124) Prohibits DOD military construction funds provided in this title from being used for the planning, design, and construction of projects at Arlington National Cemetery.  (Sec. 125) Provides specified additional funds to remain available through FY2022 for unfunded military construction priorities.  (Sec. 126) Rescinds specified unobligated balances from Military Construction, Family Housing Construction, and the North Atlantic Treaty Organization Security Investment Program accounts.  (Sec. 127) Defines \"congressional defense committees\" to include the House and Senate Armed Services Committees and Appropriations Subcommittees on Military Construction and Veterans Affairs.  (Sec. 128) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for the closure or realignment of the U.S. Naval Station, Guantanamo Bay, Cuba.  TITLE II--DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS  Provides appropriations to the Veterans Benefits Administration (VBA) for:    Compensation and Pensions,   Readjustment Benefits,   Veterans Insurance and Indemnities,   the Veterans Housing Benefit Program Fund,   the Vocational Rehabilitation Loans Program Account,   the Native American Veteran Housing Loan Program Account, and   General Operating Expenses.   Provides appropriations to the Veterans Health Administration (VHA) for:    Medical Services,   Medical Community Care,   Medical Support and Compliance,   Medical Facilities, and   Medical and Prosthetic Research.   Provides appropriations to the National Cemetery Administration.  Provides appropriations to the VA for Departmental Administration, including:    General Administration,   the Board of Veterans Appeals,   Information Technology Systems,   the Office of Inspector General,   Construction--Major Projects,   Construction--Minor Projects,   Grants for Construction of State Extended Care Facilities, and   Grants for Construction of Veterans Cemeteries.   Prohibits more than 25% of the funds provided for information technology systems development, modernization, and enhancement from being used for development of an electronic health record until the VA submits a report to Congress that includes specified details regarding the development of an electronic health records system.  Withholds specified VHA construction funds until the VA:    enters an agreement with a non-VA federal entity to serve as the design and/ or construction agent for any VHA major construction project that exceeds $100 million, and   certifies that an agreement is executed to minimize or prevent subsequent major construction project cost overruns.   (Sec. 201) Specifies transfer authorities and requirements for the VBA.  (Sec. 202) Specifies transfer authorities and requirements for the VHA.  (Sec. 203) Permits appropriations for salaries and expenses to be used for employment of temporary or intermittent experts and consultants, hire of passenger vehicles, lease of a facility or land or both, and uniforms.  (Sec. 204) Prohibits appropriations in this title other than Construction--Major Projects and Construction--Minor Projects from being used for land acquisition or construction of any new hospital or home.  (Sec. 205) Requires the VA to be reimbursed for medical services it provides to any person not defined as a beneficiary under specified laws.  (Sec. 206) Permits appropriations provided by this title for Compensation and Pensions, Readjustment Benefits, and Veterans Insurance and Indemnities to be used for payment of accrued obligations for the accounts recorded in the last quarter of FY2017.  (Sec. 207) Permits appropriations provided by this title to be used to pay specified prior year obligations. Requires obligations from trust fund accounts to be paid only from the Compensation and Pensions account.  (Sec. 208) Requires the VA to use surplus earnings from the National Service Life Insurance Fund, the Veterans' Special Life Insurance Fund, and the United States Government Life Insurance Fund to reimburse the General Operating Expenses--Veterans Benefits Administration and Information Technology Systems accounts for the costs to administer the insurance programs during FY2018.  (Sec. 209) Permits amounts deducted from enhanced-use lease proceeds for reimbursement of expenses from a prior year to be obligated in the year in which the proceeds are received.  (Sec. 210) Permits funds provided by this title for salaries and other administrative expenses to be used to reimburse the following offices, subject to specified limits:    the Office of Resolution Management,   the Office of Employment Discrimination Complaint Adjudication,   the Office of Accountability Review,   the Central Whistleblower Office,   the Office of Diversity and Inclusion, and   the Office of the Executive Director of Accountability and Whistleblower Protection.   (Sec. 211) Requires the VA to collect third-party reimbursement information prior to providing hospital care, nursing home care, or medical services for a non-service connected disability. Permits the VA to recover reasonable charges for care from anyone who has not provided the required disclosures.  (Sec. 212) Permits enhanced-use leasing revenues to be deposited into the Construction--Major Projects and Construction--Minor Projects accounts to be used for construction, alterations, and improvements of VA medical facilities.  (Sec. 213) Permits funds provided for Medical Services to be used for: (1) furnishing recreational facilities, supplies, and equipment; and (2) funeral and burial expenses.  (Sec. 214) Permits funds deposited in the Medical Care Collections Fund to be transferred to the Medical Services and Medical Community Care accounts and remain available until expended for the purposes of those accounts.  (Sec. 215) Permits the VA to enter into agreements with Federally Qualified Health Centers in Alaska and Indian tribes and tribal organizations which are party to the Alaska Native Health Compact with the Indian Health Service to provide healthcare, including behavioral health and dental care, to veterans in rural Alaska. Defines \"rural Alaska\" as those lands which are not within the boundaries of the municipality of Anchorage or the Fairbanks North Star Borough.  (Sec. 216) Permits funds deposited into the Department of Veterans Affairs Capital Asset Fund to be transferred to the Construction--Major Projects and Construction--Minor Projects accounts to remain available until expended.  (Sec. 217) Requires the VA to report quarterly to Congress on the financial status of the VA.  (Sec. 218) Permits specified FY2018 VA funds to be transferred to or from the Information Technology Systems account if approved by Congress.  (Sec. 219) Permits specified FY2018 VA funds provided for medical accounts, Construction--Minor Projects, and Information Technology Systems to be transferred to the Joint Department of Defense-Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Facility Demonstration Fund and used for the operation of combined federal medical facilities.  (Sec. 220) Permits specified FY2019 VA advance funding provided for medical accounts to be transferred to the Joint Department of Defense-Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Facility Demonstration Fund and used for the operation of combined federal medical facilities.  (Sec. 221) Permits transfers from the Medical Care Collections Fund to the Joint Department of Defense-Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Facility Demonstration Fund for the operation of combined federal medical facilities.  (Sec. 222) Requires specified funds from the Medical Services, Medical Support and Compliance, and Medical Facilities accounts to be transferred to the DOD-VA Health Care Sharing Incentive Fund to remain available until expended.  (Sec. 223) Prohibits the VA from using funds to replace the current system that the Veterans Integrated Service Networks use to select and contract for diabetes monitoring supplies and equipment.  (Sec. 224) Directs the VA to notify Congress of all bid savings in major construction projects that total at least $5 million or 5% of the programmed amount of the project, whichever is less.  (Sec. 225) Prohibits the scope of work for a project included in Construction--Major Projects from being increased above the original budget request without congressional approval.  (Sec. 226) Requires the VA to submit to Congress a quarterly report containing performance measures and data from each VBA regional office.  (Sec. 227) Provides specified funds from the Medical Services and Medical Support and Compliance accounts to develop an electronic health record. Limits the funds that may be spent for this purpose until the VA submits to Congress a specified report regarding activities to develop the Military Health System Genesis electronic health record.  (Sec. 228) Directs the VA to notify Congress before organizational changes that result in the transfer of 25 or more full-time equivalent staff from one organizational unit to another.  (Sec. 229) Requires the VA to report to Congress quarterly regarding any single national outreach and awareness marketing campaign exceeding $2 million.  (Sec. 230) Permits the VA to transfer funds to the Medical Services account if the transfer is necessary to address the needs of the VHA, meets specified requirements, and is approved by the Office of Management and Budget and Congress.  (Sec. 231) Permits FY2018 funds provided for the Board of Veterans Appeals and General Operating Expenses--Veterans Benefits Administration to be transferred between those accounts if Congress approves the transfer.  (Sec. 232) Prohibits the VA from reprogramming more than $5 million in funds among major construction projects or programs without congressional approval.  (Sec. 233) Rescinds specified unobligated balances from the VA Medical Services, Medical Support and Compliance, and Medical Facilities accounts.  (Sec. 234) Rescinds specified unobligated balances of funds provided to the VA.  (Sec. 235) Requires the VA to ensure that the toll-free suicide hotline authorized under current law: (1) provides individuals who contact the hotline with immediate assistance from a trained professional, and (2) adheres to all requirements of the American Association of Suicidology.  Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to enforce or otherwise carry out any executive action that prohibits the VA from appointing an individual to occupy a vacant civil service position, or establishing a new civil service position, with respect to the hotline.  (Sec. 236) Prohibits funds from being used to close or diminish services at certain VA medical facilities until the VA submits to Congress a national realignment strategy.  (Sec. 237) Permits the VA to use a passenger carrier to transport employees between a parking facility and the VA medical facility where the employee works.  (Sec. 238) Requires the VA to use the breast cancer screening guidelines issued on May 10, 2017, by the Veterans Health Administration National Center for Health Promotion and Disease Prevention.  (Sec. 239) Permits VA Medical Services funds to be used to provide: (1) fertility counseling and treatment using assisted reproductive technology to a covered veteran or the spouse of a covered veteran, or (2) adoption reimbursement to a covered veteran. Defines a \"covered veteran\" as a veteran who has a service-connected disability that results in the inability of the veteran to procreate without the use of fertility treatment.  TITLE III--RELATED AGENCIES  Provides appropriations for related agencies, including:    the American Battle Monuments Commission;   the U.S. Court of Appeals for Veterans Claims;   Cemeterial Expenses of the Army, including Arlington National Cemetery and Soldiers' and Airmen's Home National Cemetery; and   the Armed Forces Retirement Home.   (Sec. 301) Permits funds for Cemeterial Expenses--Army to be provided to Arlington County, Virginia, to relocate a federally owned water main at Arlington National Cemetery to make additional land available for ground burials.  (Sec. 302) Permits funds from concessions at Army National Military Cemeteries to be used to support activities at the cemeteries.  TITLE IV--OVERSEAS CONTINGENCY OPERATIONS  Provide appropriations to DOD for Overseas Contingency Operations Military Construction projects for the:    Army,   Navy and Marine Corps,   Air Force, and   Defense-Wide agencies and activities.   Designates the amounts provided in this title as for Overseas Contingency Operations/ Global War on Terrorism pursuant to the Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act of 1985.  (Sec. 401) Specifies that funds designated in this division by Congress for Overseas Contingency Operations/Global War on Terrorism are only available if the President subsequently designates the amounts and transmits the designations to Congress.  TITLE V--GENERAL PROVISIONS  (Sec. 501) Prohibits the obligation of funds in this division beyond the current fiscal year unless expressly permitted in this division.  (Sec. 502) Prohibits the use of funds provided by this division for programs, projects, or activities not in compliance with federal laws related to risk assessment, the protection of private property rights, or unfunded mandates.  (Sec. 503) Encourages all departments and agencies funded in this division to expand their use of \"E-Commerce\" technologies and procedures.  (Sec. 504) Specifies the congressional committees that are to receive all reports and notifications required by this division.  (Sec. 505) Prohibits the transfer of funds to any part of the U.S. government without authority provided by an appropriations law.  (Sec. 506) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for a project or program named for an individual serving as a Member, Delegate, or Resident Commissioner of the U.S. House of Representatives.  (Sec. 507) Requires agencies to post reports submitted to Congress on the public website of the agency. Includes exceptions for national security and confidential or proprietary information.  (Sec. 508) Prohibits the use of funds provided by this division for a computer network unless pornography is blocked, with the exception of law enforcement, prosecution, or adjudication activities.  (Sec. 509) Prohibits the use of funds provided by this division for first-class travel by an employee of the executive branch.  (Sec. 510) Prohibits the use of funds provided by this division for any contract where the contractor has not complied with E-Verify requirements for verification of eligibility for employment.  (Sec. 511) Prohibits DOD or the VA from using funds provided by this division to purchase or lease a new vehicle except in accordance with Presidential Memorandum--Federal Fleet Performance, dated May 24, 2011.  (Sec. 512) Prohibits the use of funds provided by this division for the renovation, expansion, or construction of any facility in the United States to house any individual detained at the U.S. Naval Station at Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, for the purposes of detention or imprisonment in the custody or under the control of DOD. Includes an exception for modification to the facility at Guantanamo Bay.  (Sec. 513) Specifies that, unless this bill expressly provides otherwise, references to \"this Act\" included in this division shall be treated as referring only to the provisions of this division.  (Sec. 514) Specifies the committee report that applies for the purpose of implementing this division.  (Sec. 515) Establishes a spending reduction account for the amount by which spending proposed in this division exceeds the subcommittee's allocation under the Congressional Budget Act of 1974. Specifies that the amount is $0.  (Sec. 516) Reduces the funding provided by this division for Department of Veterans Affairs--Departmental Administration--Information Technology Services (and the amount specified for operations and maintenance) and increases the funds provided by this division for Veterans Health Administration--Medical Services.  (Sec. 517) Prohibits the VA from using funds provided by this division in contravention of requirements for training and outreach programs for homeless veterans.  (Sec. 518) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to charge a veteran a fee for a veterans identification card if the veteran uses a specified form to apply for the card and indicates on the form that the veteran is homeless.  (Sec. 519) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for a new or additional Base Realignment and Closure (BRAC) round.  (Sec. 520) Prohibits the VA from using funds provided by this division to purchase, breed, transport, house, feed, maintain, dispose of, or experiment on dogs as part of any study assigned to certain pain categories defined by the Department of Agriculture. Includes an exception for training programs or studies of service dogs.  Energy and Water Development and Related Agencies Appropriations Act, 2018  DIVISION D--ENERGY AND WATER DEVELOPMENT AND RELATED AGENCIES APPROPRIATIONS ACT, 2018  This division provides FY2018 appropriations for:    the civil works projects of the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers;   the Department of the Interior's Bureau of Reclamation and Central Utah Project;   the Department of Energy (DOE); and   several independent agencies, including the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.   TITLE I--CORPS OF ENGINEERS--CIVIL  Provides appropriations to the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers for authorized civil functions pertaining to rivers and harbors, flood and storm damage reduction, shore protection, aquatic ecosystem restoration, and related efforts.  Provides appropriations to the Corps of Engineers for:    Investigations;  Construction;   Mississippi River and Tributaries, including flood damage reduction projects in the Mississippi River alluvial valley below Cape Girardeau, Missouri;   Operation and Maintenance;  the Regulatory Program pertaining to navigable waters and wetlands;   the Formerly Utilized Sites Remedial Action Program for clean-up of early atomic energy program contamination;   Flood Control and Coastal Emergencies, including hurricanes, floods, and other natural disasters;   Expenses, necessary for the supervision and general administration of the civil works program; and   the Office of the Assistant Secretary of the Army for Civil Works.   (Sec. 101) Prohibits the reprogramming of funds provided by this title except in specified circumstances.  (Sec. 102) Prohibits funds provided by this title from being used for a contract that commits funds beyond the amounts appropriated for that program, project, or activity that remain unobligated. Includes exception for funds made available through reprogramming.  (Sec. 103) Permits the Corps of Engineers to transfer to the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service up to $5.4 million in Operation and Maintenance funds to mitigate for fisheries lost due to Corps of Engineers projects.  (Sec. 104) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for an open lake placement of dredged material originating from Lake Erie or its tributaries unless it is approved under a state water quality certification. Requires the Corps to continue upland placement of the dredged material until an open lake placement for dredged materials is approved under a state water quality certification.  (Sec. 105) Requires acquisitions funded by this title to comply with regulations that prohibit the Department of Defense from purchasing a certain anchor and mooring chain unless it is procured from a U.S. manufacturer.  (Sec. 106) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for a water supply reallocation study under the Wolf Creek Dam, Lake Cumberland, Kentucky, project authorized under the Act of July 24, 1946.  (Sec. 107) Prohibits funds made available by this division from being used to require a permit for the discharge of dredged or fill material under Federal Water Pollution Control Act (commonly known as the Clean Water Act) for specified agricultural activities.  (Sec. 108) Authorizes the Environmental Protection Agency and the Army Corps of Engineers to withdraw the Waters of the United States rule without regard to any provision of statute or regulation that establishes a requirement for withdrawal. (This provision applies to the final rule issued by the two agencies on June 29, 2015, and titled \"Clean Water Rule: Definition of 'Waters of the United States.'\" The rule revised regulations defining the scope of waters protected and regulated under the Clean Water Act.)  (Sec. 109) Permits individuals to possess firearms at Corps of Engineers water resources development projects if: (1) the individual is not otherwise prohibited by law from possessing the firearm, and (2) the possession of the firearm complies with the law of the state in which the project is located. (The Corps of Engineers currently prohibits private individuals from possessing firearms and other weapons at the projects unless the weapons are being used for hunting, at authorized shooting ranges, or with written permission of the Corps District Commander.)  TITLE II--DEPARTMENT OF THE INTERIOR  Provides appropriations to the Department of the Interior for the Central Utah Project.  Provides appropriations to the Bureau of Reclamation for:    Water and Related Resources,   the Central Valley Project Restoration Fund,   California Bay-Delta Restoration, and   Policy and Administration.   Permits appropriations to the Bureau of Reclamation to be used for purchasing replacements for up to five passenger motor vehicles.  (Sec. 201) Specifies the circumstances in which Reclamation may reprogram or transfer funds provided by this title.  (Sec. 202) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to determine the final point of discharge for the interceptor drain for the San Luis Unit until Interior and California develop a plan to minimize any detrimental effect of the San Luis drainage waters. Requires the plan to conform to California water quality standards as approved by the Environmental Protection Agency.  Directs Interior to classify the costs of the Kesterson Reservoir Cleanup Program and the San Joaquin Valley Drainage Program as either reimbursable or nonreimbursable and collected until fully repaid pursuant to specified alternative repayment plans.  Requires future federal obligations of funds regarding drainage service or drainage studies for the San Luis Unit to be fully reimbursable by San Luis Unit beneficiaries of the service or studies.  (Sec. 203) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to implement the San Joaquin River Restoration Settlement Agreement.  TITLE III--DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY  Provides appropriations to the Department of Energy (DOE) for Energy Programs, including:    Energy Efficiency and Renewable Energy,   Electricity Delivery and Energy Reliability,   Nuclear Energy,   Fossil Energy Research and Development,   Naval Petroleum and Oil Shale Reserves,   the Strategic Petroleum Reserve,   the Northeast Home Heating Oil Reserve,   the Energy Information Administration,   Non-Defense Environmental Cleanup,   the Uranium Enrichment Decontamination and Decommissioning Fund,   Science,   Nuclear Waste Disposal,   the Title 17 Innovative Technology Loan Guarantee Loan Program,   the Advanced Technology Vehicles Manufacturing Loan Program,   the Tribal Energy Loan Guarantee Program,   Departmental Administration, and   the Office of the Inspector General.   Provides appropriations for the Atomic Energy Defense Activities of the National Nuclear Security Administration (NNSA), including:    Weapons Activities,   Defense Nuclear Nonproliferation,   Naval Reactors, and   Federal Salaries and Expenses.   Provides appropriations for Environmental and Other Defense Activities, including:    Defense Environmental Cleanup,   Other Defense Activities, and   Defense Nuclear Waste Disposal.   Provides appropriations for the Power Marketing Administrations, including:    the Bonneville Power Administration Fund;   Southeastern Power Administration Operation and Maintenance;   Southwestern Power Administration Operation and Maintenance;   Western Area Power Administration Operation and Maintenance, Construction, and Rehabilitation; and   the Falcon and Amistad Operating and Maintenance Fund.   Provides appropriations for the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.  (Sec. 301) Prohibits funds provided by this title from be used for programs, projects, or activities that have not been funded by Congress.  Prohibits specified grants, contracts, allocations, and agreements unless Congress is notified in advance.  Prohibits funds from being used for certain multiyear Department of Energy--Energy Programs activities unless specified conditions are met and Congress is notified.  Establishes requirements and restrictions for the reprogramming of funds provided in this title.  Permits unexpended balances of prior appropriations provided for activities in this division to be transferred and merged with appropriations accounts established in this division.  (Sec. 302) Deems funds appropriated by this division for intelligence activities to be specifically authorized by Congress during FY2018 until the enactment of the Intelligence Authorization Act for FY2018.  (Sec. 303) Prohibits funds provided by this title from being used to construct specified high-hazard nuclear facilities unless independent oversight is conducted by the Office of Independent Enterprise Assessments to ensure compliance with nuclear safety requirements.  (Sec. 304) Prohibits funds provided by this title from being used to approve certain critical decisions for construction projects exceeding $100 million until a separate independent cost estimate has been developed.  (Sec. 305) Prohibits Defense Nuclear Nonproliferation funds from being used for contracts with or agreements for federal assistance to the Russian Federation. Permits DOE to waive the prohibition if the activity is in the national security interests of the United States and a report justifying the waiver is submitted to Congress.  (Sec. 306) Authorizes DOE to draw down and sell refined petroleum product from the Strategic Petroleum Reserve (SPR) upon a determination by the President in this fiscal year that:    a regional supply shortage of refined petroleum product of significant scope and duration exists,   a severe increase in the price of refined petroleum product will likely result from the shortage, and   a draw down and sale of refined petroleum product would assist directly and significantly in reducing the adverse impact of the shortage.   Specifies that the proceeds from the sale must be deposited into the SPR Petroleum Account and remain available for obligation without fiscal year limitation, consistent with the Energy Policy and Conservation Act.  (Sec. 307) Requires DOE to drawdown and sell up to $8.4 million of crude oil from the SPR during this fiscal year (in addition to sales authorized under the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015). Requires the proceeds from the sale to be deposited into the SPR Petroleum Account to remain available until expended for: (1) the costs of crude oil sales authorized under the Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015, and (2) specified provisions of the 21st Century Cures Act.  Prohibits DOE from drawing down and selling crude oil under this section in amounts that would limit the authority to sell petroleum products under the Energy Policy and Conservation Act in order to prevent or reduce adverse impacts of severe domestic energy supply interruptions.  (Sec. 308) Prohibits DOE from establishing any new regional petroleum product reserve unless funding is explicitly requested in advance and approved by Congress in an appropriations Act.  (Sec. 309) Limits the amount of funds provided by this title that may be transferred to the working capital fund established under the Department of Energy Organization Act.  TITLE IV--INDEPENDENT AGENCIES  Provides appropriations for independent agencies, including:    the Appalachian Regional Commission,   the Defense Nuclear Facilities Safety Board,   the Delta Regional Authority,   the Denali Commission,   the Northern Border Regional Commission,   the Southeast Crescent Regional Commission,   the Nuclear Regulatory Commission (NRC), and   the Nuclear Waste Technical Review Board.   (Sec. 401) Requires the NRC to comply with specified internal procedures when responding to congressional requests for information.  (Sec. 402) Specifies the circumstances in which funds provided by this title may be reprogrammed.  TITLE V--GENERAL PROVISIONS  (Sec. 501) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to influence congressional action on any legislation or appropriation matters pending before Congress.  (Sec. 502) Specifies restrictions and requirements for transfers of funds into and out of accounts funded by this division.  (Sec. 503) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to contravene Executive Order No. 12898 of February 11, 1994 (Federal Actions to Address Environmental Justice in Minority Populations and Low-Income Populations).  (Sec. 504) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for a computer network that does not block pornography, except for law enforcement purposes.  (Sec. 505) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for further implementation of the coastal and marine spatial planning and ecosystem-based management components of the National Ocean Policy developed under Executive Order 13547 (Stewardship of the Ocean, Our Coasts, and the Great Lakes).  (Sec. 506) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for the removal of any federally owned or operated dam.  (Sec. 507) Prohibits the use of funds provided by this division: (1) to conduct closure of adjudicatory functions, technical review, or support activities associated with the Yucca Mountain geologic repository license application; or (2) for actions that irrevocably remove the possibility that Yucca Mountain may be a repository option in the future.  (Sec. 508) Specifies that, unless this bill expressly provides otherwise, references to \"this Act\" included in this division shall be treated as referring only to the provisions of this division.  (Sec. 509) Specifies the committee report that applies for the purpose of implementing this division.  (Sec. 510) Establishes a spending reduction account for the amount by which spending proposed in this division exceeds the subcommittee's allocation under the Congressional Budget Act of 1974. Specifies that the amount is $0.  (Sec. 511) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used for the Cape Wind Energy Project on the Outer Continental Shelf off Massachusetts, Nantucket Sound.  (Sec. 512) Provides additional funding to the DOE Electricity Delivery and Energy Reliability account for certain energy storage systems demonstrations authorized by the Energy Independence and Security Act of 2007. Reduces funding for DOE's Departmental Administration account.  (Sec. 513) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used in contravention of specified provisions of the Water Resources Reform and Development Act of 2014 and the Water Resources Development Act of 1986 that authorize appropriations for the operation and maintenance of certain harbor projects. (Sec. 514) Prohibits funds provided by title I (Corps of Engineers--Civil) of this division from being used to require an economic re-evaluation of any project authorized under title VIII of the Water Resources Development Act of 2007.  (Sec. 515) Revises the amounts provided by this division for the Corps of Engineers Investigations account. (Sec. 516) Revises the amounts provided by this division for the Corps of Engineers Construction account.  (Sec. 517) Prohibits funds provided by this division for Department of Energy--Energy Programs--Science from being used in contravention of the Department of Energy Organization Act.  (Sec. 518) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to prepare, propose, or promulgate any regulation or guidance that references or relies on the analysis contained in specified technical support documents and guidance related to the social cost of carbon and greenhouse gas emissions.  (Sec. 519) Prohibits funds provided by this division from being used to implement or enforce certain regulations and statutory provisions establishing energy conservation standards for incandescent lamps.  Department of Homeland Security Border Infrastructure Construction Appropriations Act, 2018  DIVISION E--DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY BORDER INFRASTRUCTURE CONSTRUCTION APPROPRIATION ACT, 2018  Provides additional funds to U.S. Customs and Border Protection for procurement, construction, and improvements.  Requires specified amount of the funding to remain available through FY2020 for:    32 miles of new border bollard fencing in the Rio Grande Valley, Texas;   28 miles of new bollard levee wall in the Rio Grande Valley, Texas;   14 miles of secondary fencing in San Diego, California; and   planning for border wall construction.   TITLE I--GENERAL PROVISIONS  (Sec. 101) Specifies that, unless this bill expressly provides otherwise, references to \"this Act\" included in this division shall be treated as referring only to the provisions of this division. ",
                "summary_short": "Highlights:  This bill provides FY2018 appropriations for several federal agencies. The bill includes 4 of the 12 regular FY2018 appropriations bills, including:    the Department of Defense Appropriations Act, 2018;   the Legislative Branch Appropriations Act, 2018;   the Military Construction, Veterans Affairs, and Related Agencies Appropriations Act, 2018; and   the Energy and Water Development and Related Agencies Appropriations Act, 2018.   The bill also includes the Department of Homela...",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2017-08-01",
                "latest_major_action": "Read the second time. Placed on Senate Legislative Calendar under General Orders. Calendar No. 187."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "115",
                "bill_id": "hr2532-115",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.2532",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/115/bills/hr2532.json",
                "title": "To realign structures and reallocate resources in the Federal Government in keeping with the core belief that families are the best protection for children and the bedrock of any society to bolster United States diplomacy targeted at ensuring that every child can grow up in a permanent, safe, nurturing, and loving family, and to ensure that intercountry adoption to the United States becomes a viable and fully developed option for providing families for children in need, and for other purposes.",
                "short_title": "Vulnerable Children and Families Act of 2017",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/115th-congress/house-bill/2532",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/115/hr2532",
                "introduced_date": "2017-05-18",
                "active": false,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 10,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {"D":3,"R":7},
                "committees": "House Foreign Affairs Committee",
                "primary_subject": "International Affairs",
                "summary": "Vulnerable Children and Families Act of 2017  This bill redesignates the Office of Children's Issues of the Department of State as the Office of Vulnerable Children and Family Security (VCFS). The President shall appoint an Ambassador-at-Large to promote: (1) oversight of the VCFS; (2) the implementation in foreign countries of child welfare laws and policies in keeping with the goals of the United States Government Action Plan on Children in Adversity; and (3) addressing the gap in U.S. diplomacy, policy, and operations regarding permanent family care for children living without families.  The Ambassador-at-Large shall: (1) advise the State Department and the President about vulnerable children and family security in foreign countries; (2) represent the United States regarding international child welfare, family preservation and reunification, and provision of permanent, safe parental care; (3) develop related policies and programs; and (4) submit an annual report on implementation of such action plan.  The bill provides the VCFS with lead responsibility for: (1) representing the U.S. government regarding intercountry adoptions, and (2) determining whether a country has met its obligations under the Hague Convention of Protection of Children and Cooperation in Respect of Inter-Country Adoption and is eligible to participate in intercountry adoptions in accordance with U.S. law.  The Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 is amended to: (1) include in the annual country reports on human rights practices information on the conditions of children living in orphanages and group homes, and (2) repeal certain provisions providing assistance for orphans and other vulnerable children.  The Special Advisor for Assistance to Orphans and Vulnerable Children shall work with the Ambassador-at-Large to ensure that U.S. assistance and development programs are focused on:   child development through the integration of health, nutrition, and family support;  facilitating government efforts to protect children from violence, exploitation, and neglect;  building integrated child welfare and protection systems; and  integrating such objectives with U.S. government agencies.  ",
                "summary_short": "Vulnerable Children and Families Act of 2017  This bill redesignates the Office of Children&#39;s Issues of the Department of State as the Office of Vulnerable Children and Family Security (VCFS). The President shall appoint an Ambassador-at-Large to promote: (1) oversight of the VCFS; (2) the implementation in foreign countries of child welfare laws and policies in keeping with the goals of the United States Government Action Plan on Children in Adversity; and (3) addressing the gap in U.S. dipl...",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2017-05-18",
                "latest_major_action": "Referred to the House Committee on Foreign Affairs."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "115",
                "bill_id": "hr769-115",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.769",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/115/bills/hr769.json",
                "title": "To prohibit voluntary or assessed contributions to the United Nations until the President certifies to Congress that United Nations Security Council Resolution 2334 has been repealed.",
                "short_title": "Safeguard Israel Act of 2017",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/115th-congress/house-bill/769",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/115/hr769",
                "introduced_date": "2017-01-31",
                "active": false,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 12,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {"R":12},
                "committees": "House Foreign Affairs Committee",
                "primary_subject": "International Affairs",
                "summary": "Safeguard Israel Act of 2017 This bill prohibits the U.S. government from making any voluntary or assessed contributions to the United Nations (U.N.) or any U.N. organization until the President certifies to Congress that Security Council Resolution 2334 has been repealed. Security Council Resolution 2334 characterizes Israeli settlements in the West Bank and East Jerusalem as illegal and demands cessation of settlement activities.",
                "summary_short": "Safeguard Israel Act of 2017 This bill prohibits the U.S. government from making any voluntary or assessed contributions to the United Nations (U.N.) or any U.N. organization until the President certifies to Congress that Security Council Resolution 2334 has been repealed. Security Council Resolution 2334 characterizes Israeli settlements in the West Bank and East Jerusalem as illegal and demands cessation of settlement activities.",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2017-01-31",
                "latest_major_action": "Referred to the House Committee on Foreign Affairs."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "114",
                "bill_id": "hr5912-114",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.5912",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/114/bills/hr5912.json",
                "title": "Making appropriations for the Department of State, foreign operations, and related programs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2017, and for other purposes.",
                "short_title": "Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2017",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/114th-congress/house-bill/5912",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/114/hr5912",
                "introduced_date": "2016-07-15",
                "active": true,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 0,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {},
                "committees": "House Appropriations Committee",
                "primary_subject": "International Affairs",
                "summary": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary has been expanded because action occurred on the measure.)  Highlights:  This bill provides FY2017 appropriations for diplomatic and international assistance programs, including the Department of State, the U.S. Agency for International Development and related agencies and programs.  The bill includes funding for the administration of foreign affairs, U.S. contributions to international organizations and commissions, bilateral economic assistance, international security assistance, multilateral assistance, and export and investment assistance.  The bill also includes additional Overseas and Contingency Operations (OCO)/ Global War on Terrorism funding which is exempt from discretionary spending limits.  The bill decreases Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs funding below FY2016 levels.  Full Summary:  Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2017  Provides FY2017 appropriations for the Department of State, foreign operations, and related programs.  TITLE I--DEPARTMENT OF STATE AND RELATED AGENCY  Provides appropriations to the Department of State for the Administration of Foreign Affairs, including:    Diplomatic and Consular Programs;   the Capital Investment Fund;   the Office of Inspector General;   Educational and Cultural Exchange Programs;   Representation Expenses;   Protection of Foreign Missions and Officials;   Embassy Security, Construction, and Maintenance;   Emergencies in the Diplomatic and Consular Service;   the Repatriation Loans Program Account;   Payment to the American Institute in Taiwan; and   Payment to the Foreign Service Retirement and Disability Fund.   Provides appropriations for International Organizations for Contributions to International Organizations and Contributions for International Peacekeeping Activities.  Provides appropriations for International Commissions, including:    the International Boundary and Water Commission, United States and Mexico;   Salaries and Expenses;   Construction;   American Sections, International Commissions; and   International Fisheries Commissions.   Provides appropriations to the Broadcasting Board of Governors for International Broadcasting Operations and Broadcasting Capital Improvements.  Provides appropriations for Related Programs, including:    the Asia Foundation,   the U.S. Institute of Peace,   the Center for Middle Eastern-Western Dialogue Trust Fund,   the Eisenhower Exchange Fellowship Program,   the Israeli Arab Scholarship Program, and   the National Endowment for Democracy.   Provides appropriations for Other Commissions, including:    the Commission for the Preservation of America's Heritage Abroad,   the U.S. Commission on International Religious Freedom,   the Commission on Security and Cooperation in Europe,   the Congressional-Executive Commission on the People's Republic of China, and   the United States-China Economic and Security Review Commission.   TITLE II--UNITED STATES AGENCY FOR INTERNATIONAL DEVELOPMENT  Provides appropriations to the U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID) for:    Operating Expenses,  the Capital Investment Fund, and   the Office of Inspector General.   TITLE III--BILATERAL ECONOMIC ASSISTANCE  Provides appropriations to the President for:    Global Health Programs;   Development Assistance;   International Disaster Assistance;   Transition Initiatives;   Development Credit Authority;   the Economic Support Fund;   the Democracy Fund; and   Assistance for Europe, Eurasia, and Central Asia.   Provides appropriations to the State Department for Migration and Refugee Assistance.  Provides appropriations to Independent Agencies, including:    the Peace Corps,   the Millennium Challenge Corporation,   the Inter-American Foundation, and   the U.S. African Development Foundation.   Provides appropriations to the Department of the Treasury for International Affairs Technical Assistance.  TITLE IV--INTERNATIONAL SECURITY ASSISTANCE  Provides appropriation to the State Department and the President for International Security Assistance.  Provides appropriations to the State Department for:    International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement;   Nonproliferation, Anti-Terrorism, Demining, and Related Programs; and   Peacekeeping Operations.   Provides appropriations to the President for: (1) International Military Education and Training, and (2) the Foreign Military Financing Program.  TITLE V--MULTILATERAL ASSISTANCE  Provides appropriations for International Financial Institutions, including payments to:    the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, including the Global Environmental Facility;  the International Development Association;   the Inter-American Development Bank;   the Asian Development Fund;   the African Development Bank;   the African Development Fund;   the International Fund for Agricultural Development;   the Global Agriculture and Food Security Program; and   the North American Development Bank.   TITLE VI--EXPORT AND INVESTMENT ASSISTANCE  Provides appropriations for Export and Investment Assistance to:    the Export-Import Bank of the United States,   the Overseas Private Investment Corporation, and the Trade and Development Agency.   TITLE VII--GENERAL PROVISIONS  Sets forth requirements and restrictions for the use of funds provided by this and other appropriations Acts.  (Sec. 7001) Permits funds provided by title I of this bill to be used for allowances and differentials, the employment of temporary or intermittent experts and consultants, and for hire of passenger transportation.  (Sec. 7002) Requires agencies funded by this bill to submit to Congress reports on unobligated balances.  (Sec. 7003) Limits expenditures for consulting services to contracts where the expenditures are a matter of public record and available for public inspection, except where otherwise provided under existing law, or under existing Executive Order issued pursuant to existing law.  (Sec. 7004) Prohibits funds provided by title I of this bill to construct a U.S. diplomatic facility from being used to include office space or other accommodations for an employee of any agency that has not provided the State Department with the agency's required share of the costs of constructing and using new diplomatic facilities. Includes an exception for the U.S. Marine Corps.  Prohibits specified funds from being used for site acquisition and mitigation, planning, design, or construction of the New London Embassy in the United Kingdom.  Sets forth reporting requirements for specified projects, including the new Mexico City Embassy and the new Beirut Embassy. Sets forth congressional notification and consultation requirements with respect to the use of funds for the acquisition of property or award of construction contracts for overseas diplomatic facilities.  Permits Embassy Security, Construction, and Maintenance funds provided by this bill to be used to address security vulnerabilities at interim and temporary facilities abroad, subject to specified requirements. Requires congressional notification and consultation prior to the opening, closure, or any significant modification to an interim or temporary diplomatic facility.  Permits specified funds to be transferred to implement the recommendations of the Benghazi Accountability Review Board, or to prevent or respond to security situations and requirements, subject to congressional notification and consultation requirements.  (Sec. 7005) Requires costs incurred by agencies funded in title I of this bill due to personnel actions in response to funding reductions included in this bill to be absorbed within the resources available under title I. Permits the transfer of funds between accounts to comply with this section, subject to reprogramming procedures.  (Sec. 7006) Permits the State Department to award certain local guard contracts on the basis of best value as determined by a cost-technical tradeoff analysis, subject to congressional notification requirements.  (Sec. 7007) Prohibits the use of funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill for direct assistance or reparations for the governments of Cuba, North Korea, Iran, or Syria. Specifies that the prohibition includes direct loans, credits, insurance, and guarantees of the Export-Import Bank or its agents.  (Sec. 7008) Prohibits the use of funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill for assistance to any country whose duly elected head of government is deposed by a military or military-supported coup or decree. Includes exceptions if a democratically elected government has taken office and for assistance to promote democratic elections.  (Sec. 7009) Sets forth limitations, conditions, and reporting requirements for the transfer of funds between appropriations accounts and agencies.  (Sec. 7010) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for first-class travel by employees of agencies funded by this bill.  (Sec. 7011) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from remaining available for obligation beyond the current fiscal year unless expressly provided in this bill, subject to specified exceptions.  (Sec. 7012) Prohibits funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill from being used for assistance to the government of any country in default in excess of a year on payments on a U.S. loan unless the President determines the assistance is in the U.S. national interest.  (Sec. 7013) Prohibits funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill from being used to provide assistance to a country in which the assistance is subject to taxation and not reimbursed by the foreign government unless the State Department makes certain determinations regarding U.S. foreign policy interests. Includes an exception for de minimis taxes. Requires funds that are withheld pursuant to this section to be reprogrammed for assistance for countries that: (1) do not assess taxes on U.S. assistance or that have an arrangement to provide substantial reimbursement of such taxes, and (2) can reasonably accommodate the assistance in a programmatically responsible manner.  (Sec. 7014) Permits specifically designated appropriations provided by titles III through VI of this bill to be reprogrammed for other programs within the same account if compliance with the designation is made impossible due to a provision in this or any other Act.  Extends the availability of program-specific appropriations for one fiscal year if the State Department or the USAID reports to Congress that the termination of assistance to a country or a change in circumstances makes it unlikely that funds can be used during the original period of availability.  Provides that: (1) ceilings and specific funding levels included in this bill are not applicable to funds provided by subsequent bills, and (2) specific funding levels or minimum funding requirements contained in other Acts are not applicable to funds provided by this bill.  (Sec. 7015) Sets forth congressional notification requirements and procedures regarding the use, reprogramming, transfer, or withholding of funds provided by this bill.  (Sec. 7016) Requires the Department of Defense (DOD) to notify Congress before: (1) providing certain excess defense articles under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961, or (2) issuing a letter of offer to sell certain defense articles under the Arms Export Control Act.  (Sec. 7017) Provides that: (1) certain funds included in titles I and III through V of this bill that are returned or not made available for international organizations shall remain available through FY2018, and (2) specified requirements to withhold funds for programs in Burma do not apply to funds provided by this bill.  (Sec. 7018) Prohibits funds provided to carry out part I of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 from being used for abortions and involuntary sterilization.  (Sec. 7019) Requires funds provided by this bill to be made available for programs and countries in the amounts contained in the tables in the report accompanying this bill. Permits certain deviations from the amounts and specifies requirements and restrictions for the deviations.  (Sec. 7020) Prohibits certain funds from being used to pay for alcoholic beverages or entertainment expenses for recreational activities.  (Sec. 7021) Prohibits assistance for governments engaged in specified activities that support international terrorism.  (Sec. 7022) Permits funds provided by this bill for the Trade and Development Agency to be spent, notwithstanding specified provisions that prohibit the obligation of funds for certain foreign assistance, intelligence, and broadcasting activities without a specific authorization of appropriations.  (Sec. 7023) Defines the terms \"program,\" \"project,\" and \"activity\" for the purposes of this bill.  (Sec. 7024) Provides authority for activities of the Peace Corps, the Inter-American Foundation, and the U.S. African Development Foundation that are authorized by or conducted under specified statutes.  (Sec. 7025) Prohibits specified funds provided by this bill from being used for activities related to the production, growth, or extraction of commodities for export by foreign countries if the commodities are likely to be in surplus on world markets or cause substantial injury to U.S. producers of the same, similar, or competing commodities, subject to specified exceptions. Directs Treasury to instruct the U.S. executive directors of the international financial institutions to oppose assistance for these activities.  (Sec. 7026) Directs the USAID to require countries that receive foreign assistance or cash transfers which result in the generation of local currencies to deposit the currencies in a separate account to be used to finance foreign assistance activities. Sets forth conditions and restrictions for the use of the funds.  (Sec. 7027) Provides that restrictions on assistance for a country included in this or any other Act should not be construed to restrict assistance: (1) in support of nongovernmental organizations included in specified provisions of this bill, and (2) under the Food for Peace Act.  Provides that this section does not alter prohibitions against funding for abortions, involuntary sterilizations, and countries that support international terrorism or violate human rights.  (Sec. 7028) Sets forth the conditions under which the USAID may use funds provided by this bill for limited competitions through local entities.  Requires the USAID to report to Congress annually on certain awards subject to limited or no competition for local entities.  (Sec. 7029) Requires the Department of the Treasury to instruct the U.S. executive director of certain international financial institutions to seek to require the institution to meet specified requirements regarding:    evaluations and reports on the effectiveness of loans, grants, and other activities;   human rights;   fraud and corruption; and   whistle-blower protections.   Prohibits funds provided under title V of this bill from being used for international financial institutions while the U.S. executive director is compensated above specified levels.  (Sec. 7030) Permits nongovernmental organizations that are USAID grantees or contractors to place local currencies which accrue to the organization as a result of economic assistance provided by title III of this bill in interest bearing accounts in order to enhance the organization's participation in debt-for-development and debt-for-nature exchanges.  (Sec. 7031) Requires direct government-to-government assistance to be limited to recipient agencies and ministries that meet specified requirements regarding financial management, budget transparency, corruption, foreign terrorist organizations, and human rights violations. Sets forth congressional reporting, notification, consultation requirements regarding government-to-government assistance.  Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used by foreign countries for debt service payments to any international financial institution.  Specifies that officials of foreign governments and their immediate family members who have been involved in significant corruption or a gross violation of human rights are ineligible for entry into the United States, subject to specified exceptions and waivers.  Permits funds provided by this bill to be used to support the provision of additional information on U.S. foreign assistance on the State Department foreign assistance website.  (Sec. 7032) Provides specified funds for democracy programs and specifies requirements for the allocation of the funds.  (Sec. 7033) Provides appropriations for specified programs related to promoting international religious freedom, including:    the Office of International Religious Freedom;   the Special Envoy to Promote Religious Freedom of Religious Minorities in the Near East and South Central Asia;   the development and implementation of an international religious freedom curriculum;   programs to protect vulnerable and persecuted religious minorities and investigate persecution of religious minorities;   humanitarian programs;   international broadcasting; and   the Atrocities Prevention Board.   (Sec. 7034) Permits specified funds provided by this bill to be used for:    victims of war, displaced children, displaced Burmese, and to combat trafficking in persons and assist victims of such trafficking;   programs to disarm, demobilize, and reintegrate into civilian society former members of foreign terrorist organization;   the World Food Program;   genocide victims memorial sites;   innovation incentive awards to encourage solutions related to the alleviation of poverty;   contingencies; and   loan guarantees for Jordan, Ukraine, Iraq, and Tunisia.   Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for: (1) supporting military training or operations that include child soldiers, and (2) the Green Climate Fund.  Prohibits funds provided by titles I and III of this bill from being used for the preservation of religious sites unless the State Department or the USAID determines and reports to Congress that the sites are historically, artistically, or culturally significant; the purpose of the project is neither to advance nor to inhibit the free exercise of religion; and that the project is in the U.S. national interest.  Requires specified funds provided by this bill to be used for:    forensic anthropology assistance relating to the exhumation of mass graves and identification of victims of war crimes and crimes against humanity, including in Iraq, Guatemala, and Sri Lanka;   DNA forensic technology programs to combat human trafficking in Central America and Mexico;   assistance to eliminate inhumane conditions in foreign prisons and other detention facilities;   the Program for Research and Training on Eastern Europe and the Independent States of the Former Soviet Union; and   the Partner Vetting System pilot program.   Permits specified funds provided under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 to support a nation emerging from instability to include support for a regional, district, municipal, or other sub-national entity emerging from instability.  Requires the State Department to report to Congress on funds spent during FY2016 for specified accounts related to security assistance.  Requires specified Foreign Military Financing Program funds to be used to modernize sales programs authorized by the Arms Export Control Act.  Requires the State Department to withhold specified funds for assistance for the central government of any country that is not taking appropriate steps to comply with the Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abductions.  Permits the State Department to transfer specified funds provided for Protection of Foreign Missions and Officials and Diplomatic and Consular Programs.  Directs the State Department to implement the requirement of the William Wilberforce Trafficking Victims Protection Reauthorization Act of 2008 that A-3 and G-5 visas to applicants of a diplomatic mission or international organization be suspended if its employees are found to have a record of exploiting nonimmigrant employees holding the visas.  Extends or provides authorities related to:   incentives for critical posts;   the foreign service officer annuitant waiver;   the Department of State civil service annuitant waiver;   the USAID civil service annuitant waiver;   refugee set-asides for nationals of the former Soviet Union, Estonia, Latvia, or Lithuania who are current, active members of the Ukrainian Catholic Church or the Ukrainian Orthodox Church;   status to a lawfully admitted permanent resident for certain aliens from the former Soviet Union, Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania, Vietnam, Laos, or Cambodia;   the inspector general annuitant waiver; and   war reserves stock pile authority.   Permits funds available in the HIV/AIDS Working Capital Fund to be used for pharmaceuticals and other products for child survival, malaria, and tuberculosis to the same extent as HIV/AIDS pharmaceuticals and other products.  (Sec. 7035) Expresses the sense of Congress on the Arab League boycott of Israel.  (Sec. 7036) Establishes limitations on the use of funds provided under titles III through VI of this bill to support a Palestinian state.  (Sec. 7037) Restricts the use of funds provided by titles II through VI of this bill to create a U.S. government office in Jerusalem to conduct U.S. government business with the Palestinian Authority over Gaza and Jericho or any successor Palestinian governing entity provided for in the Israel-PLO Declaration of Principles.  (Sec. 7038) Prohibits funds from being used for assistance to the Palestinian Broadcasting Corporation.  (Sec. 7039) Sets forth restrictions and requirements for assistance provided for the West Bank and Gaza.  (Sec. 7040) Restricts the use of specified funds provided by this bill for assistance to the Palestinian Authority or Hamas.  (Sec. 7041) Sets forth limitations, directives, and authorities for funds provided for diplomatic and development activities in the Middle East and North Africa, including:    Egypt,   Iran,   Iraq,   Jordan,   Lebanon,   Libya,   Morocco,   Refugees in North Africa,   Syria,   Tunisia, and   the West Bank and Gaza.   (Sec. 7042) Sets forth limitations, directives, and authorities for funds provided for diplomatic and development activities in Africa, including:    addressing the terrorist organization Boko Haram,   the Central African Republic,   counterterrorism programs,   areas affected by the Lord's Resistance Army,   the Power Africa Initiative,   South Sudan,   Sudan, and   Zimbabwe.   (Sec. 7043) Sets forth limitations, directives, and authorities for funds provided for diplomatic and development activities in East Asia and the Pacific, including:    Burma,   North Korea,   the People's Republic of China, and   Tibet.   (Sec. 7044) Sets forth limitations, directives, and authorities for funds provided for diplomatic and development activities and programs in South and Central Asia, including: Afghanistan, Pakistan, and regional programs.  (Sec. 7045) Sets forth limitations, directives, and authorities for funds provided for diplomatic and development activities and programs in the Western Hemisphere, including:    implementing the U.S. Strategy for Engagement in Central America;   El Salvador, Guatemala, and Honduras;   Colombia;   Cuba; and   Haiti.   (Sec. 7046) Prohibits fund provided by titles III through VI of this act from being used for certain payments to United Nations (U.N.) members for assessments, arrearages, dues, or the costs for participation of another country's delegation at international conferences held under the auspices of multilateral or international organizations.  (Sec. 7047) Permits the President to drawdown specified funds to support U.N. war crimes tribunals or commissions resolving charges regarding genocide or other violations of international humanitarian law.  (Sec. 7048) Limits the use of funds provided by this bill for contributions to the U.N. or the Organization of American States until specified transparency and accountability measures are taken by the organizations, subject to a waiver for a humanitarian crisis.  Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for:    any U.S. delegation or contribution to any specialized agency, body, or commission of the U.N. that is chaired or presided over by a country that supports international terrorism;   the U.N. Human Rights Council unless the State Department determines and reports to Congress that participation in the council is in the U.S. national security interest and that the council is taking significant steps to remove Israel as a permanent agenda item; and   the design, renovation, or construction of the U.N. Headquarters in New York.   Prohibits funds provided by this bill for Migration and Refugee Assistance from being used for the U.N. Relief and Works Agency (UNRWA) until the State Department makes specified certifications to Congress regarding the activities of the UNWRA, subject to a waiver for a humanitarian crisis.  Requires the State Department to report to Congress on funds available for contributions to any organization, department, agency, or program within the U.N. system or any international program that are withheld due to any provision of law.  Withholds specified Diplomatic and Consular Programs funds provided for the Bureau of International Organizations until the State Department complies with specified reporting requirements included in prior appropriation bills, committee reports, and explanatory statements.  (Sec. 7049) Permits funds provided by titles III and IV of this bill to be used to enhance the effectiveness and accountability of civilian police authority through training and technical assistance in human rights, the rule of law, anti-corruption, strategic planning, and through assistance to foster civilian police roles that support democratic governance.  (Sec. 7050) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used to promote the sale or export of tobacco or tobacco products, or to seek the reduction or removal by any foreign country of restrictions on the marketing of the products, except for restrictions which are not applied equally to all products of the same type.  (Sec. 7051) Prohibits the use of funds provided by this bill for the attendance of more than 50 U.S.-stationed employees at any single conference outside the United States unless Congress is notified in advance that attendance is important to the national interest.  (Sec. 7052) Permits the transfer of certain aircraft between programs, including for the transportation of active and standby Civilian Response Corps personnel and equipment. Specifies requirements for aircraft coordination.  (Sec. 7053) Withholds specified assistance from foreign countries with unpaid property taxes or parking fines and penalties in the District of Columbia or New York City.  (Sec. 7054) Permits demining equipment available to the State Department or the USAID and used for the clearance of landmines and unexploded ordnance for humanitarian purposes to be disposed of on a grant basis in foreign countries. Restricts furnishing military assistance, issuing export licenses, and transferring or selling technology relating to cluster munitions.  (Sec. 7055) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for publicity or propaganda purposes within the United States that were not authorized before the enactment of this bill.  Permits the USAID to use specified funds to provide assistance to private and voluntary organizations engaged in facilitating public discussion of world hunger and other related issues.  (Sec. 7056) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for the United Nations Population Fund or for population planning activities or other population assistance for foreign nongovernmental organizations that promote or perform abortions, except in cases of rape or incest or when the life of the mother would be endangered if the fetus were carried to term.  (Sec. 7057) Permits the USAID to use specified funds provided by this bill for:    hiring individuals in the United States and overseas on a limited appointment basis, subject to specified terms and conditions;   individuals detailed or employed to USAID to respond to disasters;   hiring personal services contractors in the United States to support new or expanded overseas programs and activities managed by the agency until permanent direct hire personnel are hired and trained.   Permits extensions of up to four years for limited-appointment Foreign Service personnel. Permits the USAID to provide exceptions to the fair opportunity process for placing task orders under multiple award indefinite-quantity contracts when the order is placed with a small or small disadvantaged business.  Continues the authority for the USAID to appoint into the Senior Foreign Service and employ up to 10 individuals for programs in Afghanistan or Pakistan.  (Sec. 7058) Permits funds provided by this bill for bilateral assistance for child survival activities or disease programs, including activities relating to HIV/AIDS, to be made available notwithstanding any other provision of law except for provisions under the heading \"Global Health Programs\" and the United States Leadership Against HIV/AIDS, Tuberculosis, and Malaria Act of 2003.  Permits specified funds to be used for family planning and reproductive health.  Withholds specified funds from the Global Fund to Fight AIDS, Tuberculosis, and Malaria until the State Department reports to Congress that the Fund is:    implementing a policy of transparency,   providing resources to maintain an independent Office of Inspector General,   protecting whistle-blowers from retaliation, and   implementing recommendations contained in the Consolidated Transformation Plan.   Permits specified funds to be used to combat infectious disease or a public health emergency, if an international infectious disease outbreak is sustained, severe, and is spreading internationally, or it is in the national interest to respond to a Public Health Emergency of International Concern.  (Sec. 7059) Provides specified funds for programs related to:    gender equality;   increasing leadership opportunities for women;   preventing and responding to gender-based violence; and   empowering women as equal partners in conflict prevention, peace building, transitional processes, and reconstruction efforts in countries affected by conflict or in political transition; and   ensuring the equitable provision of relief and recovery assistance to women and girls.   (Sec. 7060) Allocates specified funds for:    basic and higher education,   conservation,   development programs,   food security and agricultural development,   microenterprise and microfinance,   programs to combat trafficking in persons, and   water and sanitation.   (Sec. 7061) Prohibits funds provide by this bill from being used to maintain or establish a computer network unless the network blocks pornography. Includes an exception for law enforcement activities.  (Sec. 7062) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used to implement the Arms Trade Treaty until the Senate ratifies the treaty.  (Sec. 7063) Provides funds from the Development Assistance and Economic Support Fund accounts for specified programs in countries affected by significant populations of internally displaced person or refugees.  (Sec. 7064) Requires the State Department to notify Congress after concluding an agreement with a country to receive individuals detained at U.S. Naval Station, Guantanamo Bay, Cuba (Guantanamo).  Requires the notification to include the terms of the agreement, including whether appropriations will be used. Requires the State Department to report to Congress regarding negotiations with foreign governments regarding the transfer of individuals detained at Guantanamo.  (Sec. 7065) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used to make any pledge for future year funding for multilateral or bilateral programs funded in titles III through VI unless the pledge was justified in a congressional budget justification, the pledge was included in an appropriations Act, and congressional notification or consultation requirements have been met.  (Sec. 7066) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used to support or justify the use of torture, cruel, or inhumane treatment by any official or contract employee of the U.S. government.  (Sec. 7067) Prohibits the use of funds provided by this bill to assist the governments of certain countries that have refused to extradite to the United States any individual indicted for: (1) a criminal offense for which the maximum penalty is life imprisonment without the possibility of parole, or (2) killing a law enforcement officer. Specifies exceptions and permits the State Department to waive the restrictions based on the national interest.  (Sec. 7068) Permits financing to be provided to Israel, Egypt, the North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO), and major non-NATO allies for commercial leasing of certain defense articles from U.S. commercial suppliers, if the President determines that there are compelling foreign policy or national security reasons for providing the articles by commercial lease rather than by government-to-government sale.  (Sec. 7069) Requires specified funds to be made available for assistance for Ukraine, including the cost of certain loan guarantees.  Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being made available for a government of an independent state of the former Soviet Union that directs any action in violation of the territorial integrity or national sovereignty of any other independent state of the former Soviet Union, subject to a waiver for national security.  Specifies exceptions to restrictions on providing assistance to the government of Azerbaijan.  (Sec. 7070) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for assistance for the central government of: (1) the Russian Federation, or (2) a country that has taken affirmative steps intended to support the Russian Federation annexation of Crimea. Permits a waiver for the national interest.  Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for:    implementation of any action or policy that recognizes the sovereignty of the Russian Federation over Crimea;   facilitation, financing, or guarantee of U.S. government investments in Crimea if the activity includes the participation of Russian government officials, and Russian owned and controlled banks or financial entities; or   assistance for Crimea that includes the participation of Russian government officials, and Russian owned and controlled banks or financial entities.   Requires Treasury to instruct the U.S. executive directors of each international financial institution to vote against assistance for any program that violates the sovereignty or territorial integrity of Ukraine.  Specifies that the requirements and limitations described above shall cease to be in effect if the government of Ukraine has reestablished sovereignty over Crimea. Permits funds provided by this bill for assistance to the Eastern Partnership countries to be used to advance the implementation of Association Agreements, trade agreements, and visa liberalization agreements with the European Union (EU), and to reduce their vulnerability to Russian economic and political pressure.  Permits funds provided by this bill to be used to support the advancement of democracy and the rule of law in the Russian Federation, including promoting Internet freedom.  (Sec. 7071) Extends certain International Monetary Fund (IMF) transparency, accountability, and lending requirements to this bill. Directs Treasury to instruct the U.S. Executive Director of the IMF to ensure that any loan will be repaid to the IMF before other private creditors.  (Sec. 7072) Specifies funds that may be obligated for the purposes of the Special Defense Acquisition Fund, including the provision of defense articles and defense services to foreign countries or international organizations.  (Sec. 7073) Provides specified funds for programs to: (1) counter the flow of foreign fighters to countries in which violent extremists or violent extremist organizations operate; and (2) counter violent extremists and violent extremist organizations by supporting security and governance programs in countries whose stability and legitimacy are directly threatened by violence against state institutions by such entities, including at the national and local levels, and in fragile states bordering such countries.  (Sec. 7074) Prohibits funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill from being used for Enterprise Funds unless Congress is notified in advance. Establishes reporting requirements related to Enterprise Funds.  (Sec. 7075) Requires the head of the relevant agency to notify Congress if the President decides not to comply with any provisions of this bill based on constitutional grounds. Requires the notification to include: (1) the basis for the determination, and (2) any resulting program and policy changes.  (Sec. 7076) Sets forth requirements for operating plans, spending plans, and spending reports for specified agencies and programs funded by this bill.  (Sec. 7077) Requires agencies to post reports required to be submitted to Congress on their public websites if it is in the national interest, subject to exceptions for national security or proprietary, privileged, or sensitive information. Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for email accounts or email servers created outside of the .gov domain or not fitted for automated records management as part of a federal government records management program. Establishes reporting and other requirements related to federal records management.  (Sec. 7078) Provides specified funds to be used for programs to promote Internet freedom globally, subject to specified requirements.  (Sec. 7079) Prohibits funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill from being used for:    any financial incentive to a business for purposes of inducing it to relocate outside the United States if it will reduce the number of U.S. employees,   assistance for any program that contributes to the violation of internationally recognized workers' rights in the recipient country,   any assistance to an entity outside the United States for the purpose of relocating or transferring jobs from the United States to other countries, or   to implement specified policies that would have the effect of prohibiting any coal-fired or other power-generation project the purpose of which is to increase exports of goods and services from the United States or prevent the loss of jobs in the United States.   (Sec. 7080) Extends an exception to the requirement that a quorum of the Board of Directors of the Export-Import Bank of the United States consist of at least three members. (The exception permits the entire membership of the board to constitute a quorum if there are fewer than three people holding office on the board.) TITLE VIII--OVERSEAS CONTINGENCY OPERATIONS/GLOBAL WAR ON TERRORISM  Provides additional FY2017 appropriations for Overseas Contingency Operations/ Global War on Terrorism, which are exempt from discretionary spending limits.  Provides appropriations to the State Department for Administration of Foreign Affairs, including:    Diplomatic and Consular Programs;   the Office of Inspector General; and   Embassy Security, Construction, and Maintenance.   Provides appropriations for Contributions to International Organizations and Contributions for International Peacekeeping Activities.  Provides appropriations to the Broadcasting Board of Governors for International Broadcasting Operations.  Provides appropriations to the USAID for Operating Expenses.  Provides appropriations for Bilateral Economic Assistance, including:    International Disaster Assistance;  Transition Initiatives;   the Economic Support Fund;   Assistance for Europe, Eurasia, and Central Asia;   Migration and Refugee Assistance; and   the U.S. Emergency and Migration Assistance Fund.   Provides appropriations for International Security Assistance, including:    International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement;   Nonproliferation, Anti-Terrorism, Demining, and Related Programs;   Peacekeeping Operations; and   the Foreign Military Financing Program.   (Sec. 8001) Specifies that funds provided by this title are in addition to other FY2017 funds provided by this bill.  (Sec. 8002) Specifies that funds provided by this title are subject to the same authorities and conditions that are otherwise applicable to the appropriations accounts, unless otherwise noted.  (Sec. 8003) Specifies transfer authorities for funds provided by this title.  (Sec. 8004) Specifies that each amount designated by this bill for Overseas Contingency Operations/Global War on Terrorism is only available if the President subsequently designates all the amounts and transmits the designations to the Congress.  TITLE IX-- ADDITIONAL GENERAL PROVISION  Establishes a spending reduction account for the amount by which spending proposed in this bill exceeds the subcommittee's allocation under the Congressional Budget Act of 1974. Specifies that the amount is $0. (Under the Rules of the House of Representatives, any savings included in the spending reduction account are not available for further appropriation during consideration of the bill.) ",
                "summary_short": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary has been expanded because action occurred on the measure.)  Highlights:  This bill provides FY2017 appropriations for diplomatic and international assistance programs, including the Department of State, the U.S. Agency for International Development and related agencies and programs.  The bill includes funding for the administration of foreign affairs, U.S. contributions to international organizations and commissions, bila...",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2016-07-15",
                "latest_major_action": "Placed on the Union Calendar, Calendar No. 537."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "114",
                "bill_id": "hconres64-114",
                "bill_type": "hconres",
                "number": "H.CON.RES.64",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/114/bills/hconres64.json",
                "title": "Authorizing the use of Emancipation Hall in the Capitol Visitor Center for a ceremony to present the Congressional Gold Medal to the Monuments Men.",
                "short_title": "Authorizing the use of Emancipation Hall in the Capitol Visitor Center for a ceremony to present the Congressional Gold Medal to the Monuments Men.",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/114th-congress/house-concurrent-resolution/64",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/114/hconres64",
                "introduced_date": "2015-07-22",
                "active": true,
                "house_passage": "2015-07-27",
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 0,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {},
                "committees": "House House Administration Committee",
                "primary_subject": "Congress",
                "summary": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary of that version is repeated here.) Authorizes the use of Emancipation Hall in the Capitol Visitor Center on October 22, 2015, for a ceremony to present the Congressional Gold Medal to the Monuments Men in recognition of their role in the preservation, protection, and restitution of monuments, works of art, and artifacts of cultural importance during and following World War II. ",
                "summary_short": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary of that version is repeated here.) Authorizes the use of Emancipation Hall in the Capitol Visitor Center on October 22, 2015, for a ceremony to present the Congressional Gold Medal to the Monuments Men in recognition of their role in the preservation, protection, and restitution of monuments, works of art, and artifacts of cultural importance during and following World War II. ",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2015-07-29",
                "latest_major_action": "Message on Senate action sent to the House."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "114",
                "bill_id": "hr2772-114",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.2772",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/114/bills/hr2772.json",
                "title": "Making appropriations for the Department of State, foreign operations, and related programs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2016, and for other purposes.",
                "short_title": "Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2016",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/114th-congress/house-bill/2772",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/114/hr2772",
                "introduced_date": "2015-06-15",
                "active": true,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 0,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {},
                "committees": "House Appropriations Committee",
                "primary_subject": "International Affairs",
                "summary": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary has been expanded because action occurred on the measure.) Highlights:  The Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2016 provides FY2016 appropriations for diplomatic and international assistance programs, including the Department of State, the U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID), and related agencies and programs.  The bill includes funding for the administration of foreign affairs, U.S. contributions to international organizations and commissions, bilateral economic assistance, international security assistance, multilateral assistance, and export and investment assistance. It also includes funding for Overseas Contingency Operations (OCO)/ Global War on Terrorism, which is exempt from discretionary spending limits and other budget enforcement rules.  The bill decreases total Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs funding (including regular appropriations, OCO, and emergency funding) below FY2015 levels. If OCO and emergency funding is excluded from the comparison, the bill increases regular appropriations above FY2015 levels.  Compared to FY2015 levels, the bill    increases regular appropriations for Department of State and related agencies, bilateral economic assistance, and international security assistance; and  decreases regular appropriations for USAID Operating Expenses and multilateral assistance.   The bill decreases overall OCO funding below the FY2015 level.  The bill withholds 15% of the State Department's Diplomatic and Consular Programs funding until the State Department certifies to Congress that it has implemented certain policies related to preserving official records and reducing the backlog and response time for information requests.  The bill does not include funding for the International Monetary Fund or several international climate change programs. It also does not extend the authorization for the Export-Import Bank of the United States.  The bill prohibits or restricts funding for a new embassy or diplomatic facility in Cuba, non-governmental organizations that perform abortions, the enforcement of certain climate change policies, and the U.N. Arms Trade Treaty.  Full Summary:  Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2016  Provides FY2016 appropriations for the Department of State, foreign operations, and related programs.  TITLE I--DEPARTMENT OF STATE AND RELATED AGENCY  Provides appropriations to the Department of State for the Administration of Foreign Affairs, including:   Diplomatic and Consular Programs;  the Capital Investment Fund;  the Office of Inspector General;  Educational and Cultural Exchange Programs;  Representation Expenses;  Protection of Foreign Missions and Officials;  Embassy Security, Construction, and Maintenance;  Emergencies in the Diplomatic and Consular Service;  the Repatriation Loans Program Account;  Payment to the American Institute in Taiwan; and  Payment to the Foreign Service Retirement and Disability Fund.   Provides appropriations for International Organizations for Contributions to International Organizations and Contributions for International Peacekeeping Activities.  Provides appropriations for International Commissions, including:   the International Boundary and Water Commission, United States and Mexico;  Salaries and Expenses;  Construction;  American Sections, International Commissions; and  International Fisheries Commissions.   Provides appropriations to the Broadcasting Board of Governors for International Broadcasting Operations and Broadcasting Capital Improvements.  Provides appropriations for Related Programs, including:   the Asia Foundation,  the U.S. Institute of Peace, the Center for Middle Eastern-Western Dialogue Trust Fund,  the Eisenhower Exchange Fellowship Program,  the Israeli Arab Scholarship Program, and  the National Endowment for Democracy.   Provides appropriations for Other Commissions, including:   the Commission for the Preservation of America's Heritage Abroad,  the U.S. Commission on International Religious Freedom,  the Commission on Security and Cooperation in Europe,  the Congressional-Executive Commission on the People's Republic of China, and  the United States-China Economic and Security Review Commission.   TITLE II--UNITED STATES AGENCY FOR INTERNATIONAL DEVELOPMENT  Provides appropriations to the U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID) for Operating Expenses, the Capital Investment Fund, and the Office of Inspector General.  TITLE III--BILATERAL ECONOMIC ASSISTANCE  Provides appropriations to the President for:    Global Health Programs,  Development Assistance,  International Disaster Assistance,  Transition Initiatives,  Development Credit Authority,  the Economic Support Fund, and  the Democracy Fund.   Provides appropriations to the State Department for: (1) Migration and Refugee Assistance, and (2) the U.S. Emergency Refugee and Migration Assistance Fund.  Provides appropriations to Independent Agencies, including:  the Peace Corps,  the Millennium Challenge Corporation,  the Inter-American Foundation, and  the U.S. African Development Foundation.   Provides appropriations to the Department of the Treasury for International Affairs Technical Assistance.  TITLE IV--INTERNATIONAL SECURITY ASSISTANCE  Provides appropriations for International Security Assistance, including:  International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement;  Nonproliferation, Anti-Terrorism, Demining, and Related Programs;  Peacekeeping Operations;  International Military Education and Training; and  the Foreign Military Financing Program.   TITLE V--MULTILATERAL ASSISTANCE  Provides appropriations for International Financial Institutions for contributions to: the International Development Association, the Asian Development Fund, and the African Development Fund.  TITLE VI--EXPORT AND INVESTMENT ASSISTANCE  Provides appropriations to the Export-Import Bank of the United States for the Inspector General and Administrative Expenses. (The bill does not reauthorize the Export-Import Bank or permit funds to be used for any function of the Bank, including to acquire new obligations to support the cost, administration, or acquisition of any new loans, financing, guarantees, or other obligations, after the later of June 30, 2015, or the date specified in the Export-Import Bank Act of 1945.)  Provides funding for the Overseas Private Investment Corporation and the Trade and Development Agency.  TITLE VII--GENERAL PROVISIONS  Sets forth permissible, restricted, and prohibited uses for funds provided by this and other appropriations Acts.  (Sec. 7001) Permits funds provided by this title to be used for allowances and differentials, the employment of temporary or intermittent experts and consultants, and for hire of passenger transportation.  (Sec. 7002) Requires agencies funded by this bill to submit to Congress reports on unobligated balances.  (Sec. 7003) Limits expenditures for consulting services to contracts where the expenditures are a matter of public record and available for public inspection.  (Sec. 7004) Requires interagency cost sharing with respect to the construction and use of diplomatic facilities, subject to an exception for the U.S. Marine Corps.  Prohibits specified funds from being used for site acquisition and mitigation, planning, design, or construction of the New London Embassy in the United Kingdom.  Permits specified funds to be used for the relocation of the U.S. Embassy to the Holy See only if: (1) the U.S. Ambassador to the Holy See and embassy staff will retain their independence from other U.S. missions in Rome, and (2) any relocation of the chancery will not increase annual operating costs or result in a reduction in staff, and will enhance the Embassy's overall security.  Sets forth reporting requirements for specified projects, including the new Mexico City Embassy, the new Beirut Embassy, and other construction projects for new diplomatic facilities.  (Sec. 7005) Requires costs incurred by agencies funded in title I due to personnel actions in response to funding reductions included in this bill to be absorbed within the resources available under title I. Permits the transfer of funds between accounts to comply with this section, subject to reprogramming procedures.  (Sec. 7006) Permits the State Department to award local guard contracts for high risk, high threat posts on the basis of best value as determined by a cost-technical tradeoff analysis.  (Sec. 7007) Prohibits the use of funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill for direct assistance or reparations for the governments of Cuba, North Korea, Iran, or Syria.  (Sec. 7008) Prohibits the use of funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill for assistance to any country whose duly elected head of government is deposed by a military or military-supported coup or decree. Includes exceptions if a democratically elected government has taken office and for assistance to promote democratic elections.  (Sec. 7009) Sets forth limitations, conditions, and reporting requirements for the transfer of funds between appropriations accounts.  (Sec. 7010) Requires the State Department to submit to Congress a report on funds used during FY2015 for security assistance from the International Military Education and Training, Peacekeeping Operations, and Foreign Military Financing Program accounts.  (Sec. 7011) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from remaining available for obligation beyond the current fiscal year unless expressly provided in this bill, subject to specified exceptions.  (Sec. 7012) Prohibits funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill from being used for assistance to the government of any country in default in excess of a year on payments on a U.S. loan unless the President determines the assistance is in the U.S. national interest.  (Sec. 7013) Prohibits funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill from being used to provide assistance to a country in which the assistance is subject to taxation and not reimbursed by the foreign government unless the State Department makes certain determinations regarding U.S. foreign policy interests.  (Sec. 7014) Permits specifically designated appropriations provided by titles III through VI of this bill to be reprogrammed for other programs within the same account if compliance with the designation is made impossible due to a provision in this or any other Act. Extends the availability of program-specific appropriations for one fiscal year if the State Department or USAID reports to Congress that the termination of assistance to a country or a change in circumstances makes it unlikely that funds can be used during the original period of availability.  Provides that: (1) ceilings and specific funding levels included in this bill are not applicable to funds provided by subsequent bills, and (2) specific funding levels or minimum funding requirements contained in other Acts are not applicable to funds provided by this bill.  (Sec. 7015) Sets forth congressional notification requirements and procedures regarding reprogramming or transferring funds provided by this bill.  Requires congressional notification for funds provided by titles III through VI that are expended for assistance to Afghanistan, Bolivia, Burma, Cambodia, Cuba, Ecuador, El Salvador, Ethiopia, Guatemala, Haiti, Honduras, Iran, Iraq, Lebanon, Libya, Pakistan, the Russian Federation, Serbia, Somalia, South Sudan, Sri Lanka, Sudan, Syria, Uzbekistan, Venezuela, Yemen, and Zimbabwe.  (Sec. 7016) Requires the Department of Defense (DOD) to notify Congress before: (1) providing certain excess defense articles under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961, or (2) issuing a letter of offer to sell certain defense articles under the Arms Export Control Act.  (Sec. 7017) Provides that: (1) certain funds provided by titles I and III through V of this bill that are returned or not made available for international organizations shall remain available through FY2017, and (2) specified requirements to withhold funds for programs in Burma do not apply to funds provided by this bill.  (Sec. 7018) Prohibits funds provided to carry out part I of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 from being used for abortions and involuntary sterilization.  (Sec. 7019) Requires funds provided by this bill to be made available for programs and countries in the amounts contained in the tables in the report accompanying this bill.  (Sec. 7020) Prohibits certain funds from being used to pay for alcoholic beverages or entertainment expenses for recreational activities.  (Sec. 7021) Prohibits funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill from being made available to any foreign government that provides lethal military equipment to a country that supports international terrorism unless the President reports to Congress that the assistance is in the U.S. national interest.  Prohibits bilateral assistance from being provided to a government that: (1) grants sanctuary from prosecution to any individual or group which has committed an act of international terrorism, (2) otherwise supports international terrorism, or (3) is controlled by a terrorist organization. Permits the President to waive the prohibition for humanitarian or national security purposes.  (Sec. 7022) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for first-class travel by employees of agencies funded by this bill.  (Sec. 7023) Defines the terms \"program\", \"project\", and \"activity\" for the purposes of this bill.  (Sec. 7024) Provides authority for activities of the Peace Corps, the Inter-American Foundation, and the U.S. African Development Foundation that are authorized by or conducted under specified statutes.  (Sec. 7025) Prohibits specified funds provided by this bill from being used for activities related to the production, growth, or extraction of commodities for export by foreign countries if the commodities are likely to be in surplus on world markets or cause substantial injury to U.S. producers of the same, similar, or competing commodities, subject to specified exceptions. Directs Treasury to instruct the U.S. executive directors of the international financial institutions to oppose assistance for these activities.  (Sec. 7026) Directs USAID to require countries that receive foreign assistance or cash transfers which result in the generation of local currencies to deposit the currencies in a separate account to be used to finance foreign assistance activities. Sets forth conditions and restrictions for the use of the funds.  (Sec. 7027) Provides that restrictions on assistance for a country included in this or any other Act should not be construed to restrict assistance: (1) in support of nongovernmental organizations included in specified provisions of this bill, and (2) under the Food for Peace Act.  Provides that this section should not be construed to alter prohibitions against funding for abortion, involuntary sterilizations, or in support of international terrorism and human rights violations.  (Sec. 7028) Sets forth the conditions under which USAID may use funds provided by this bill for limited competitions through local entities.  (Sec. 7029) Requires the Department of the Treasury to instruct the U.S. executive director of each international financial institution to:   seek to require the institution to conduct independent evaluations of the effectiveness of at least 25% of all loans, grants, programs, and significant analytical non-lending activities to ensure that decisions are based on accurate data and objective analysis;  promote improvements in borrowing countries' financial management and judicial capacity to investigate, prosecute, and punish fraud and corruption;  seek to require the institution to conduct rigorous human rights due diligence and risk management.   Prohibits funds provided under title V of this bill from being used for international financial institutions while the U.S. executive director is compensated at a higher rate than level IV of the Executive Schedule.  (Sec. 7030) Permits nongovernmental organizations which are USAID grantees or contractors to place funds provided by title III of this bill in interest bearing accounts in order to enhance their participation in debt-for-development and debt-for-nature exchanges.  (Sec. 7031) Sets forth requirements and limitations for direct government-to-government assistance related to financial management, budget transparency, corruption, and human rights violations.  (Sec. 7032) Provides specified funds for democracy programs, including the National Endowment for Democracy and supporting freedom of religion. Sets forth reporting requirements and other requirements for the use of funds.  (Sec. 7033) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used to make any pledge for future year funding for multilateral or bilateral programs funded in titles III through VI unless the pledge was justified in a congressional budget justification, the pledge was included in an appropriations Act, and congressional notification requirements have been met.  (Sec. 7034) Permits funds provided by this bill for victims of war, displaced children, displaced Burmese, and to combat trafficking in persons and assist victims of trafficking to be used, notwithstanding any other provision of law.  Permits specified funds provided under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 to support a nation emerging from instability to include support for a regional, district, municipal, or other sub-national entity emerging from instability.  Requires agencies to post reports required to be submitted to Congress on their public websites if it is in the national interest, subject to exceptions for national security or proprietary, privileged, or sensitive information.  Permits specified funds to be used for:    the World Food Program;  the Program for Research and Training on Eastern Europe and the Independent States of the Former Soviet Union;  genocide memorials;  the Partner Vetting System pilot program;  contingencies; and  loan guarantees for Jordan, Ukraine, and Tunisia.   Requires the State Department to withhold specified funds for assistance for the central government of any country that is not taking appropriate steps to comply with the Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abductions.  Permits funds available in the HIV/AIDS Working Capital Fund to be used for pharmaceuticals and other products for child survival, malaria, and tuberculosis to the same extent as HIV/AIDS pharmaceuticals and other products.  Directs the State Department to implement the requirement of the William Wilberforce Trafficking Victims Protection Reauthorization Act of 2008 that A-3 and G-5 visas to applicants of a diplomatic mission or international organization be suspended if its employees are found to have a record of exploiting nonimmigrant employees holding the visas.  Extends provisions relating to:    funding authority for recruitment, relocation, and retention bonuses to Foreign Service members, other than chiefs of mission and ambassadors at large, who are on official duty in Iraq, Afghanistan, or Pakistan; and  specified authorities to waive requirements related to reemployment for certain annuitants reemployed in Iraq, Pakistan, and Afghanistan.   Amends the Foreign Operations, Export Financing, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 1990 to extend:   refugee set-asides for nationals of the former Soviet Union, Estonia, Latvia, or Lithuania who are current, active members of the Ukrainian Catholic Church or the Ukrainian Orthodox Church; and   status to a lawfully admitted permanent resident for certain aliens from the former Soviet Union, Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania, Vietnam, Laos, or Cambodia.   (Sec. 7035) Expresses the sense of Congress on the Arab League boycott of Israel.  (Sec. 7036) Establishes limitations on the use of funds provided under titles III through VI of this bill to support a Palestinian state.  (Sec. 7037) Restricts the use of funds provided by titles II through VI for conducting official U.S. government business with the Palestinian Authority.  (Sec. 7038) Prohibits funds from being used to provide equipment, technical support, consulting services, or any other assistance to the Palestinian Broadcasting Corporation.  (Sec. 7039) Requires the State Department to certify to Congress prior to using funds for the bilateral West Bank and Gaza program that the Government Accountability Office (GAO) will have access to necessary financial information to evaluate the uses of the assistance.  Directs the State Department, before using economic support funds provided by this bill for the West Bank and Gaza, to ensure that the assistance is not provided to or through any individual or entity that advocates or engages in terrorist activity.  Prohibits funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill from being used to honor individuals who commit or have committed acts of terrorism.  Sets forth reporting and auditing requirements to ensure compliance with this section.  (Sec. 7040) Restricts the use of specified funds provided by this bill for assistance to the Palestinian Authority or Hamas.  (Sec. 7041) Specifies permissible, required, and prohibited uses for funds in the Near East, including for Egypt, Iran, Iraq, Jordan, Lebanon, Libya, Morocco, Syria, and the West Bank and Gaza. Sets forth reporting requirements.  (Sec. 7042) Permits funds provided by this bill for assistance for the Central African Republic to be used for reconciliation and peacebuilding programs, including activities to promote inter-faith dialogue at the national and local levels, and for programs to prevent crimes against humanity.  Provides specified funds for the Trans-Sahara Counterterrorism Partnership program and the Partnership for Regional East Africa Counterterrorism program.  Permits funds provided by this bill to be used for programs and activities in areas affected by the Lord's Resistance Army consistent with the goals of the Lord's Resistance Army Disarmament and Northern Uganda Recovery Act. Permits funds provided by this bill for assistance for Liberia, Sierra Leone, Nigeria, Cote d'Ivoire, Senegal, Ghana, and the countries participating in the Congo Basin Forest Partnership to be used to promote and support transparency and accountability in relation to the extraction of timber, oil and gas, cacao, and other natural resources.  Sets forth requirements and restrictions for the use of funds provided by this bill for assistance to Nigeria and South Sudan.  Prohibits the use of funds provided by this bill to assist the governments of Sudan or Zimbabwe, subject to specified exceptions.  (Sec. 7043) Sets forth limitations, directives, and authorities for funds provided for diplomatic and development activities and programs in Burma, North Korea, China, and Tibet.  (Sec. 7044) Sets forth limitations, directives, and authorities for funds provided for diplomatic and development activities and programs in Afghanistan and Pakistan and for cross border programs.  (Sec. 7045) Requires the State Department to submit to Congress a multi-year strategy for assistance to Central America to address the key factors in the countries in Central America contributing to the migration of unaccompanied, undocumented minors to the United States.  Requires funds provided by this and other appropriations Acts to implement the strategy to be used to:    improve border security;  counter the activities of criminal gangs, drug traffickers, and organized crime;  combat human smuggling and trafficking; and  repatriate and reintegrate migrants returning from the United States.   Requires the State Department to suspend the use of funds for the programs and activities described in the strategy if the government of a country is not taking steps to:   improve border security;  enforce laws and policies to reduce the flow of illegal migrants to the United States,  conduct public outreach campaigns to explain the dangers of the journey to the southwest border of the United States, and to inform potential migrants of relevant United States immigration laws; and  cooperate with U.S. agencies to facilitate and expedite the return, repatriation, and reintegration of illegal migrants arriving at the southwest border of the United States.   Requires funds provided by this bill for International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement to be made available for DNA forensic technology programs to combat human trafficking in Central America.  Permits specified funds provided by this bill for assistance to Colombia to be used to support a unified campaign against narcotics trafficking, organizations designated as Foreign Terrorist Organizations, and other criminal or illegal armed groups, and to take actions to protect human health and welfare in emergency circumstances, including undertaking rescue operations.  Establishes permissible and prohibited uses for funds provided for assistance to Cuba, including:    providing funds to promote democracy and strengthen civil society in Cuba;  prohibiting the use of funds for the privatization and merger of the Office of Cuba Broadcasting and the Voice of America Latin America Division; and  prohibiting the use of funds to establish a U.S. diplomatic presence in Cuba or to facilitate the establishment or operation of a diplomatic mission of Cuba in the United States beyond what existed prior to December 17, 2014, until the President reports to Congress that specified requirements have been met.   Prohibits the use of funds provided by this bill to assist the central government of Haiti until the State Department certifies that Haiti is taking specified steps related to holding free and fair elections, selecting judges in a transparent manner, respecting the independence of the judiciary, combating corruption, and improving governance and financial transparency.  Requires costs of operations and maintenance, including fuel, of aircraft funded by this bill to be borne by the recipient country.  Requires funds provided by this bill for Development Assistance and the Economic Support Fund to be used for capacity building activities relating to free trade agreements with countries of Central America, Colombia, Peru, and the Dominican Republic.  (Sec. 7046) Prohibits funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill from being used to pay any assessments, arrearages, or dues of any United Nations member, or the costs for another country's delegation to attend an international conference.  (Sec. 7047) Permits the President to drawdown specified funds to support United Nations (U.N.) war crimes tribunals or commissions resolving charges regarding genocide or other violations of international humanitarian law.  (Sec. 7048) Limits the use of funds provided by this bill for contributions to the U.N. or the Organization of American States until specified transparency and accountability measures are taken by the organizations, subject to a waiver for a humanitarian crisis.  Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for:   any U.S. delegation to any specialized agency, body, or commission of the U.N. that is chaired or presided over by a country that supports international terrorism;  the U.N. Human Rights Council unless the State Department determines and reports to Congress that participation in the Council is in the U.S. national security interest and that the Council is taking significant steps to remove Israel as a permanent agenda item; and  the design, renovation, or construction of the U.N. Headquarters in New York   Prohibits funds provided by this bill for Migration and Refugee Assistance from being used for the UN Relief and Works Agency (UNRWA) until the State Department makes specified certifications to Congress regarding the activities of the UNWRA, subject to a waiver for a humanitarian crisis.  Requires the State Department to report to Congress on funds available for contributions to any organization, department, agency, or program within the U.N. system or any international program that are withheld due to any provision of law.  (Sec. 7049) Permits funds provided by titles III and IV of this bill to be used to enhance the effectiveness and accountability of civilian police authority through training and technical assistance in human rights, the rule of law, anti-corruption, strategic planning, and through assistance to foster civilian police roles that support democratic governance.  (Sec. 7050) Rescinds specified unexpended balances of funds previously provided for the Economic Support Fund.  (Sec. 7051) Prohibits the use of funds provided by this bill for the attendance of more than 50 U.S.-stationed employees at any single conference outside the United States unless Congress is notified in advance that attendance is important to the national interest.  (Sec. 7052) Permits the transfer of certain aircraft between programs, including for the transportation of active and standby Civilian Response Corps personnel and equipment.  (Sec. 7053) Withholds assistance from a foreign country in an amount equal to 110% of the total unpaid property tax and unpaid parking fines and penalties incurred April 1, 1997-September 30, 2015, and owed by the country to the District of Columbia or New York City.  (Sec. 7054) Permits demining equipment available to the State Department or USAID and used for the clearance of landmines and unexploded ordnance for humanitarian purposes to be disposed of on a grant basis in foreign countries.  Restricts furnishing military assistance, issuing export licenses, and transferring or selling technology relating to cluster munitions.  (Sec. 7055) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for publicity or propaganda purposes within the United States that were not authorized before the enactment of this bill.  Permits USAID to use specified funds to provide assistance to private and voluntary organizations engaged in facilitating public discussion of world hunger and other related issues.  (Sec. 7056) Limits the funds provided by title II of this bill that may be used for official USAID residence expenses.  (Sec. 7057) Permits USAID to use specified funds provided by this bill for:    hiring up to 175 individuals in the United States and overseas on a limited appointment basis, subject to specified terms and conditions;  the cost of individuals detailed or employed to USAID to respond to natural or man-made disasters;  hiring up to 40 personal services contractors in the United States to support new or expanded overseas programs and activities managed by the agency until permanent direct hire personnel are hired and trained.  Permits extensions of up to four years for limited-appointment Foreign Service personnel.  Permits USAID to provide exceptions to the fair opportunity process for placing task orders under multiple award indefinite-quantity contracts when the order is placed with a small or small disadvantaged business.  Continues USAID authority to appoint into the Senior Foreign Service and employ up to 10 individuals for programs in Afghanistan or Pakistan.  (Sec. 7058) Permits funds provided by this bill for bilateral assistance for child survival activities or disease programs including activities relating to HIV/AIDS to be made available notwithstanding any other provision of law except for provisions under the heading \"Global Health Programs\" and the United States Leadership Against HIV/AIDS, Tuberculosis, and Malaria Act of 2003.  Permits specified funds to be used for family planning and reproductive health.  Withholds specified funds from the Global Fund to Fight AIDS, Tuberculosis, and Malaria until the State Department reports to Congress that the Fund is:   implementing a policy of transparency,  providing resources to maintain an independent Office of Inspector General,  protecting whistleblowers from retaliation, and  implementing recommendations contained in the Consolidated Transformation Plan.   (Sec. 7059) Provides specified funds for programs related to gender equality, including:    promoting gender equality,  increasing leadership opportunities for women in countries where women and girls suffer discrimination,  a multi-year strategy to prevent and respond to gender-based violence in countries where it is common, and  a multi-year strategy to empower women as equal partners in conflict prevention, peace building, transitional processes, and reconstruction efforts in countries affected by conflict or in political transition, and to ensure the equitable provision of relief and recovery assistance to women and girls.   (Sec. 7060) Allocates specified funds and establishes reporting and other requirements for:   basic and higher education,  conservation,  food security and agriculture development,  microenterprise and microfinance development programs for the poor,  activities to combat trafficking in persons, and  water and sanitation supply projects.   (Sec. 7061) Prohibits specified funds provided by this bill from being available to a nongovernmental organization that fails to provide documents necessary for USAID auditing requirements.  (Sec. 7062) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used to implement the Arms Trade Treaty until the Senate ratifies the Treaty.  (Sec. 7063) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for the United Nations Population Fund or for population planning activities or other population assistance for foreign nongovernmental organizations that promote or perform abortions, except in cases of rape or incest or when the life of the mother would be endangered if the fetus were carried to term.  (Sec. 7064) Requires the State Department to notify Congress after concluding an agreement with a country to receive individuals detained at U.S. Naval Station, Guantanamo Bay, Cuba (Guantanamo).  Requires the notification to include the terms of the agreement, including whether appropriations will be used. Requires the State Department to report to Congress regarding negotiations with foreign governments regarding the transfer of individuals detained at Guantanamo.  (Sec. 7065) Permits funds provided by this bill for Development Assistance, the Economic Support Fund, and International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement to be used for assistance to eliminate inhumane conditions in foreign prisons and other detention facilities.  (Sec. 7066) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used to support or justify the use of torture, cruel, or inhumane treatment by any official or contract employee of the U.S. government.  (Sec. 7067) Prohibits the use of funds provided by this bill to assist the government of a country that has refused to extradite to the United States any individual indicted for a criminal offense for which the maximum penalty is life imprisonment without the possibility of parole or for killing a law enforcement officer.  Applies only to the government of a country that maintains diplomatic relations with the United States and has violated the terms and conditions of an extradition treaty with the United States. Specifies exceptions and permits the State Department to waive the restrictions based on the national interest.  (Sec. 7068) Permits financing to be provided to Israel, Egypt, the North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO), and major non-NATO allies for commercial leasing of certain defense articles from U.S. commercial suppliers, if the President determines that there are compelling foreign policy or national security reasons for providing the articles by commercial lease rather than by government-to-government sale.  (Sec. 7069) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being made available for a government of an Independent State of the former Soviet Union that directs any action in violation of the territorial integrity or national sovereignty of any other Independent State of the former Soviet Union. Permits a waiver for national security.  Permits funds provided by this bill for the Economic Support Fund to be used for assistance to specified countries pursuant to the Support for Eastern European Democracy (SEED) Act of 1989 and the FREEDOM Support Act, subject to specified conditions and limitations.  Provides specified funds for assistance to Ukraine.  (Sec. 7070) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for assistance for the central government of: (1) the Russian Federation, or (2) a country that has taken affirmative steps intended to support the Russian Federation annexation of Crimea. Permits a waiver for the national interest.  Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used for:    implementation of any action or policy that recognizes the sovereignty of the Russian Federation over Crimea;  facilitation, financing, or guarantee of U.S. government investments in Crimea if the activity includes the participation of Russian government officials, and Russian owned and controlled banks or financial entities; or  assistance for Crimea that includes the participation of Russian government officials, and Russian owned and controlled banks or financial entities.   Requires Treasury to instruct the U.S. executive directors of each international financial institution to vote against assistance for any program that violates the sovereignty or territorial integrity of Ukraine.  Permits funds provided by this bill for assistance to the Eastern Partnership countries to be used to advance the implementation of Association Agreements, trade agreements, and visa liberalization agreements with the European Union (EU), and to reduce their vulnerability to Russian economic and political pressure.  (Sec. 7071) Extends certain IMF transparency, accountability, and lending requirements to this bill. Directs Treasury to instruct the U.S. Executive Director of the IMF to ensure that: (1) any loan will be repaid to the IMF before other private creditors, and (2) that the IMF is implementing certain policies to protect whistleblowers from retaliation.  (Sec. 7072) Specifies funds that may be obligated for the purposes of the Special Defense Acquisition Fund, including the provision of defense articles and defense services to foreign countries or international organizations.  (Sec. 7073) Permits funds provided by this bill for the Economic Support Fund; Nonproliferation, Anti-terrorism, Demining and Related Programs; and International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement to be used for programs to counter the flow of foreign terrorist fighters.  (Sec. 7074) Prohibits funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill from being used for Enterprise Funds unless Congress is notified in advance. Establishes reporting requirements related to Enterprise Funds.  (Sec. 7075) Requires the head of the relevant agency to notify Congress if the President decides not to comply with any provisions of this bill based on constitutional grounds and requires the notification to include: (1) the basis for the determination, and (2) any resulting program and policy changes.  (Sec. 7076) Sets forth requirements for operating plans, spending plans, spending reports, and congressional budget justifications for specified agencies and programs funded by this bill.  (Sec. 7077) Withholds 15% of the funds provided by this bill for Diplomatic and Consular Programs not designated for Worldwide Security Protection, until the State Department certifies to Congress that it has updated policies, directives, and oversight necessary to comply with federal laws and regulations requiring the preservation of official records and has taken steps to improve the response time for identifying and retrieving the records.  (Sec. 7078) Provides specified funds to be used for programs to promote Internet freedom globally, with priority given to countries whose governments restrict freedom of expression on the Internet and are important to U.S. interests. Requires the funds to be matched to the maximum extent practicable, by sources other than the U.S. government, including from the private sector.  (Sec. 7079) Prohibits funds provided by this bill from being used to promote the sale or export of tobacco or tobacco products, or to seek the reduction or removal by any foreign country of restrictions on the marketing of the products, except for restrictions which are not applied equally to all products of the same type.  (Sec. 7080) Prohibits funds provided by titles III through VI of this bill from being used for:    any financial incentive to a business for purposes of inducing it to relocate outside the United States if it will reduce the number of U.S. employees,  assistance for any program that contributes to the violation of internationally recognized workers' rights in the recipient country,  any assistance to an entity outside the United States for the purpose of relocating or transferring jobs from the United States to other countries, or  to implement specified policies that would have the effect of prohibiting any coal-fired or other power-generation project the purpose of which is to increase exports of goods and services from the United States or prevent the loss of jobs in the United States.   TITLE VIII--GLOBAL WAR ON TERRORISM  Provides appropriations for diplomatic operations, development programs, and humanitarian response in support of the Global War on Terrorism. (Funds designated for the Global War on Terrorism/ Overseas Contingency Operations are exempt for discretionary spending limits and other budget enforcement rules).  Provides appropriations to the State Department for Administration of Foreign Affairs, including:    Diplomatic and Consular Programs;  the Office of Inspector General; and  Embassy Security, Construction, and Maintenance.   Provides appropriations for Contributions to International Organizations, to the Broadcasting Board of Governors for International Broadcasting Operations, and to USAID for Operating Expenses.  Provides appropriations for Bilateral Economic Assistance, including International Disaster Assistance, Transition Initiatives, the Economic Support Fund, and Migration and Refugee Assistance.  Provides appropriations for International Security Assistance, including:    International Narcotics Control and Law Enforcement;  Nonproliferation, Anti-Terrorism, Demining, and Related Programs;  Peacekeeping Operations; and  the Foreign Military Financing Program.   (Sec. 8001) States that funds provided by this title are in addition to other FY2016 funds provided by this bill.  (Sec. 8002) States that funds provided by this title are subject to the same authorities and conditions applicable to the accounts in prior titles, unless otherwise noted.  (Sec. 8003) Provides authority to transfer specified funds from the Economic Support Fund to United States Agency for International Development--Funds Appropriated to the President-- Office of the Inspector General.  (Sec. 8004) Provides that each amount designate by Congress in this bill as for Overseas Contingency Operations/Global War on Terrorism pursuant the Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act of 1985 shall only be available if the President subsequently designates the amounts and transmits the designations to Congress.  TITLE IX--ADDITIONAL GENERAL PROVISION  (Sec. 9001) Establishes a spending reduction account for the amount by which spending proposed in this bill exceeds the subcommittee's allocation under the Congressional Budget Act of 1974. Specifies that the amount is $0. (Under the Rules of the House of Representatives, any savings included in the spending reduction account are not available for further appropriation during consideration of the bill.) ",
                "summary_short": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary has been expanded because action occurred on the measure.) Highlights:  The Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2016 provides FY2016 appropriations for diplomatic and international assistance programs, including the Department of State, the U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID), and related agencies and programs.  The bill includes funding for the administration of...",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2015-06-15",
                "latest_major_action": "Placed on the Union Calendar, Calendar No. 112."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "114",
                "bill_id": "hr1201-114",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.1201",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/114/bills/hr1201.json",
                "title": "To combat human trafficking.",
                "short_title": "Combat Human Trafficking Act of 2015",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/114th-congress/house-bill/1201",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/114/hr1201",
                "introduced_date": "2015-03-02",
                "active": false,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 2,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {"D":1,"R":1},
                "committees": "House Judiciary Committee",
                "primary_subject": "Crime and Law Enforcement",
                "summary": "Combat Human Trafficking Act of 2015  Amends the federal criminal code, with respect to sex trafficking of children, to: (1) subject to criminal prosecution buyers, as well as sellers, of commercial sex involving sex trafficking victims; (2) provide that in prosecutions of sex trafficking crimes, the government is not required to prove that a sex trafficking defendant knew or recklessly disregarded the fact that a victim was under age 18; (3) equalize the period of supervised release for sex trafficking offenders convicted of conspiracy; (4) expand wiretap authority for investigating crimes related to sex trafficking, including slavery, involuntary servitude, and forced labor; (5) grant crime victims the right to be informed in a timely manner of any plea agreement or deferred prosecution agreement; and (6) require an appellate court to apply ordinary standards of review in reviewing appeals filed by crime victims. Requires the Bureau of Justice Statistics in the Department of Justice (DOJ) to prepare and report annually on: (1) the rates of arrests by state law enforcement officers for sex trafficking crimes involving buyers of commercial sex involving sex trafficking victims,and (2) prosecutions and convictions for such crimes in state courts.  Directs the Attorney General to ensure that: (1) DOJ anti-human trafficking training programs, including programs for law enforcement officers, include technical training on effective methods for investigating and prosecuting individuals who obtain, patronize, or solicit a commercial sex act involving a person subject to severe forms of human trafficking and on facilitating the provision of physical and mental health services by health care providers to persons subject to severe forms of human trafficking; (2) federal law enforcement officers are engaged in activities, programs, or operations involving the detection, investigation, and prosecution of such offenses; and (3) DOJ anti-human trafficking programs for U.S. attorneys or other federal prosecutors include training on seeking restitution for peonage, slavery, and human trafficking offenses to ensure that each such attorney, upon obtaining a conviction for such an offense, requests a specific amount of restitution for each victim without regard to whether the victim requests it. Requires the Federal Judicial Center to provide training to judges relating to the application of mandatory restitution provisions regarding ordering restitution for victims of such offenses.",
                "summary_short": "Combat Human Trafficking Act of 2015  Amends the federal criminal code, with respect to sex trafficking of children, to: (1) subject to criminal prosecution buyers, as well as sellers, of commercial sex involving sex trafficking victims; (2) provide that in prosecutions of sex trafficking crimes, the government is not required to prove that a sex trafficking defendant knew or recklessly disregarded the fact that a victim was under age 18; (3) equalize the period of supervised release for sex ...",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2015-03-31",
                "latest_major_action": "Referred to the Subcommittee on Crime, Terrorism, Homeland Security, and Investigations."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "113",
                "bill_id": "hr5013-113",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.5013",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/113/bills/hr5013.json",
                "title": "Making appropriations for the Department of State, foreign operations, and related programs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2015, and for other purposes.",
                "short_title": "Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2015",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/113th-congress/house-bill/5013",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/113/hr5013",
                "introduced_date": "2014-06-27",
                "active": true,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 0,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {},
                "committees": "House Appropriations Committee",
                "primary_subject": "International Affairs",
                "summary": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary has been expanded because action occurred on the measure.) Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2015 - Title I: Department of State and Related Agency - Makes FY2015 appropriations for the Department of State (Department) for:   administration of foreign affairs and diplomatic and consular programs;  the Capital Investment Fund;  the Office of Inspector General;  educational and cultural exchange programs;  representation allowances;  protection of foreign missions and officials;  U.S. embassy security, construction, and maintenance;  emergencies in the diplomatic and consular service;  the repatriation loans program account;  the American Institute in Taiwan;  the Foreign Service Retirement and Disability Fund;  international organizations, peacekeeping, and commissions;  the International Boundary and Water Commission, United States and Mexico;  salaries and expenses;  plan preparation and construction of authorized projects;  the International Joint Commission, the International Boundary Commission, United States and Canada, and the Border Environment Cooperation Commission;  international fisheries commissions;  international broadcasting operations and capital improvements;  the Asia Foundation;  the United States Institute for Peace;  the Center for Middle Eastern-Western Dialogue Trust Fund;  the Eisenhower Exchange Fellowships, Incorporated;  the Israeli Arab Scholarship Program;  the National Endowment for Democracy;  the Commission for Preservation of America's Heritage Abroad;  the United States Commission on International Religious Freedom;  the Commission on Security and Cooperation in Europe;  the Congressional-Executive Commission on the People's Republic of China; and  the United States-China Economic and Security Review Commission.   Title II: United States Agency for International Development - Makes FY2015 appropriations for:   operating expenses of the U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID),  the capital investment fund, and  the Office of Inspector General.   Title III: Bilateral Economic Assistance - Makes FY2015 appropriations for:   expenses of the President in carrying out certain programs under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961,  global health and child survival,  specified development assistance,  international disaster assistance,  transition initiatives,  development credit authority,  the Economic Support Fund,  promotion of democracy,  migration and refugee assistance,  the Peace Corps,  the Millennium Challenge Corporation,  the Inter-American Foundation,  the African Development Foundation, and  the Department of the Treasury for international affairs technical assistance activities.   Title IV: International Security Assistance - Makes FY2015 appropriations for:   international narcotics control and law enforcement;  nonproliferation, anti-terrorism, and demining;  international peacekeeping operations;  international military education and training; and  foreign military financing grants.   Title V: Multilateral Assistance - Makes FY2015 appropriations for:   international organizations and programs;  the Global Environment Facility;  the International Development Association;  the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development;  the Global Agriculture and Food Security Program;  the Inter-American Development Bank;  the Asian Development Bank;  the Asian Development Fund;  the African Development Bank;  the African Development Fund;  the International Fund for Agricultural Development;  the Export-Import Bank of the United States, including the Office of Inspector General;  the Overseas Private Investment Corporation (OPIC); and  the Trade and Development Agency.   Sets forth limitations on callable capital subscriptions with respect to:   the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development,  the Inter-American Development Bank,  the Asian Development Bank, and  the African Development Bank.   Title VI: Export and Investment Assistance - Makes FY2015 appropriations for:   the Export-Import Bank of the United States, including the Office of Inspector General and administrative expenses;  OPIC; and  the Trade and Development Agency.   Title VII: General Provisions - Sets forth certain limits and prohibitions on the use of appropriations for specified activities.  (Sec. 7002) Requires any federal department or agency that has funds made available to it under this Act to provide Congress with a quarterly accounting of the cumulative balances of any unobligated funds received during FY2015 or in any previous fiscal year.  (Sec. 7003) Limits the use of funds under title I of this Act for any consulting service through procurement contracts to those contracts available for public inspection.  (Sec. 7004) Sets forth restrictions on office space for federal employees with respect to U.S. diplomatic facility construction, with an exception for Marine Corps use.  Prohibits the use of certain funding sources for site acquisition and mitigation, planning, design or construction of the New London Embassy, United Kingdom.  Declares that certain embassy security, construction, and maintenance appropriations may be obligated for the relocation of the U.S. Embassy to the Holy See only if the U.S. Ambassador to the Holy See and embassy staff will retain their independence from other U.S. missions in Rome, and any relocation of the chancery will not increase annual operating costs or result in a reduction in staff, and will enhance the Embassy's overall security.   (Sec. 7005) States that costs incurred by an agency or department funded under title I of this Act resulting from personnel actions taken in response to funding reductions included in this Act shall be absorbed within such agency's or department's budgetary resources.  (Sec. 7006) Prohibits first-class travel by employees of agencies funded under this Act in contravention of specified federal regulations. (Sec. 7007) Prohibits the use of funds under titles III through VI of this Act for direct assistance or reparations to Cuba, North Korea, Iran, or Syria.  (Sec. 7008) Prohibits the use of funds under titles III through VI this Act for assistance to any country whose elected head of government is deposed by military or military-supported coup or decree. Permits resuming assistance if a democratic government is subsequently elected to office.  (Sec. 7009) Limits certain agency, Department, and Broadcasting Board of Governors transfer authority.  (Sec. 7010) Directs the Secretary of State to report to Congress quarterly on fund use for foreign military financing, international military education and training, peacekeeping operations, and the Pakistan Counterinsurgency Capability Fund.  (Sec. 7011) Prohibits, with specified exceptions, appropriations under this Act from remaining available for obligation after the expiration of the current fiscal year unless expressly provided for.  (Sec. 7012) Prohibits funds under titles III through VI of this Act from being used for assistance to any country in default in excess of a year on payments on a U.S. loan unless the President determines that such assistance is in the U.S. national interest.  (Sec. 7013) Prohibits funds under titles III through VI of this Act from being used for assistance under a new bilateral agreement unless such assistance is exempt from taxation, or reimbursed, by the foreign government.  (Sec. 7014) Authorizes specifically designated appropriations under titles II through VI of this Act to be reprogrammed for other programs within the same account subject to the appropriate congressional committees' regular notification procedures.  Extends the availability of program-specific appropriations for one fiscal year if the Secretary or USAID reports to Congress that program termination or changed circumstances makes it unlikely that such appropriations can be obligated during the original period of availability.  States that ceilings and specifically designated funding levels under this Act shall not be applicable to funds or authorities appropriated or otherwise made available by any subsequent Act unless such Act specifically so directs.  (Sec. 7015) Prohibits funds that remain available for FY2015 obligation under titles I and II of this Act or in prior appropriations Acts from being made available for specified reprogramming purposes unless the appropriate congressional committees are notified 15 days in advance of such programming.  States that the requirements of this section or any similar provision may be waived if failure to do so would pose a substantial risk to human health or welfare.  Prohibits the use of funds under titles III through VI of this Act for Afghanistan, Burma, Cambodia, Cuba, Ethiopia, Haiti, Iran, Iraq, Lebanon, Libya, Pakistan, the Russian Federation, Serbia, Somalia, Sri Lanka, South Sudan, Sudan, Syria,Uzbekistan, Yemen, and Zimbabwe except through the regular notification procedures of the appropriate congressional committees.  (Sec. 7016) Requires the Department of Defense (DOD) to notify Congress before: (1) providing certain excess defense articles under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961, or (2) issuing a letter of offer to sell certain defense articles under the Arms Export Control Act.  (Sec. 7017) States that funds appropriated under titles III through VI of this Act or in prior appropriations Acts for the Department, foreign operations, export financing, and related programs that are returned or not made available for international organizations and programs shall remain available for obligation until September 30, 2016.  (Sec. 7018) Prohibits certain funds under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 from being: (1) used to pay for abortions, involuntary sterilizations, or related biomedical research as a method of family planning; or (2) obligated or expended for any country or organization if such funds' use would violate specified provisions related to abortions and involuntary sterilizations.  (Sec. 7019) Allocates funds for specified accounts.  (Sec. 7020) Prohibits the obligation of certain funds to pay for alcoholic beverages or entertainment expenses for recreational activities.  (Sec. 7021) Prohibits the provision of funds under titles III through VI of this Act to any foreign government that provides lethal military equipment to a country that supports international terrorism unless the President reports to Congress that such assistance is in U.S. national interests.  Prohibits bilateral assistance from being made to a government that: (1) grants sanctuary from prosecution to any individual or group which has committed an act of international terrorism, (2) otherwise supports international terrorism, or (3) is controlled by a terrorist organization. Authorizes the President to waive such prohibition for humanitarian or national security purposes.  (Sec. 7022) Extends, with an exception, certain authorities necessary to expend Department and foreign assistance funds.  (Sec. 7024) States that, unless expressly provided to the contrary, provisions authorizing or making appropriations for the Department, foreign operations, and related programs shall not be construed to prohibit activities authorized by the Peace Corps Act, the Inter-American Foundation Act, or the African Development Foundation Act.  (Sec. 7025) Prohibits funds under titles III through VI of this Act and funds available to the Export-Import Bank and OPIC from being used for production of any export commodity by a foreign country if the commodity is likely to be in surplus on world markets and will cause substantial injury to U.S. producers of a similar or competing commodity (with exceptions for benefits to U.S. producers).  (Sec. 7026) Directs USAID to require countries that receive foreign assistance which results in the generation of local currencies to deposit such currencies in a separate account to be used to finance foreign assistance activities.  (Sec. 7027) States that: (1) restrictions on assistance for a country shall not be construed to restrict specified assistance for nongovernmental organizations from certain funds under this Act, and (2) nothing in this section shall be construed to alter existing prohibitions against abortion or involuntary sterilizations in this or any other Act.  States that: (1) during FY2015 restrictions contained in this or any other Act with respect to assistance for a country shall not be construed to restrict assistance under the Food for Peace Act, and (2) this section shall not apply to assistance restrictions regarding support of international terrorism and human rights violations.  (Sec. 7028) Sets forth the conditions under which funds available under this Act for USAID may be provided for limited competitions through local entities.  (Sec. 7029) States that none of the funds under title V of this Act should be paid to any international financial institution unless the Secretary of the Treasury certifies to Congress that such institution requires independent evaluations of each project, program loan or grant, or significant non-lending activity.  Prohibits payments under title V of this Act to any international financial institution while the U.S. executive director to the institution is compensated at a rate in excess of that for Level IV of the Executive Schedule, or any alternate U.S. director is compensated at a rate in excess of that for Level V of such Schedule.  Directs the Secretary of the Treasury to instruct:   the U.S. Executive Director of the International Monetary Fund (IMF) to oppose assistance to a Heavily Indebted Poor Country that imposes budget caps or restraints that do not allow the maintenance of or an increase in governmental spending on health care or education, and  the U.S. executive directors at international financial entities to oppose assistance that requires user fees or service charges on poor people for primary education or primary health care.   (Sec. 7030) Authorizes nongovernmental organizations which are USAID grantees or contractors to place funds made available to them under title III of this Act in interest bearing accounts in order to enhance their participation in debt-for-development and debt-for-nature exchanges.  (Sec. 7031) Sets forth requirements for direct government-to government assistance.  (Sec. 7032) Makes funds available to support freedom of religion, including in the Middle East and North Africa.  (Sec. 7033) Conditions the use of funds appropriated by this Act to make any pledge for future year funding for any multilateral or bilateral program funded in titles III through VI of this Act.  (Sec. 7034) Makes funds under titles III through VI of this Act available for: (1) war victims, (2) displaced children, (3) displaced Burmese, and (4) victims of trafficking in persons and to combat such trafficking.  Expands authorities under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 for civilian police assistance for a regional, district, municipal, or other sub-national entity emerging from instability.  Makes specified funds available for:   the World Food Program;  programs to disarm, demobilize, and reintegrate into civilian society former members of foreign terrorist organizations;  the Partner Vetting System pilot program;  the program for research and training on Eastern Europe and the Independent States of the Former Soviet Union; and  contingencies.    Urges the Secretary to withhold funds under title III of this Act for the central government of any country that is not taking appropriate steps to comply with the Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abductions.  Authorizes the Secretary to transfer unobligated expired FY2015 diplomatic and consular program balances to the protection of foreign missions account, except for funds designated for overseas contingency operations and the war on terror.  Extends:   funding authority for recruitment, relocation, and retention bonuses to Foreign Service members, other than chiefs of mission and ambassadors at large, who are on official duty in Iraq, Afghanistan, or Pakistan;  specified authorities on reemployment requirements for certain annuitants reemployed in Iraq, Pakistan, and Afghanistan;  authority of USAID's Office of Inspector General to contract with U.S. citizens for personal services if the Office's personnel resources are otherwise insufficient;  refugee set-asides for nationals of the former Soviet Union, Estonia, Latvia, or Lithuania who are current, active members of the Ukrainian Catholic Church or the Ukrainian Orthodox Church; and  the period of eligibility for status adjustment from a parolee who was denied refugee status to a lawfully admitted permanent resident for certain aliens from the former Soviet Union, Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania, Vietnam, Laos, or Cambodia.   (Sec. 7035) Expresses the sense of Congress that: (1) the Arab League boycott of Israel (reinstated in 1997), and the secondary boycott of American firms that have commercial ties with Israel, is an impediment to regional peace and to U.S. investment and trade in the Middle East and North Africa and should be terminated; and (2) the President should report annually to Congress on steps taken to encourage Arab League states to normalize their relations with Israel to end the boycott.  (Sec. 7036) Prohibits, with a national security interest waiver, the use of funds under titles III through VI of this Act from being used to support a Palestinian state unless the Secretary certifies to Congress that:   the Palestinian governing entity has demonstrated a commitment to peaceful coexistence with Israel and is taking measures to counter terrorism, and  the Palestinian Authority (PA) or a new governing entity is working to establish a lasting peace in the Middle East. Exempts from such restriction assistance to help reform the PA and affiliated institutions or a governing entity meet such assistance requirements.   Expresses the sense of Congress that the governing entity should enact a constitution assuring the rule of law, an independent judiciary, and respect for human rights, and should enact other laws assuring accountable governance.  (Sec. 7037) Prohibits the obligation of funds appropriated under titles II through VI of this Act, except for acquisition of additional space for the Consulate General, to create in Jerusalem a new U.S. agency office for the purpose of conducting official U.S. business with the PA over Gaza and Jericho (or any successor Palestinian governing entity) provided for in the Israel-Palestine Liberation Organization Declaration of Principles.  (Sec. 7038) Prohibits funds under this Act from being used to provide equipment, technical support, consulting services, or any other assistance to the Palestinian Broadcasting Corporation.  (Sec. 7039) Directs the Secretary, for FY2015, to certify to Congress prior to the initial obligation of funds for the bilateral West Bank and Gaza program that the Government Accountability Office (GAO) will have access to necessary financial information to evaluate the uses of U.S. assistance. Requires USAID audits at least once a year to ensure compliance with this section. Directs the Secretary, before obligating economic support funds under this Act for the West Bank and Gaza, to take steps to ensure that such assistance is not provided to or through any individual or entity that advocates or engages in terrorist activity.  Prohibits funds under titles III through VI of this Act from being used to honor individuals who commit, or have committed, acts of terrorism. Requires and obligates funds for program audits.  (Sec. 7040) Prohibits specified assistance to the PA unless the President certifies to Congress that it is in the U.S. national security interest. States that any such waiver shall: (1) not be for more than six months at a time, and (2) not apply beyond 12 months after enactment of this Act. Requires a report to Congress when such waiver is exercised.  Prohibits the use of appropriations under titles III through VI of this Act for salaries of PA personnel in Gaza or for assistance to Hamas or any Hamas-controlled or power-sharing government unless the President certifies to Congress that it has accepted Israel's right to exist and is adhering to previous agreements with the United States, Israel, and the international community.  Prohibits the obligation of funds under titles III through VI of this Act for the Palestine Liberation Organization (PLO).  (Sec. 7041) Makes funds under this Act available for the government of Egypt only if the Secretary certifies to Congress that such government is: (1) sustaining the strategic relationship with the United States, and (2) meeting its obligations under the 1979 Egypt-Israel Peace Treaty.  Makes available specified:   Economic Support Fund amounts for Egypt, including amounts for education and economic growth programs;  foreign military financing funds to Egypt until September 30, 2016; and  economic and military funds under this Act if Egypt has held parliamentary elections, and is taking steps to govern democratically.   Makes funds available to Egypt for counterterrorism, border security, nonproliferation programs, and development activities in the Sinai.  States that it is U.S. policy to prevent Iran from achieving the capability to produce nuclear weapons.  Prohibits the use of specified funds by the Export-Import Bank of the United States to provide new financing to any person subject to sanctions under the Iran Sanctions Act of 1996.  States that funds under this Act for Iraq should be made available to Iraq to promote internal regional stability, including in Kurdistan to address requirements arising from regional conflict. Prohibits funds under this Act from being made available for construction or other improvements to U.S. facilities in Iraq on property for which no land-use agreement has been entered into by the governments of the United States and Iraq unless necessary to protect U.S. government facilities or U.S. personnel.  Makes specified funds available to Jordan for: (1) foreign military financing, (2) economic support, and (3) costs related to regional instability. Prohibits the availability of funds under this Act for the Lebanese Armed Forces (LAF) if the LAF is controlled by a foreign terrorist organization.  Makes foreign military financing funds available for Lebanon to professionalize the LAF, strengthen border security, and combat terrorism.  Prohibits the availability of funds under this Act for the central government of Libya unless the Secretary reports to Congress that Libya is cooperating with U.S. efforts to bring to justice those responsible for the Benghazi attack in September 2012. Exempts from such limitation funding for protecting U.S. government personnel or facilities.  Makes Economic Support Fund assistance available for: (1) loan guarantees for Tunisia and Jordan; and (2) enterprise funds for Egypt, Tunisia, and Jordan.  States that funds appropriated under title III of this Act for Morocco shall also be available for any region or territory administered by Morocco, including the Western Sahara. Makes specified funds available for Syria to:    establish representative and accountable governance;  develop democratic political processes;  further the Syrian opposition' s legitimacy through cross-border programs;  develop civil society and an independent media;  promote economic development;  investigate and prosecute human rights violations in Syria, including through transitional justice programs and support for nongovernmental organizations; and  counter extremist ideologies.  Directs the Secretary, before any obligation of funds under this Act for Syria, to ensure that mechanisms are in place for the adequate monitoring and control of assistance inside Syria.  Requires congressional consultation before making funds under this section available for Syria.  Directs the Secretary, before any obligation of Economic Support Fund assistance under this Act for the Palestinian Authority (PA), to report to Congress that the purpose of such assistance is to:   advance Middle East peace,  improve regional security,  continue support for accountable government institutions,  promote a private sector economy, or  address urgent humanitarian needs.   Prohibits the availability of Economic Support Fund assistance under this Act for the PA if the Palestinians:   obtain the same standing as a United Nations (U.N.) member state or full membership in the U.N. or any specialized U.N. agency outside an agreement negotiated between Israel and the Palestinians; or  initiate an International Criminal Court (ICC) investigation, or actively support such an investigation, that subjects Israeli nationals to an investigation for alleged crimes against Palestinians.   Reduces Economic Support Fund assistance for the PA by the amount expended by the PA as payments for acts of terrorism by individuals who are imprisoned after being fairly tried and convicted for acts of terrorism and by individuals who died committing acts of terrorism during the previous calendar year.  Prohibits the availability of funds under this Act to the Armed Forces of Yemen if they are controlled by a foreign terrorist organization.  (Sec. 7042) Makes funds under this Act for the Central African Republic available for reconciliation and peace building programs, including for programs to prevent crimes against humanity.  Urges that specified funds should be made available for the trans-Sahara counterterrorism partnership program and the partnership for regional East Africa counterterrorism program.  Makes funds under this Act available for programs in areas affected by the Lord's Resistance Army (LRA) consistent with the goals of the Lord's Resistance Army Disarmament and Northern Uganda Recovery Act.  Urges that funds under this Act for Liberia, Sierra Leone, Nigeria, Cote d'Ivoire, Senegal, Ghana, and the countries participating in the Congo Basin Forest Partnership be made available to promote transparency regarding the extraction of timber, oil, gas, cacao, and other natural resources.  Prohibits funds under this Act from being made available for: (1) the government of Sudan, and (2) the cost of modifying loans and loan guarantees held by the government of Sudan. Exempts from such restrictions:   humanitarian assistance; assistance for the Darfur region, Southern Kordofan State, Blue Nile State, other marginalized areas and populations in Sudan, and Abyei; and assistance to support implementation of outstanding issues of the Comprehensive Peace Agreement or any other internationally recognized viable peace agreement in Sudan.   Urges that funds under this Act for assistance for South Sudan should:    respond to humanitarian needs, deliver basic services, and mitigate conflict;  support programs that address food insecurity, maintain educational opportunities, and enhance local governance;  advance democratic principles;  support transparency and accountability, including in the oil and gas sector; and  support the professionalization of security forces.   Directs the Secretary of the Treasury to instruct U.S. executive directors to international financial institutions to vote against any loan extensions to the government of Zimbabwe, except to meet basic human needs or to promote democracy, unless the Secretary reports to Congress that Zimbabwe has restored the rule of law.  Prohibits funds under this Act from being made to the government of Zimbabwe, except for health and education, unless the rule of law has been reestablished.  (Sec. 7043) Authorizes Economic Support Fund assistance under this Act to Burma, except that such funds shall not be made available to any successor of the State Peace and Development Council controlled by former Council members who promote its repressive policies. States that funds under title III of this Act for Burma:   may not be made available for budget support for the government;  shall be provided to strengthen civil society organizations;  shall be made available for community-based organizations operating in Thailand to provide food, medical, and other humanitarian assistance to internally displaced persons in eastern Burma; and  shall be made available for ethnic and religious reconciliation programs, and to address the Rohingya and Kachin crises.  States that funds under this Act should be made available to the government of Burma only if it has implemented constitutional reforms providing for inclusive participation in presidential and parliamentary elections.  Prohibits Economic Support Fund assistance from being made available for the government of North Korea.  Prohibits:   specified funds under this Act from being obligated or expended for export licenses of U.S. origin satellites (including commercial satellites and satellite components) to China without prior notice to Congress;  the use of funds under this Act to finance any grant, contract, or cooperative agreement with the People's Liberation Army or any affiliated entity; and  specified funds under this Act from being made available for the government of China, except for disease prevention and treatment programs.   Urges the Secretary of the Treasury to instruct U.S. executive directors of international financial institutions to support projects in Tibet if such projects do not provide incentives for the migration and settlement of non-Tibetans into Tibet or facilitate the transfer of ownership of Tibetan land and natural resources to non-Tibetans.  Makes Economic Support Fund assistance under this Act available to nongovernmental organizations to preserve cultural traditions and promote sustainable development and environmental conservation in Tibetan communities in the Tibetan Autonomous Region and in other Tibetan communities in China.  Makes Economic Support Fund assistance under this Act available for remediation of dioxin contaminated areas in Vietnam.  (Sec. 7044) Prohibits the availability of funds under titles I and II of this Act for construction and renovation of U.S. government facilities in Afghanistan to accommodate federal employee positions or to expand aviation facilities or assets above those notified by the Department and USAID or contractors in addition to those in place on the date of enactment of this Act.  Exempts from such restriction funds that are necessary to protect such facilities or the security and welfare of U.S. personnel.  Withholds specified assistance from Afghanistan until the Secretary submits a required report (which shall be updated every six months until September 30, 2016) to Congress regarding Department and USAID transition and security plans.  States that specified funds under this Act for Afghanistan:   may not be used to initiate any new program or activity that would not have adequate oversight or involves any individual or organization involved in corrupt practices; shall only be made for programs that the government of Afghanistan or another Afghan entity is capable of sustaining;  may be made for independent election bodies, shall be implemented in accordance with audit policies of the Department of State and USAID audit policies; and   may be made for reconciliation programs and disarmament, demobilization, and reintegration activities for former combatants. Prohibits the obligation of specified funds under this Act for the government of Afghanistan unless the Secretary certifies to Congress that:   the United States and Afghanistan have agreed to a Bilateral Security Agreement,  Afghanistan is taking steps to protect the rights of Afghan women and girls, and  Afghanistan is making credible efforts to reduce corruption and recover the stolen assets associated with Kabul Bank.   Reduces assistance for the government of Afghanistan by $5 for every $1 that Afghanistan imposes in taxes or other fees on the transport of U.S. government property entering or leaving Afghanistan.  Prohibits U.S. government use of funds under this Act to enter into a permanent basing rights agreement between the United States and Afghanistan. Withholds specified assistance for Pakistan until the Secretary certifies to Congress that Pakistan is:   cooperating with the United States in counterterrorism efforts,  not supporting terrorist activities against the United States or coalition forces in Afghanistan,  preventing the proliferation of nuclear-related material and expertise,  issuing visas in a timely manner for U.S. visitors engaged in counterterrorism and assistance efforts,  dismantling improvised explosive device (IED) networks, and  providing humanitarian organizations access to detainees and internally displaced persons.   Authorizes the availability of specified military assistance to Pakistan only for counterterrorism and counterinsurgency capabilities in Pakistan.  Withholds specified foreign military financing funds from Pakistan until the Secretary reports to Congress that Dr. Shakil Afridi has been released from prison and cleared of all charges relating to the assistance provided to the United States in locating Osama bin Laden.  Directs the Secretary to report to Congress detailing the costs and objectives associated with significant infrastructure projects supported by the United States in Pakistan.  Prohibits, with humanitarian, demining, and disaster relief exceptions, the availability of specified funds to Sri Lanka unless the Secretary certifies to Congress that Sri Lanka is meeting specified conditions.  States that, if the Secretary makes such certification, foreign military financing funds should be used to support the recruitment and training of Tamils into the Sri Lankan military, Tamil language training for Sinhalese military personnel, and human rights training for all military personnel.  Directs the Secretary of the Treasury to instruct U.S. executive directors at international financial institutions to vote against any loan, agreement, or other financial support for Sri Lanka, except to meet basic human needs, unless the Secretary makes specified certifications.  Makes specified economic support funds available for cross border stabilization and development programs between Afghanistan and Pakistan or between either country and the Central Asian countries.  (Sec. 7045) Authorizes the use of funds under this Act for Columbia for a campaign against narcotics trafficking, illegal armed groups, and foreign terrorist organizations and to protect human health and welfare in emergency circumstances.  Makes Economic Support Fund assistance under this Act available for Cuba to promote democracy and strengthen civil society.  Prohibits the availability of funds under this Act for the government of Haiti until the Secretary certifies to Congress that Haiti: (1) has held free and fair parliamentary elections and a new Haitian Parliament is functioning, (2) is respecting the independence of the judiciary, and (3) is taking effective steps to combat corruption and improve governance.  Makes Haiti eligible to purchase U.S. defense articles and services for its Coast Guard.  Directs the Secretary to submit a specified report to Congress regarding Honduras. Makes assistance available for Mexico and Central American countries to: (1) enhance border security, (2) combat human trafficking and smuggling, and (3) provide for the repatriation and reintegration of citizens from such countries. Directs the Secretary to submit to Congress a multi-country strategy for implementing such enhanced border security initiatives (which shall focus on the southern border of Mexico). Makes specified funds under this Act available for DNA forensic technology programs to combat human trafficking in Central America.  Urges that specified funds under this Act be made available for labor and environmental capacity building activities relating to free trade agreements with countries of Central America, Colombia, Peru, and the Dominican Republic. (Sec. 7046) Prohibits the use of funds under titles III through VI of this Act to pay any assessments, arrearages, or dues of any U.N. member, or from certain funds under this Act for the costs for attendance of another country's delegation at international conferences held under the auspices of multilateral or international organizations.  (Sec. 7047) Permits the President to provide up to a specified amount of commodities and services to the United Nations War Crimes Tribunal if doing so will contribute to a just resolution of charges regarding genocide or other violations of international law in the former Yugoslavia.  (Sec. 7048) Withholds specified funds under titles I and V of this Act for contributions to any U.N. agency or the Organization of American States (OAS) if the Secretary reports to Congress that the agency or organization is not taking specified actions regarding whistle blower protection and financial and performance transparency.  Prohibits funds under this Act from being used to pay expenses for any U.S. delegation to any specialized U.N. agency, body, or commission that is presided over by a country that supports international terrorism.  Prohibits funds under this Act from being made available for the United Nations Human Rights Council (UNHRC) unless the Secretary reports to Congress that: (1) UNRHC participation is in the U.S. national interest, and (2) UNRHC is taking steps to remove Israel as a permanent agenda item. Prohibits specified funds under this Act from being made available as a contribution to the United Nations Relief and Works Agency (UNRWA) until the Secretary reports to Congress that UNRWA is:   inspecting its installations for any inappropriate use and addressing any staff or beneficiary violation of its policies, including policies on employee neutrality;  ensuring that it is operating in compliance with the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961;  ensuring that the content of educational materials in UNRWA-administered schools and summer camps is consistent with the values of human rights, dignity, and tolerance and does not induce incitement;  not engaging in operations with financial institutions or related entities in violation of relevant U.S. law, and is taking steps to improve financial transparency; and  in compliance with the United Nations Board of Auditors' biennial audit requirements.  Prohibits the use of funds under this Act for the design, renovation, or construction of the U.N. Headquarters in New York.  (Sec. 7049) Authorizes the use of specified funds under titles III and IV of this Act to enhance the effectiveness and accountability of civilian police authority through human rights training and through the promotion of civilian police roles that support democratic governance, including programs on conflict prevention, police-community relations, disaster assistance, and gender-based violence.  (Sec. 7050) Prohibits the availability of funds under this Act to promote the sale or export of tobacco or tobacco products, or to seek the reduction or removal by any foreign country of restrictions on the marketing of tobacco or tobacco products.  (Sec. 7051) Prohibits the use of specified funds to send or otherwise pay for the attendance of more than 50 U.S.-stationed employees from a federal department or agency at any single conference outside the United States unless such attendance is important to the national interest.  (Sec. 7052) Authorizes the transfer of certain aircraft including for the transportation of active and standby Civilian Response Corps personnel and equipment.  Requires that the use of Department and USAID aircraft used primarily to transport personnel be coordinated under the authority of the appropriate Chief of Mission.  (Sec. 7053) Withholds assistance from a foreign country in an amount equal to 110% of the total unpaid property tax and unpaid parking fines and penalties incurred April 1, 1997-September 30, 2014, and owed by the country to the District of Columbia or New York City.  (Sec. 7054) Authorizes disposal on a grant basis in foreign countries of demining equipment used in support of the clearance of land mines and unexploded ordnance for humanitarian purposes.  Restricts military assistance for cluster munitions.  (Sec. 7055) Prohibits the use of funds for publicity or propaganda purposes within the United States that were not authorized before the enactment of this Act.  Makes specified funds available for USAID assistance to private and voluntary organizations engaged in facilitating public discussion of hunger and other related issues.  (Sec. 7056) Limits the amount of funds under title II of this Act that may be used for official USAID residence expenses.  (Sec. 7057) Allocates specified funds under title III of this Act for USAID to hire up to 175 persons per fiscal year on a limited appointment basis in the United States and abroad. Conditions such hirings upon an equivalent elimination of USAID nondirect-hire employees. Terminates such authority on September 30, 2016. Authorizes up to four-year extensions for limited-appointment Foreign Service personnel.  Authorizes specified funds under title III of this Act for the costs of persons detailed to or employed by USAID to carry out natural or man-made disaster response programs.  Authorizes specified funds under this Act to be used by USAID to employ up to 40 personal services contractors in the United States for new or expanded overseas programs until permanent personnel are hired. Limits to 15 the number of such contractors that may be assigned to any bureau or office.  Continues USAID authority to appoint into the Senior Foreign Service and employ up to 10 individuals for programs in Afghanistan or Pakistan.  (Sec. 7058) States that funds appropriated by titles III and IV of this Act for bilateral assistance for child survival activities or disease programs, including HIV/AIDS research, prevention and treatment activities, may be made available notwithstanding any other provision of law with specified exceptions.  Authorizes the use of specified funds under this Act for family planning/reproductive health.  Authorizes funds under title III of this Act to: (1) combat a pandemic virus if the President reports to Congress that the virus is severe and is spreading internationally, and (2) combat polio. Withholds specified funds from the Global Fund to Fight AIDS, Tuberculosis and Malaria until the Secretary reports to Congress that the Fund is implementing a policy of transparency and maintaining a policy to protect whistle blowers from retaliation.  (Sec. 7059) Makes specified funds under this Act available for: (1) gender programs, (2) programs to increase political opportunities for women in countries where women and girls suffer severe forms of discrimination, and (3) a multi-year strategy to prevent and respond to gender-based violence in countries where it is common.  Makes funds under this Act available to empower women as equal partners in conflict prevention, peace building, and reconstruction efforts.  States that programs funded under titles III and IV of this Act to train foreign police and judicial and military personnel shall: (1) address prevention and response to gender-based violence and trafficking in persons, and (2) promote the integration of women into the police and other security forces of their countries.  (Sec. 7060) Allocates specified funds for:   basic and higher education,  the development grants program,  conservation programs,  food security and agriculture development programs,  microenterprise and microfinance development programs for the poor and women,  activities to combat trafficking in persons, and  water and sanitation supply projects.  (Sec. 7061) Prohibits funds under this Act from being obligated or expended to implement the Arms Trade Treaty until the Senate approves a resolution of ratification for the Treaty.  (Sec. 7062) Prohibits funds under titles III through VI of this Act from being provided to a nongovernmental organization or contractor which fails to provide documents, files, or records for USAID auditing requirements.  (Sec. 7063) Prohibits funds under this Act from being made available for: (1) the United Nations Population Fund; and (2)population planning activities to any foreign nongovernmental organization that promotes or performs abortions, except in cases of rape or incest or when the mother's life would be endangered. (Sec. 7064) Prohibits appropriations for the Department, foreign operations, and related programs from being obligated for any country, including a state with a compact of free association with the United States, that concludes an agreement with the United States to receive by transfer or release individuals detained at Naval Station, Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, unless the Secretary notifies Congress of such agreement's terms prior to its implementation.  (Sec. 7065) Obligates specified funds under this Act for assistance to eliminate inhumane conditions in foreign prisons and other detention facilities. (Sec. 7066) Prohibits the use of funds under this Act to support or justify the use of torture, cruel, or inhumane treatment by any U.S. government official or contract employee.  (Sec. 7067) Prohibits the use of funds under this Act (other than funds for narcotics control and law enforcement, refugee assistance, or antiterrorism activities) to assist the government of a country with which the United States has diplomatic relations and an extradition treaty and refuses to extradite to the United States any individual charged with a criminal offense for which the maximum penalty is life imprisonment without parole, or for killing a law enforcement officer.  Authorizes the Secretary to waive such restriction on a case-by-case basis if important to U.S. national interests.  (Sec. 7068) Authorizes the commercial leasing of certain defense articles (instead of the government-to-government sale) to Israel, Egypt, North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) members, and major non-NATO allies if the President determines that there are compelling foreign policy or national security reasons.  (Sec. 7069) Prohibits funds under this Act from being made available for assistance to the government of the Russian Federation. Prohibits funds under this Act, subject to a U.S. national interest waiver, from being made available for a government of an Independent State of the former Soviet Union that directs any action in violation of the territorial integrity or national sovereignty of any other Independent State of the former Soviet Union.  Authorizes Economic Support Fund assistance under this Act to specified countries pursuant to the Support for Eastern European Democracy (SEED) Act of 1989 and the FREEDOM Support Act.  Makes specified funds under this Act available for enhanced programs to counter external, regional aggression and influence in Ukraine and other Independent States of the Former Soviet Union and Central and Eastern Europe.  (Sec. 7070) Extends certain IMF transparency requirements to this Act.  Directs the Secretary of the Treasury to: (1) instruct the U.S. Executive Director of the IMF to ensure that any loan will be repaid to the IMF before other private creditors, and (2) ensure that the IMF is implementing whistle blower best practices.  (Sec. 7071) Prohibits the provision of funds under titles III through VI of this Act for: (1) any financial incentive to a business for purposes of inducing it to relocate outside the United States if it will reduce the number of U.S. employees, or (2) assistance for any program that contributes to the violation of internationally recognized workers rights in the recipient country.  (Sec. 7072) Obligates funds for the Special Defense Acquisition Fund, to remain available for obligation until September 30, 2017. (Sec. 7073) Prohibits the use of funds under this Act, with a specified exception, to enter into a contract or cooperative agreement with, make a grant to, or provide a loan or loan guarantee to a corporation that was convicted of a federal felony within the preceding 24 months, or has unpaid federal taxes if the awarding agency has knowledge of the conviction or unpaid taxes.  (Sec. 7074) Prohibits funds under titles III through VI of this Act from being made available for Enterprise Funds unless Congress is notified 15 days in advance.  Directs the President to submit to Congress a plan for the distribution of the assets of an Enterprise Fund before any distribution resulting from liquidation, dissolution, or winding up of the Fund.  (Sec. 7075) States that if the President makes a determination not to comply with any provision of this Act on constitutional grounds, the head of the relevant federal agency shall notify Congress within five days regarding the basis for such determination and any resulting program and policy changes. (Sec. 7076) Requires each department, agency, or organization funded under titles I and II of this Act, and the Department of the Treasury and the independent agencies funded under title III of this Act to submit to Congress an operating plan for funds appropriated or otherwise available for obligation in FY2015. Requires the Secretary to submit to Congress a spend plan for funds made available under titles III and IV of this Act for:   Afghanistan, Colombia, Egypt, Iraq, Lebanon, Libya, Mexico, Pakistan, Yemen, and the West Bank and Gaza;  democracy programs and sectors set forth in section 760 of this Act; and  the Caribbean Basin Security Initiative, the Central American Regional Security Initiative, the Trans-Sahara Counterterrorism Partnership program, and the Partnership for Regional East Africa Counterterrorism program.   (Sec. 7077) Obligates specified funds under titles I and III of this Act for programs to promote Internet freedom globally. Prioritizes such funds for those countries whose governments restrict Internet freedom and that are important to U.S. national interests.  (Sec. 7078) Directs the Secretary to rename the section of International Place, DC, which runs in front of the Embassy of China, as Liu Xiaobo Plaza. States that hereafter the Embassy's address shall be No. 1 Liu Xiaobo Plaza.  Title VIII: Overseas Contingency Operations - Appropriates additional funds to the Department for: (1) diplomatic and consular programs; (2) the Office of Inspector General; and (3) embassy security, construction, and maintenance. Appropriates additional funds to USAID for operating expenses. Appropriates additional bilateral assistance funds to the President for: (1) international disaster assistance, and (2) the Economic Support Fund.  Appropriates additional bilateral assistance funds to the Department for migration and refugee assistance.  Appropriates additional security assistance funds to the Department for: (1) international narcotics control and law enforcement; (2) nonproliferation, antiterrorism, and demining; and (3) peacekeeping operations.  Appropriates additional funds to the President for the foreign military financing program.  (Sec. 8001) States that: (1) funds appropriated in this title are in addition to amounts appropriated or otherwise made available in this Act for FY2015, and (2) such additional funds shall be available under the authorities and conditions applicable to such appropriations accounts.  (Sec. 8003) Authorizes the transfer of specified funds under this title.  (Sec. 8004) States that each amount designated in this Act by Congress for overseas contingency operations/global war on terrorism pursuant to the Balanced Budget and Emergency Deficit Control Act of 1985 shall be available (or rescinded, if applicable) only if the President subsequently so designates all such amounts and transmits such designations to the Congress. Title IX: Additional General Provision - (Sec. 9001) States that the amount by which the applicable allocation of new budget authority made by the House Committee on Appropriations pursuant to the Congressional Budget Act of 1974 exceeds the amount of proposed new budget authority is $0.",
                "summary_short": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary has been expanded because action occurred on the measure.) Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2015 - Title I: Department of State and Related Agency - Makes FY2015 appropriations for the Department of State (Department) for:   administration of foreign affairs and diplomatic and consular programs;  the Capital Investment Fund;  the Office of Inspector General;  educational an...",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2014-06-27",
                "latest_major_action": "Placed on the Union Calendar, Calendar No. 372."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "113",
                "bill_id": "hr4474-113",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.4474",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/113/bills/hr4474.json",
                "title": "To remove the Kurdistan Democratic Party and the Patriotic Union of Kurdistan from treatment as terrorist organizations and for other purposes.",
                "short_title": "To remove the Kurdistan Democratic Party and the Patriotic Union of Kurdistan from treatment as terrorist organizations and for other purposes.",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/113th-congress/house-bill/4474",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/113/hr4474",
                "introduced_date": "2014-04-10",
                "active": false,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 3,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {"D":2,"R":1},
                "committees": "House Judiciary Committee",
                "primary_subject": "Immigration",
                "summary": "Declares that the Kurdistan Democratic Party and the Patriotic Union of Kurdistan shall not be considered terrorist organizations under the Immigration and Nationality Act. Authorizes the Secretary of State, however, to suspend this declaration for either or both groups.  Makes terrorist activity-related inadmissibility criteria inapplicable to an alien's activities undertaken in association with the Kurdistan Democratic Party or the Patriotic Union of Kurdistan if the alien is applying for a nonimmigrant visa, presents himself or herself for inspection at a port of entry as a nonimmigrant, or is applying in the United States for nonimmigrant status unless a consular officer or the Secretary of Homeland Security (DHS): (1) knows or has reasonable grounds to believe that the alien poses a threat to U.S. security; or (2) believes that the alien does not warrant a visa, U.S. admission, or a grant of nonimmigrant status. Authorizes the Secretary of State, however, to suspend the application of such relief. Prohibits judicial review of any determination made pursuant to this Act.",
                "summary_short": "Declares that the Kurdistan Democratic Party and the Patriotic Union of Kurdistan shall not be considered terrorist organizations under the Immigration and Nationality Act. Authorizes the Secretary of State, however, to suspend this declaration for either or both groups.  Makes terrorist activity-related inadmissibility criteria inapplicable to an alien&#39;s activities undertaken in association with the Kurdistan Democratic Party or the Patriotic Union of Kurdistan if the alien is applying for a...",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2014-06-09",
                "latest_major_action": "Referred to the Subcommittee on Immigration and Border Security."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "113",
                "bill_id": "hr3658-113",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.3658",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/113/bills/hr3658.json",
                "title": "To grant the Congressional Gold Medal, collectively, to the Monuments Men, in recognition of their heroic role in the preservation, protection, and restitution of monuments, works of art, and artifacts of cultural importance during and following World War II.",
                "short_title": "Monuments Men Recognition Act of 2014",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/113th-congress/house-bill/3658",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/113/hr3658",
                "introduced_date": "2013-12-05",
                "active": true,
                "house_passage": "2014-05-19",
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": "2014-05-30",
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 298,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {"D":157,"R":141},
                "committees": "House House Administration Committee",
                "primary_subject": "Arts, Culture, Religion",
                "summary": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary of that version is repeated here, with an updated short title.)  Monuments Men Recognition Act of 2014 - Directs the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President pro tempore of the Senate to make arrangements for the presentation of a single congressional gold medal in commemoration of the Monuments Men (men and women who served in the Monuments, Fine Arts, and Archives [MFA] Section under the Allied Armies during World War II) in recognition of their heroic role in the preservation, protection, and restitution of monuments, works of art, and artifacts of cultural importance during and following the War.  Requires the Medal's display at the Smithsonian Institution. Expresses the sense of Congress that the medal should be made available for display elsewhere, particularly at locations associated with the Monuments Men and that preference should be given to locations affiliated with the Smithsonian Institution.  Permits the Secretary of the Treasury to strike and sell duplicates in bronze of the gold medal, at a price sufficient to cover the costs of the medals. ",
                "summary_short": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary of that version is repeated here, with an updated short title.)  Monuments Men Recognition Act of 2014 - Directs the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President pro tempore of the Senate to make arrangements for the presentation of a single congressional gold medal in commemoration of the Monuments Men (men and women who served in the Monuments, Fine Arts, and Archives [MFA] Section under the Allied Armies d...",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2014-06-09",
                "latest_major_action": "Became Public Law No: 113-116."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "113",
                "bill_id": "hr4143-113",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.4143",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/113/bills/hr4143.json",
                "title": "To realign structures and reallocate resources in the Federal Government, in keeping with the core American belief that families are the best protection for children and the bedrock of any society, to bolster United States diplomacy and assistance targeted at ensuring that every child can grow up in a permanent, safe, nurturing, and loving family, and to strengthen intercountry adoption to the United States and around the world and ensure that it becomes a viable and fully developed option for providing families for children in need, and for other purposes.",
                "short_title": "Children in Families First Act of 2014",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/113th-congress/house-bill/4143",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/113/hr4143",
                "introduced_date": "2014-03-04",
                "active": false,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 66,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {"D":35,"R":31},
                "committees": "House Judiciary Committee",
                "primary_subject": "International Affairs",
                "summary": "Children in Families First Act of 2014 - Establishes within the Department of State the Bureau of Vulnerable Children and Family Security which shall: (1) support the implementation in foreign countries of child welfare laws and policies; and (2) establish within the Bureau a Senior Coordinator for Permanence who shall lead the implementation of policies to ensure permanent family care for children living without families, including refugee and stateless children. States that the Bureau shall be headed by an Assistant Secretary and have lead responsibility for representing the U.S. government in diplomatic contacts pertaining to intercountry adoptions. Amends the Intercountry Adoption Act of 2000 to direct the Secretary of Homeland Security (DHS), through U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS), to carry out the functions prescribed by the Convention regarding the accreditation of U.S. adoption services providers.  Establishes data bases for: (1) internationally adopted children, and (2) adoption service providers. Transfers from the Secretary of State to the Field Operations Directorate of USCIS specified adoption-related functions, including accreditation of agencies and approval of persons to provide adoption services and oversight of provider investigations.  Requires the Secretary of Homeland Security (DHS), through USCIS, to: (1) be responsible for processing and case-specific decision making on all intercountry adoption cases, (2) ensure that all intercountry adoption suitability and eligibility determinations of prospective adoptive parents are made in accordance with criteria that comply with the Hague Adoption Convention, (3) ensure that all non-Convention adoption cases undergo specified preprocessing, and (4) be responsible for all case processing steps in Convention and non-Convention adoption petitions on behalf of children whom U.S. parents propose to immigrate to the United States.  Establishes within the U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID) a Center of Excellence on Children in Adversity. Authorizes the President to provide assistance for programs in developing countries for nutrition, education, care, and protection of children. Requires USAID to carry out a priority country demonstration program implementing the (December 2012) Action Plan for Children in Adversity over a period of five years in at least six countries.  Prohibits: (1) the authorization of appropriations to carry out this Act, and (2) funds from being awarded to the United Nations (U.N.) or any of its subsidiaries.",
                "summary_short": "Children in Families First Act of 2014 - Establishes within the Department of State the Bureau of Vulnerable Children and Family Security which shall: (1) support the implementation in foreign countries of child welfare laws and policies; and (2) establish within the Bureau a Senior Coordinator for Permanence who shall lead the implementation of policies to ensure permanent family care for children living without families, including refugee and stateless children. States that the Bureau shall...",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2014-04-16",
                "latest_major_action": "Referred to the Subcommittee on Immigration and Border Security."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "113",
                "bill_id": "hr3323-113",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.3323",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/113/bills/hr3323.json",
                "title": "To realign structures and reallocate resources in the Federal Government, in keeping with the core American belief that families are the best protection for children and the bedrock of any society, to bolster United States diplomacy and assistance targeted at ensuring that every child can grow up in a permanent, safe, nurturing, and loving family, and to strengthen intercountry adoption to the United States and around the world and ensure that it becomes a viable and fully developed option for providing families for children in need, and for other purposes.",
                "short_title": "Children in Families First Act of 2013",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/113th-congress/house-bill/3323",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/113/hr3323",
                "introduced_date": "2013-10-23",
                "active": false,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 31,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {"R":10,"D":21},
                "committees": "House Judiciary Committee",
                "primary_subject": "International Affairs",
                "summary": "Children in Families First Act of 2013 - Establishes within the Department of State the Bureau of Vulnerable Children and Family Security which shall: (1) support the implementation in foreign countries of child welfare laws and policies; and (2) establish within the Bureau a Senior Coordinator for Permanence who shall lead the implementation of policies to ensure permanent family care for children living without families, including refugee and stateless children. States that the Bureau shall be headed by an Assistant Secretary and have lead responsibility for representing the U.S. government in diplomatic contacts pertaining to intercountry adoptions. Amends the Intercountry Adoption Act of 2000 to direct the Secretary of Homeland Security (DHS), through U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS), to carry out the functions prescribed by the Convention regarding the accreditation of U.S. adoption services providers.  Establishes data bases for: (1) internationally adopted children, and (2) adoption service providers. Transfers from the Secretary of State to the Field Operations Directorate of USCIS specified adoption-related functions, including accreditation of agencies and approval of persons to provide adoption services and oversight of provider investigations.  Requires the Secretary of Homeland Security (DHS), through USCIS, to: (1) be responsible for processing and case-specific decision making on all intercountry adoption cases, (2) ensure that all intercountry adoption suitability and eligibility determinations of prospective adoptive parents are made in accordance with criteria that comply with the Hague Adoption Convention, (3) ensure that all non-Convention adoption cases undergo specified preprocessing, and (4) be responsible for all case processing steps in Convention and non-Convention adoption petitions on behalf of children whom U.S. parents propose to immigrate to the United States. Directs the Secretary of State to submit an annual report to Congress regarding children living without families.  Establishes within the U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID) a Center of Excellence on Children in Adversity. Authorizes the President to provide assistance for programs in developing countries for nutrition, education, care, and protection of children. Requires USAID to carry out a priority country demonstration program implementing the (December 2012) Action Plan for Children in Adversity over a period of five years in at least six countries.  Prohibits: (1) the authorization of appropriations to carry out this Act, and (2) funds from being awarded to the United Nations (U.N.) or any of its subsidiaries.",
                "summary_short": "Children in Families First Act of 2013 - Establishes within the Department of State the Bureau of Vulnerable Children and Family Security which shall: (1) support the implementation in foreign countries of child welfare laws and policies; and (2) establish within the Bureau a Senior Coordinator for Permanence who shall lead the implementation of policies to ensure permanent family care for children living without families, including refugee and stateless children. States that the Bureau shall...",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2014-01-09",
                "latest_major_action": "Referred to the Subcommittee on Crime, Terrorism, Homeland Security, and Investigations."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "113",
                "bill_id": "hr2855-113",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.2855",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/113/bills/hr2855.json",
                "title": "Making appropriations for the Department of State, foreign operations, and related programs for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2014, and for other purposes.",
                "short_title": "Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2014",
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "Rep.",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/113th-congress/house-bill/2855",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/113/hr2855",
                "introduced_date": "2013-07-30",
                "active": true,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 0,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {},
                "committees": "House Appropriations Committee",
                "primary_subject": "International Affairs",
                "summary": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary has been expanded because action occurred on the measure.)  Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2014 - Title I: Department of State and Related Agency - Makes FY2014 appropriations for the Department of State (Department) for: (1) administration of foreign affairs and diplomatic and consular programs; (2) the Capital Investment Fund; (3) the Office of Inspector General; (4) educational and cultural exchange programs; (5) representation allowances; (6) U.S. embassy security, construction, and maintenance; (7) protection of foreign missions and officials; (8) emergencies in the diplomatic and consular service; (9) the repatriation loans program account; (10) the American Institute in Taiwan; (11) the Foreign Service Retirement and Disability Fund; (12) international organizations, peacekeeping, and commissions; (13) the International Boundary and Water Commission, United States and Mexico; (14) the International Joint Commission and the International Boundary Commission, United States and Canada; (15) international fisheries commissions; (16) international broadcasting operations and capital improvements; (17) the Asia Foundation; (18) the United States Institute for Peace; (19) the Center for Middle Eastern-Western Dialogue Trust Fund; (20) the Eisenhower Exchange Fellowships, Incorporated; (21) the Israeli Arab Scholarship Program; (22) the National Endowment for Democracy; (23) the Commission for Preservation of America's Heritage Abroad; (24) the United States Commission on International Religious Freedom; (25) the Commission on Security and Cooperation in Europe; (26) the Congressional-Executive Commission on the People's Republic of China; and (27) the United States-China Economic and Security Review Commission.  Title II: United States Agency for International Development - Makes FY2014 appropriations for: (1) operating expenses of the U.S. Agency for International Development (USAID), (2) the capital investment fund, and (3) the Office of Inspector General.  Title III: Bilateral Economic Assistance - Makes FY2014 appropriations for: (1) expenses of the President in carrying out certain programs under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961; (2) global health and child survival; (3) specified development assistance; (4) international disaster assistance; (5) transition initiatives; (6) development credit authority; (7) the Economic Support Fund; (8) promotion of democracy; (9) migration and refugee assistance; (10) the Peace Corps; (11) the Millennium Challenge Corporation; (12) the Inter-American Foundation; (13) the African Development Foundation; and (14) the Department of the Treasury for international affairs technical assistance activities.  Title IV: International Security Assistance - Makes FY2014 appropriations for: (1) international narcotics control and law enforcement; (2) nonproliferation, anti-terrorism, and demining; (3) international peacekeeping operations; (4) international military education and training; and (5) foreign military financing grants.  Title V: Multilateral Assistance - Makes FY2014 appropriations for: (1) the International Development Association, (2) the Asian Development Fund, and (3) the African Development Fund.  Title VI: Export and Investment Assistance - Makes FY2014 appropriations for: (1) the Export-Import Bank of the United States, including the Office of Inspector General and administrative expenses; (2) the Overseas Private Investment Corporation (OPIC) credit and insurance programs, including administrative expenses, and for the cost of direct and guaranteed loans; and (3) the Trade and Development Agency.  Title VII: General Provisions - Sets forth certain limits and prohibitions on the use of appropriations for specified activities.  (Sec. 7002) Requires any federal department or agency that has funds made available to it under this Act to provide Congress with a quarterly accounting of the cumulative balances of any unobligated funds received during FY2014 or in any previous fiscal year.  (Sec. 7003) Limits the use of funds under title I of this Act for any consulting service through procurement contracts to those contracts available for public inspection.  (Sec. 7004) Sets forth restrictions on office space for federal employees with respect to U.S. diplomatic facility construction, with an exception for Marine Corps use.  States that appropriations for the Department, foreign operations, and related programs which may be made available for the acquisition of property for diplomatic facilities in Afghanistan, Pakistan, and Iraq, shall be subject to prior consultation with, and the regular notification procedures of, the Committees on Appropriations. (Sec. 7005) States that costs incurred by an agency or department funded under title I of this Act resulting from personnel actions taken in response to funding reductions included in this Act shall be absorbed within such agency's or department's budgetary resources.  (Sec. 706) Prohibits the use of certain funding sources for site acquisition and mitigation, planning, design or construction of the New London Embassy, United Kingdom.  (Sec. 7007) Prohibits the use of funds under titles III through VI of this Act for direct assistance or reparations to Cuba, North Korea, Iran, or Syria.  (Sec. 7008) Prohibits the use of funds under titles III through VI this Act for assistance to any country whose elected head of government is deposed by military or military-supported coup or decree.  Permits resuming assistance if a democratic government is subsequently elected to office.  (Sec. 7009) Limits certain agency, Department, and Broadcasting Board of Governors transfer authority.  (Sec. 7010) Directs the Secretary of State (Secretary in this title) to report to Congress quarterly on fund use for foreign military financing, international military education and training, peacekeeping operations, and the Pakistan Counterinsurgency Capability Fund.  (Sec. 7011) Prohibits, with specified exceptions, appropriations under this Act from remaining available for obligation after the expiration of the current fiscal year unless expressly provided for.  (Sec. 7012) Prohibits funds under titles III through VI of this Act from being used for assistance to any country in default in excess of a year on payments on a U.S. loan unless the President determines such assistance is in the U.S. national interest.  (Sec. 7013) Prohibits funds under titles III through VI of this Act from being used for assistance under a new bilateral agreement unless such assistance is exempt from taxation, or reimbursed, by the foreign government.  (Sec. 7014) Authorizes specifically designated appropriations under titles II through VI of this Act to be reprogrammed for other programs within the same account subject to the appropriate congressional committees' regular notification procedures.  Extends the availability of program-specific appropriations for one fiscal year if the Secretary or USAID reports to Congress that program termination or changed circumstances makes it unlikely that such appropriations can be obligated during the original period of availability.  States that ceilings and specifically designated funding levels under this Act shall not be applicable to funds or authorities appropriated or otherwise made available by any subsequent Act unless such Act specifically so directs.  (Sec. 7015) Prohibits funds that remain available for FY2014 obligation under titles I and II of this Act or in prior appropriations Acts from being made available for specified reprogramming purposes unless the appropriate congressional committees are notified 15 days in advance of such programming.  States that the requirements of this section or any similar provision may be waived if failure to do so would pose a substantial risk to human health or welfare.  Prohibits the use of funds under titles III through VI of this Act for Afghanistan, Bolivia, Burma, Cambodia, Cuba, Ecuador, Egypt, Ethiopia, Guatemala, Haiti, Honduras, Iran, Iraq, Lebanon, Libya, Nicaragua, Pakistan, the Russian Federation, Serbia, Somalia, Sri Lanka, South Sudan, Sudan, Tunisia, Uzbekistan, Venezuela, Yemen, and Zimbabwe except through the regular notification procedures of the appropriate congressional committees.  (Sec. 7016) Requires the Department of Defense (DOD) to notify Congress before: (1) providing certain excess defense articles under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961, or (2) issuing a letter of offer to sell certain defense articles under the Arms Export Control Act.  (Sec. 7017) States that funds appropriated under titles III through VI of this Act or in prior appropriations Acts for the Department, foreign operations, export financing, and related programs that are returned or not made available for international organizations and programs shall remain available for obligation until September 30, 2015.  (Sec. 7018) Prohibits certain funds under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 from being: (1) used to pay for abortions, involuntary sterilizations, or related biomedical research as a method of family planning; or (2) obligated or expended for any country or organization if such funds' use would violate specified provisions related to abortions and involuntary sterilizations.  (Sec. 7019) Allocates funds for specified accounts.  (Sec. 7020) Prohibits the obligation of certain funds to pay for alcoholic beverages or entertainment expenses for recreational activities.  (Sec. 7021) Prohibits the provision of funds under titles III through VI of this Act to any foreign government that provides lethal military equipment to a country that supports international terrorism unless the President reports to Congress that such assistance is in the U.S. national interest.  Prohibits bilateral assistance from being made to a government that: (1) grants sanctuary from prosecution to any individual or group which has committed an act of international terrorism, (2) otherwise supports international terrorism, or (3) is controlled by a terrorist organization. Authorizes the President to waive such prohibition for humanitarian or national security purposes.  (Sec. 7022) Extends, with an exception, certain authorities necessary to expend Department and foreign assistance funds.  (Sec. 7024) States that, unless expressly provided to the contrary, provisions authorizing or making appropriations for the Department, foreign operations, and related programs shall not be construed to prohibit activities authorized by the Peace Corps Act, the Inter-American Foundation Act, or the African Development Foundation Act.  (Sec. 7025) Prohibits funds under titles III through VI of this Act and funds available to the Export-Import Bank and OPIC from being used for production of any export commodity by a foreign country if the commodity is likely to be in surplus on world markets and will cause substantial injury to U.S. producers of a similar or competing commodity (with exceptions for benefits to U.S. producers).  (Sec. 7026) Directs USAID to require countries that receive foreign assistance which results in the generation of local currencies to deposit such currencies in a separate account to be used to finance foreign assistance activities.  (Sec. 7027) States that: (1) restrictions on assistance for a country shall not be construed to restrict specified assistance for nongovernmental organizations, and (2) nothing in this section shall be construed to alter existing prohibitions against abortion or involuntary sterilizations in this or any other Act.  States that: (1) during FY2014 restrictions contained in this or any other Act with respect to assistance for a country shall not be construed to restrict assistance under the Agricultural Trade Development and Assistance Act of 1954 (P.L. 480), and (2) this section shall not apply to assistance restrictions regarding support of international terrorism and human rights violations.  (Sec. 7028) Prohibits the provision of funds under titles III through VI of this Act for: (1) any financial incentive to a business for purposes of inducing it to relocate outside the United States if it will reduce the number of U.S. employees, or (2) assistance for any program that contributes to the violation of internationally recognized workers rights in the recipient country.  (Sec. 7029) States that none of the funds under title V of this Act should be paid to any international financial institution unless the Secretary of the Treasury certifies to Congress that such institution requires independent evaluations of each project, program loan or grant, or significant non-lending activity.  Prohibits payments under title V of this Act to any international financial institution while the U.S. executive director to the institution is compensated at a rate in excess of that for Level IV of the Executive Schedule, or any alternate U.S. director is compensated at a rate in excess of that for Level V of such Schedule.  Directs the Secretary of the Treasury to instruct: (1) the U.S. Executive Director of the International Monetary Fund (IMF) to oppose assistance to a Heavily Indebted Poor Country that imposes budget caps or restraints that do not allow the maintenance of or an increase in governmental spending on health care or education, and (2) the U.S. executive directors at international financial entities to oppose assistance that requires user fees or service charges on poor people for primary education or primary health care.  (Sec. 7030) Authorizes nongovernmental organizations which are USAID grantees or contractors to place funds made available to them under title III of this Act in interest bearing accounts in order to enhance their participation in debt-for-development and debt-for-nature exchanges.  (Sec. 7031) Sets forth requirements for direct government-to government assistance.  (Sec. 7032) Obligates funds for democracy programs. i (Sec. 7033) Conditions the use of funds appropriated by this Act to make any pledge for future year funding for any multilateral or bilateral program funded in titles III through VI of this Act.  (Sec. 7034) Makes funds under titles III through VI of this Act available for: (1) war victims, (2) displaced children, (3) displaced Burmese, and (4) victims of trafficking in persons and to combat such trafficking.  Expands authorities under the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 for civilian police assistance for a regional, district, municipal, or other sub-national entity emerging from instability.  Makes specified funds available for: (1) the World Food Program; (2) programs to disarm, demobilize, and reintegrate into civilian society former members of foreign terrorist organizations; (3) the Partner Vetting System pilot program; (4) the program for research and training on Eastern Europe and the Independent States of the Former Soviet Union; and (5) contingencies.   Urges the Secretary to withhold funds under title III of this Act for the central government of any country that is not taking appropriate steps to comply with the Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abductions.  Authorizes the Secretary to transfer unobligated expired FY2014 diplomatic and consular program balances to the protection of foreign missions account for reimbursement of local claims, except for funds designated for overseas contingency operations and the war on terror.  (Sec. 7035) Expresses the sense of Congress that: (1) the Arab League boycott of Israel (reinstated in 1997), and the secondary boycott of American firms that have commercial ties with Israel, is an impediment to regional peace and to U.S. investment and trade in the Middle East and North Africa and should be terminated; and (2) the President should report annually to Congress on steps taken to encourage Arab League states to normalize their relations with Israel to end the boycott.  (Sec. 7036) Prohibits, with a national security interest waiver, the use of funds under titles III through VI of this Act from being used to support a Palestinian state unless the Secretary certifies to Congress that: (1) the Palestinian governing entity has demonstrated a commitment to peaceful coexistence with Israel and is taking measures to counter terrorism, and (2) the Palestinian Authority (PA) or a new governing entity is working to establish a lasting peace in the Middle East.  Exempts from such restriction assistance to help reform the PA and affiliated institutions or a governing entity meet such assistance requirements.  Expresses the sense of Congress that the governing entity should enact a constitution assuring the rule of law, an independent judiciary, and respect for human rights, and should enact other laws assuring accountable governance.  (Sec. 7037) Prohibits the obligation of funds appropriated under titles II through VI of this Act, except for acquisition of additional space for the Consulate General, to create in Jerusalem a new U.S. agency office for the purpose of conducting official U.S. business with the PA over Gaza and Jericho (or any successor Palestinian governing entity) provided for in the Israel-Palestine Liberation Organization Declaration of Principles.  (Sec. 7038) Prohibits funds under this Act from being used to provide equipment, technical support, consulting services, or any other assistance to the Palestinian Broadcasting Corporation.  (Sec. 7039) Directs the Secretary, for FY2014, to certify to Congress prior to the initial obligation of funds for the bilateral West Bank and Gaza program that the Government Accountability Office (GAO) will have access to necessary financial information to evaluate the uses of U.S. assistance.  Directs the Secretary, before obligating economic support funds under this Act for the West Bank and Gaza, to take steps to ensure that such assistance is not provided to or through any individual or entity that advocates or engages in terrorist activity.  Prohibits funds from being used to honor individuals who commit, or have committed, acts of terrorism.  Requires and obligates funds for program audits.  (Sec. 7040) Prohibits specified assistance to the PA unless the President certifies to Congress that it is in the U.S. national security interest.  States that any such waiver shall: (1) not be for more than six months at a time, and (2) not apply beyond 12 months after enactment of this Act. Requires a report to Congress when such waiver is exercised.  Prohibits the use of appropriations under titles III through VI of this Act for salaries of PA personnel in Gaza or for assistance to Hamas or any Hamas-controlled or power-sharing government unless the President certifies to Congress that it has accepted Israel's right to exist and is adhering to previous agreements with the United States, Israel, and the international community.  Prohibits the obligation of funds under titles III through VI of this Act for the Palestine Liberation Organization (PLO).  (Sec. 7041) Prohibits the availability of Economic Support Fund assistance under this Act for the PA if: (1) the Palestinians obtain the same standing as a United Nations (U.N.) member state or full membership in the U.N. or any specialized U.N. agency outside an agreement negotiated between Israel and the Palestinians; or (2) the Palestinians initiate or actively support an International Criminal Court (ICC) investigation or prosecution of Israeli nationals. (Sec. 7042) Makes specified funds available for the government of Egypt only if the Secretary certifies to Congress that such government is meeting its obligations under the 1979 Egypt-Israel Peace Treaty.  Directs the Secretary to certify to Congress that the government of Egypt is demonstrating a commitment to a pluralistic and inclusive democracy before any obligation of economic support and military financing assistance under this Act.  States that it is U.S. policy to prevent Iran from achieving the capability to produce nuclear weapons. Prohibits the use of specified funds by the Export-Import Bank of the United States to provide new financing to any person subject to sanctions under the Iran Sanctions Act of 1996. States that funds under this Act for Iraq should be made available to Iraq to support international efforts to promote regional stability, including in Syria.  Prohibits the use of funds under this Act for a permanent U.S.-Iraq basing rights agreement.  Makes specified funds available to Jordan for: (1) foreign military financing; and (2) costs related to regional instability.  Prohibits military financing funds under this Act from being made available for the Lebanese Armed Forces (LAF) if the LAF is controlled by, or in close collaboration with, Hezbollah or any other foreign terrorist organization.  Prohibits military financing funds under this Act from being made available for Lebanon unless the Secretary certifies to Congress that: (1) the LAF is not controlled by or collaborating with Hezbollah or any other foreign terrorist organization; and (2) such assistance will only be used to professionalize the LAF, strengthen border security and combat terrorism, and implement U.N. Security Council Resolution 1701 (cessation of hostilities in Lebanon after 2006).  Prohibits the availability of funds under this Act for the central government of Libya unless the Secretary reports to Congress that Libya is cooperating with U.S. efforts to bring to justice those responsible for the Benghazi attack in September 2012.  Exempts from such limitation funding for protecting U.S. government personnel or facilities.   Makes funds under title III of this Act for Morocco available for any region or territory administered by Morocco, including the Western Sahara.  Directs the Secretary, before any obligation of funds under this Act for Syria, to consult with Congress. Prohibits military financing funds under this Act from being made available to Yemen until the Secretary reports to Congress that the Armed Forces of Yemen: (1) are not controlled by a foreign terrorist organization, and (2) are cooperating with the United States on counterterrorism efforts against Al Qaeda and other terrorist organizations.  (Sec. 7043) Makes funds under this Act for the Central African Republic available for programs in areas affected by the Lord's Resistance Army consistent with the goals of the Lord's Resistance Army Disarmament and Northern Uganda Recovery Act. Obligates funds for the trans-Sahara counterterrorism partnership program and the partnership for regional East Africa counterterrorism program.  Urges that funds under this Act for Liberia, Sierra Leone, Nigeria, Cote d'Ivoire, Senegal, Ghana, and the countries participating in the Congo Basin Forest Partnership be made available to promote transparency regarding the extraction of timber, oil, gas, cacao, and other natural resources. Prohibits funds under this Act from being made available for: (1) the government of Sudan, (2) the cost of modifying loans and loan guarantees held by the government of Sudan, and (3) bilateral economic assistance to the government of any country that admits President Omar al-Bashir of Sudan.  Urges that funds under this Act be made available for South Sudan.  Directs the Secretary to report to Congress regarding the extent to which South Sudan is: (1) establishing democratic institutions and supporting democratic freedoms, and (2) investigating members of security forces who have violated human rights. Reaffirms the support of Congress for the efforts of the International Criminal Tribunal for Rwanda (ICTR) and the Special Court for Sierra Leone (SCSL) to bring to justice individuals responsible for war crimes and crimes against humanity.  Authorizes funds under this Act to be made available to the government of a country in which individuals indicted by the ICTR and the SCSL are alleged to be living if the Secretary reports to Congress that such government is cooperating with the ICTR and the SCSL. Directs the Secretary of the Treasury to instruct U.S. executive directors to international financial institutions to vote against any loan extensions to the government of Zimbabwe, except to meet basic human needs or to promote democracy, unless the Secretary reports to Congress that Zimbabwe has restored the rule of law.  Prohibits funds under this Act from being made to the government of Zimbabwe, except for health and education, unless the rule of law has been reestablished.  (Sec. 7044) Authorizes Economic Support Fund assistance under this Act to Burma, except that such funds shall not be made available to any successor of the State Peace and Development Council controlled by former Council members who promote its repressive policies.  Prohibits Economic Support Fund assistance from being made available for the government of North Korea.  Prohibits: (1) specified funds under this Act from being obligated or expended for export licenses of U.S. origin satellites (including commercial satellites and satellite components) to China without prior notice to Congress; and (2) the use of funds under this Act to finance any grant, contract, or cooperative agreement with the People's Liberation Army or any affiliated entity.  Urges the Secretary of the Treasury to instruct U.S. executive directors of international financial institutions to support projects in Tibet if such projects do not provide incentives for the migration and settlement of non-Tibetans into Tibet or facilitate the transfer of ownership of Tibetan land and natural resources to non-Tibetans.  Makes specified funds under this Act funds available to nongovernmental organizations to preserve cultural traditions and promote sustainable development and environmental conservation in Tibetan communities in the Tibetan Autonomous Region and in other Tibetan communities in China.  (Sec. 7045) Authorizes economic support funds under this Act for Colombia to be transferred to and merged with migration and refugee assistance funds, and be available only for assistance to nongovernmental and international organizations that provide assistance to Colombian refugees in neighboring countries.  Makes economic support funds under this Act available for Cuba only to promote democracy and strengthen civil society in Cuba. Makes Haiti eligible to purchase U.S. defense articles and services for its Coast Guard.  Withholds specified assistance for Honduran military and police forces until the Secretary reports to Congress that Honduras is: (1) implementing policies to protect freedom of expression and due process of law, and (2) investigating military and police personnel who are alleged to have violated human rights.  Makes specified assistance available for labor and environmental capacity building activities relating to free trade agreements with the countries of Central America, Peru, Colombia, and the Dominican Republic.  (Sec. 7046) Withholds specified assistance from Afghanistan until the Secretary reports to Congress regarding: (1) Department and USAID transition and security plans, (2) rights of Afghan women and girls, and (3) taxation of U.S. assistance. Prohibits U.S. government use of funds under this Act to enter into a permanent basing rights agreement between the United States and Afghanistan.  Withholds specified assistance for Pakistan until the Secretary certifies to Congress that Pakistan is: (1) cooperating with the United States in counterterrorism efforts, (2) not supporting terrorist activities against the United States or coalition forces in Afghanistan, (3) preventing the proliferation of nuclear-related material and expertise, (4) issuing visas in a timely manner for U.S. visitors engaged in counterterrorism and assistance efforts, (5) dismantling improvised explosive device (IED) networks, (6) providing humanitarian organizations access to detainees and internally displaced persons, and (7) protecting judicial independence.  Authorizes the availability of specified military assistance to Pakistan only for counterterrorism and counterinsurgency capabilities in Pakistan.  Makes Economic Support Fund assistance available for cross border stabilization and development programs between Afghanistan and Pakistan, or between either country and the Central Asian republics.   (Sec. 7047) Prohibits the use of funds under titles III through VI of this Act to pay any assessments, arrearages, or dues of any U.N. member, or from certain funds under this Act for the costs for attendance of another country's delegation at international conferences held under the auspices of multilateral or international organizations.  (Sec. 7048) Permits the President to provide up to a specified amount of commodities and services to the United Nations War Crimes Tribunal if doing so will contribute to a just resolution of charges regarding genocide or other violations of international law in the former Yugoslavia.  (Sec. 7049) Withholds specified funds under this Act for contributions to any U.N. organization, agency, or program, or any international organization until the Secretary certifies that the organization is: (1) publishing on a publicly available Web site regular financial and programmatic audits and provides the U.S. government with full access to such information, and (2) implementing whistle blower protection practices.  Prohibits funds under this Act from being used to pay expenses for any U.S. delegation to any specialized U.N. agency, body, or commission that is presided over by a country that has provided support for international terrorism.  Makes specified funds available for U.S. contributions or assessments for the United Nations Human Rights Council (UNHRC) only if the Secretary reports to Congress that: (1) UNRHC participation is in the U.S. national interest, and (2) UNRHC is taking steps to remove Israel as a permanent agenda item. Prohibits the use of funds under this Act for the design, renovation, or construction of the U.N. Headquarters in New York.  Prohibits migration and refugee assistance funds under this Act from being made available for the United Nations Relief and Works Agency (UNRWA) until the Secretary reports to Congress that UNRWA is: (1) addressing staff, beneficiary, or facility use violations of its own policies; (2) taking measures to ensure it is operating in compliance with the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961; (3) taking steps to improve the transparency of educational materials in UNRWA-administered schools, and using curriculum materials designed to promote tolerance, non-violent conflict resolution, and human rights; and (4) not engaging in financial operations in violation of U.S. law. (Sec. 7050) Authorizes the use of specified funds under titles III and IV of this Act to enhance the effectiveness and accountability of civilian police authority through human rights training and through the promotion of civilian police roles that support democratic governance, including programs on conflict prevention, police-community relations, disaster assistance, and gender-based violence.  (Sec. 7051) Prohibits the use of specified funds to send or otherwise pay for the attendance of more than 50 U.S.-stationed employees from a federal department or agency at any single conference outside the United States unless such attendance is important to the national interest.  (Sec. 7052) Authorizes the transfer of certain aircraft including for the transportation of active and standby Civilian Response Corps personnel and equipment.  Requires that the use of Department and USAID aircraft used primarily to transport personnel be coordinated under the authority of the appropriate Chief of Mission.  (Sec. 7053) Withholds assistance from a foreign country in an amount equal to 110% of the total unpaid property tax and unpaid parking fines and penalties incurred April 1, 1997-September 30, 2013, and owed by the country to the District of Columbia or New York City.  (Sec. 7054) Authorizes disposal on a grant basis in foreign countries of demining equipment used in support of the clearance of land mines and unexploded ordnance for humanitarian purposes.  Restricts military assistance for cluster munitions.  (Sec. 7055) Prohibits the use of funds for publicity or propaganda purposes within the United States that were not authorized before the enactment of this Act.  Makes specified funds available for USAID assistance to private and voluntary organizations engaged in facilitating public discussion of hunger and other related issues.  (Sec. 7056) Limits the amount of funds under title II of this Act that may be used for official USAID residence expenses.  (Sec. 7057) Allocates specified funds under title III of this Act for USAID to hire up to 175 persons per fiscal year on a limited appointment basis in the United States and abroad.  Conditions such hirings upon an equivalent elimination of USAID nondirect-hire employees.  Terminates such authority on September 30, 2015.  Authorizes up to four-year extensions for limited-appointment Foreign Service personnel.  Authorizes specified funds under title III of this Act for the costs of persons detailed to or employed by USAID to carry out natural or man-made disaster response programs. Authorizes specified funds under this Act to be used by USAID to employ up to 40 personal services contractors in the United States for new or expanded overseas programs until permanent personnel are hired.  Limits to 15 the number of such contractors that may be assigned to any bureau or office.  Continues USAID authority to appoint into the Senior Foreign Service and employ up to 10 individuals for programs in Afghanistan, Iraq, or Pakistan.  (Sec. 7058) States that funds appropriated by titles III and IV of this Act for bilateral assistance for child survival activities or disease programs, including HIV/AIDS research, prevention and treatment activities, may be made available notwithstanding any other provision of law with specified exceptions.  Authorizes specified funds under this Act for family planning and reproductive health. Withholds specified funds under this Act from the Global Fund to Fight AIDS, Tuberculosis and Malaria until the Secretary reports to Congress that the Fund is implementing a policy of transparency and maintaining a policy to protect whistle blowers.  (Sec. 7059) Prohibits the availability of funds under this Act to promote the sale or export of tobacco or tobacco products, or to seek the reduction or removal by any foreign country of restrictions on the marketing of tobacco or tobacco products.  (Sec. 7060) Makes specified funds under this Act available to improve the status of women and promote economic and political gender equality. Requires the Department and USAID to fully integrate gender into all diplomatic and development efforts.  (Sec. 7061) Makes specified funds under this Act available for gender-based violence prevention and response efforts. Requires programs and activities funded under titles III and IV of this Act to train foreign police, judicial, and military personnel to address prevention and response to gender-based violence and trafficking in persons.  (Sec. 7062) Allocates specified funds for: (1) basic education, (2) conservation programs, (3) food security and agriculture development programs, (4) microenterprise and microfinance development programs for the poor and women, (5) women's leadership programs, (6) activities to combat trafficking in persons, (7) water and sanitation supply projects, and (8) American schools and hospitals abroad.  (Sec. 7063) Applies specified human-rights-based conditions on assistance to the government of Uzbekistan under this Act, except that the Secretary may waive such conditions for 6-month periods for up to 12 months after enactment of this Act if in the U.S. national security interest and necessary to obtain access to and from Afghanistan.  (Sec. 7064) Prohibits funds under titles III through VI of this Act from being provided to a nongovernmental organization or contractor which fails to provide documents, files, or records for USAID auditing requirements.  (Sec. 7065) Prohibits funds under this Act from being made available for the United Nations Population Fund.  Prohibits funds under this Act for population planning from being made available to any foreign nongovernmental organization that promotes or performs abortions, except in cases of rape, incest, or when the mother's life would be endangered. (Sec. 7066) Obligates specified funds under this Act for assistance to eliminate inhumane conditions in foreign prisons and other detention facilities.  (Sec. 7067) Prohibits the use of funds under this Act to support or justify the use of torture, cruel, or inhumane treatment by any U.S. government official or contract employee.  (Sec. 7068) Prohibits the use of funds under this Act (other than funds for narcotics control and law enforcement, refugee assistance, or antiterrorism activities) to assist the government of a country with which the United States has diplomatic relations and an extradition treaty and refuses to extradite to the United States any individual charged with a criminal offense for which the maximum penalty is life imprisonment without parole, or for killing a law enforcement officer.  Authorizes the Secretary to waive such restriction on a case-by-case basis if important to U.S. national interests.  (Sec. 7069) Authorizes the commercial leasing of certain defense articles (instead of the government-to-government sale) to Israel, Egypt, North Atlantic Treaty Organization (NATO) members, and major non-NATO allies if the President determines that there are compelling foreign policy or national security reasons.  (Sec. 7070) Prohibits the availability of specified funds under this Act, subject to a U.S. national interest waiver, to a government of an Independent State of the former Soviet Union that directs any action in violation of the territorial integrity or national sovereignty of any other Independent State of the former Soviet Union.  Authorizes Economic Support Fund assistance under this Act to specified countries pursuant to the Support for Eastern European Democracy (SEED) Act of 1989 and the FREEDOM Support Act.  (Sec. 7071) Extends certain IMF transparency requirements to this Act.  Directs the Secretary of the Treasury to instruct the U.S. Executive Director of the IMF to ensure that any loan will be repaid to the IMF before other private creditors.  (Sec. 7072) Prohibits funds under title III of this Act from being made available for the government of the Russian Federation.  Directs the Secretary to report to Congress regarding Russian support for: (1) the governments of Syria and Iran; (2) persecution of government critics, democratic opposition, and domestic and international nongovernmental and media organizations; (3) official corruption; and (4) discrimination against religious groups or religious communities in Russia.  (Sec. 7073) Prohibits funds under this Act from being used for first-class travel by employees of agencies funded under this Act in contravention of the Federal Travel Regulation System.  (Sec. 7074) Prohibits the use of funds under this Act, with a specified exception, to enter into a contract or cooperative agreement with, make a grant to, or provide a loan or loan guarantee to a corporation that was convicted of a federal felony within the preceding 24 months or has unpaid federal taxes if the awarding agency has direct knowledge of the conviction or unpaid taxes.  (Sec. 7075) Prohibits funds under titles III through VI of this Act from being made available for Enterprise Funds unless Congress is notified 15 days in advance.  Directs the President to submit to Congress a plan for the distribution of the assets of an Enterprise Fund before any distribution resulting from liquidation, dissolution, or winding up of the Fund.  (Sec. 7076) Requires each department, agency, or organization funded under titles I and II of this Act, and the Department of the Treasury and the independent agencies funded under title III of this Act to submit to Congress an operating plan for funds appropriated or otherwise available for obligation in FY2014.  Requires the Secretary to submit to Congress a spend plan for specified funds for: (1) Iraq, Haiti, Colombia, Mexico, the Caribbean Basin Security Initiative, and the Central American Regional Security Initiative; (2) certain countries or programs; (3) food security and agriculture development; and (4) the Development Credit Authority for FY2013. (Sec. 7077) Rescinds specified amounts from: (1) the Export-Import Bank of the United States, and (2) Economic Support Fund assistance available to the President for bilateral assistance. (Sec. 7078) Prohibits funds under this Act from being disbursed for a U.S. contribution to the general capital increases of the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, the African Development Bank, or the Inter-American Development Bank until the Secretary of the Treasury certifies to Congress that the appropriate institution is implementing specified reform commitments. (Sec. 7079) States that, if the executive branch makes a determination not to comply with any provision of this Act on constitutional grounds, the head of the relevant federal agency shall notify Congress within five days concerning the basis for such determination and any resulting program and policy changes. (Sec. 7080) Prohibits funds under this Act from being used to implement the Arms Trade Treaty or any similar agreement unless the Treaty has been signed by the President, received the advice and consent of the Senate, and has been the subject of congressional implementing legislation.  (Sec. 7081) Prohibits appropriations for the Department, foreign operations, and related programs from being obligated for any country, including a state with a compact of free association with the United States, that concludes an agreement with the United States to receive by transfer or release individuals detained at Naval Station, Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, unless the Secretary notifies Congress of such agreement's terms prior to its implementation. (Sec. 7082) States that the Congressional Budget Justifications for Department of State Operations and Foreign Operations shall be provided to Congress concurrent with the President's submission of the FY2015 budget.  (Sec. 7083) Obligates specified funds for the Special Defense Acquisition Fund, to remain available for obligation through September 30, 2016. (Sec. 7084) Sets forth the conditions under which funds available under this Act for USAID may be provided for limited competitions through local entities. (Sec. 7085) Prohibits the use of funds under this Act to pay more than 75% of the salary of the Secretary or the Special Representative for Afghanistan and Pakistan during the period July 1, 2014-September 30, 2014, unless as of July 1, 2014, the Department has submitted to Congress a specified audit implementation plan.  Title VIII: Overseas Contingency Operations/Global War on Terrorism- Appropriates additional funds to the Department for: (1) administration and diplomatic and consular programs; (2) the Office of Inspector General; (3) educational and cultural exchange programs; and (4) embassy security, construction, and maintenance.   Appropriates additional funds for: (1) contributions to international organizations, and (2) international broadcasting operations.  Appropriates additional funds to USAID for: (1) operating expenses, and (2) the Office of Inspector General.  Appropriates additional bilateral assistance funds to the President for: (1) international disaster assistance, (2) transition initiatives, and (3) the Economic Support Fund.  Appropriates additional bilateral assistance funds to the Department for migration and refugee assistance.  Appropriates additional security assistance funds to the Department for: (1) international narcotics control and law enforcement; (2) nonproliferation, antiterrorism, and demining; and (3) peacekeeping operations.  Appropriates additional funds to the President for the foreign military financing program.  (Sec. 8001) States that: (1) funds appropriated in this title are in addition to amounts appropriated or otherwise made available in this Act for FY2014, and (2) such additional funds shall be available under the authorities and conditions applicable to such appropriations accounts.  (Sec. 8003) Rescinds a specified amount of unexpended balances from certain Pakistan counterinsurgency capability funds designated for overseas contingency operations/global war on terrorism use. (Sec. 8004) Authorizes the transfer of specified funds under this Act to implement the recommendations of the Benghazi Accountability Review Board. (Sec. 8005) States that each amount designated in this Act for overseas contingency operations/global war on terrorism shall be available (or rescinded, if applicable) only if the President subsequently so designates all such amounts and transmits such designations to Congress. Title IX: Additional General Provision - (Sec. 9001) States that the amount by which the applicable allocation of new budget authority made by Congress under the Congressional Budget Act of 1974 exceeds the amount of proposed new budget authority is $0.",
                "summary_short": "(This measure has not been amended since it was introduced. The summary has been expanded because action occurred on the measure.)  Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2014 - Title I: Department of State and Related Agency - Makes FY2014 appropriations for the Department of State (Department) for: (1) administration of foreign affairs and diplomatic and consular programs; (2) the Capital Investment Fund; (3) the Office of Inspector General; (4) ed...",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2013-07-30",
                "latest_major_action": "Placed on the Union Calendar, Calendar No. 133."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "112",
                "bill_id": "hr5857-112",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.5857",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/112/bills/hr5857.json",
                "title": "Department of State, Foreign Operations, and Related Programs Appropriations Act, 2013",
                "short_title": null,
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/112th-congress/house-bill/5857",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/112/hr5857",
                "introduced_date": "2012-05-25",
                "active": null,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 0,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {},
                "committees": "House Education and the Workforce",
                "primary_subject": "",
                "summary": "",
                "summary_short": "",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2012-05-25",
                "latest_major_action": "Placed on the Union Calendar, Calendar No. 347."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "112",
                "bill_id": "hr2992-112",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.2992",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/112/bills/hr2992.json",
                "title": "Taiwan Airpower Modernization Act of 2011",
                "short_title": null,
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/112th-congress/house-bill/2992",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/112/hr2992",
                "introduced_date": "2011-09-21",
                "active": null,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 26,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {"D":4,"R":22},
                "committees": "House Ways and Means",
                "primary_subject": "",
                "summary": "",
                "summary_short": "",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2011-11-17",
                "latest_major_action": "House committee/subcommittee actions. Status: Ordered to be Reported (Amended) by Voice Vote."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "112",
                "bill_id": "hres295-112",
                "bill_type": "hres",
                "number": "H.RES.295",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/112/bills/hres295.json",
                "title": "Promoting increased awareness, diagnosis, and treatment of atrial fibrillation to address the high morbidity and mortality rates and to prevent avoidable hospitalizations associated with this disease.",
                "short_title": null,
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/112th-congress/house-resolution/295",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/112/hres295",
                "introduced_date": "2011-06-02",
                "active": null,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 42,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {"D":24,"R":18},
                "committees": "House Energy and Commerce",
                "primary_subject": "",
                "summary": "",
                "summary_short": "",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2011-06-03",
                "latest_major_action": "Referred to House subcommittee. Status: Referred to the Subcommittee on Health."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "112",
                "bill_id": "hr912-112",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.912",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/112/bills/hr912.json",
                "title": "Colorectal Cancer Prevention, Early Detection, and Treatment Act",
                "short_title": null,
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/112th-congress/house-bill/912",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/112/hr912",
                "introduced_date": "2011-03-03",
                "active": null,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 30,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {"D":22,"R":8},
                "committees": "House Homeland Security; House Energy and Commerce",
                "primary_subject": "",
                "summary": "",
                "summary_short": "",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2011-03-11",
                "latest_major_action": "Referred to House subcommittee. Status: Referred to the Subcommittee on Health."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "112",
                "bill_id": "hr636-112",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.636",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/112/bills/hr636.json",
                "title": "Affordable Health Care Expansion Act of 2011",
                "short_title": null,
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/112th-congress/house-bill/636",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/112/hr636",
                "introduced_date": "2011-02-10",
                "active": null,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 0,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {},
                "committees": "House Ways and Means",
                "primary_subject": "",
                "summary": "",
                "summary_short": "",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2011-03-04",
                "latest_major_action": "Referred to House subcommittee. Status: Referred to the Subcommittee on Health, Employment, Labor, and Pensions."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "111",
                "bill_id": "hres1643-111",
                "bill_type": "hres",
                "number": "H.RES.1643",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/111/bills/hres1643.json",
                "title": "Recognizing the 75th anniversary of RadioShack Corporation's original listing as a public company on the New York Stock Exchange.",
                "short_title": null,
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/111th-congress/house-resolution/1643",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/111/hres1643",
                "introduced_date": "2010-09-22",
                "active": null,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 0,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {},
                "committees": "House Foreign Affairs",
                "primary_subject": "",
                "summary": "",
                "summary_short": "",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2010-09-22",
                "latest_major_action": "Referred to House committee. Status: Referred to the House Committee on Financial Services."
              },
                           {
                "congress": "111",
                "bill_id": "hr5374-111",
                "bill_type": "hr",
                "number": "H.R.5374",
                "bill_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/111/bills/hr5374.json",
                "title": "To provide for the reimbursement of attorney fees incurred by a member of the Armed Forces who retains private counsel in response to certain charges brought against the member under the Uniform Code of Military Justice and is acquitted or has the charges dismissed or withdrawn.",
                "short_title": null,
                
                
                "sponsor_title": "",
                "sponsor_id": "G000377",
                "sponsor_name": "Kay Granger",
                "sponsor_state": "TX",
                "sponsor_party": "R",
                "sponsor_uri": "https://api.propublica.org/congress/v1/members/G000377.json",
                "gpo_pdf_uri": null,
                "congressdotgov_url": "https://www.congress.gov/bill/111th-congress/house-bill/5374",
                "govtrack_url": "https://www.govtrack.us/congress/bills/111/hr5374",
                "introduced_date": "2010-05-25",
                "active": null,
                "house_passage": null,
                "senate_passage": null,
                "enacted": null,
                "vetoed": null,
                "cosponsors": 34,
                "cosponsors_by_party": {"R":34},
                "committees": "House Transportation and Infrastructure",
                "primary_subject": "",
                "summary": "",
                "summary_short": "",
                "latest_major_action_date": "2010-06-28",
                "latest_major_action": "Referred to House subcommittee. Status: Referred to the Subcommittee on Military Personnel."
              }
             ]
      }
   ]
}
